NATIONAL  IMPERATIVES  FOR  EARTH
AND  CLIMATE  SCIENCE  RESEARCH  AND

APPLICATIONS  INVESTMENTS  OVER

THE  NEXT  DECADE

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

FEBRUARY  13,  2007

Serial No. 110–3

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.house.gov/science

33–104PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
DARLENE  HOOLEY,  Oregon
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
MICHAEL  M.  HONDA,  California
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
KEN  CALVERT,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
VACANCY

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S
February  13,  2007

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Bart  Gordon,  Chairman,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Ralph  M.  Hall,  Minority  Ranking  Member,
Committee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .........
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared Statement by Representative Jerry F. Costello, Member, Committee
on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .............................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Harry  E.  Mitchell,  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................
Prepared Statement by Representative Vernon J. Ehlers, Member, Committee
on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .............................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Randy  Neugebauer,  Member,  Com-
mittee on Science and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives .................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Richard  A.  Anthes,  President,  University  Corporation  for  Atmospheric
Research  (UCAR);  Co-Chair,  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Applications
from Space, National Research Council, The National Academies

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Financial Disclosure .........................................................................................
Dr. Berrien Moore III, University Distinguished Professor, Director, Institute
for  the  Study  of  Earth,  Oceans,  and  Space,  University  of  New  Hampshire;
Co-Chair,  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space,  Na-
tional Research Council, The National Academies

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Honorable  James  Geringer,  Director  of  Policy  and  Public  Sector  Strategy,

Environmental Systems Research Institute (ESRI)

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................

Discussion

Consequences of Earth Observation Drop-off ....................................................
Priorities and Recommendations of Decadal Survey .........................................
Improvement of Weather Forecasts ....................................................................
Details of Decadal Survey Recommendations ....................................................
Addressing Emerging Regional and Global Challenges ....................................
Environmental Data and Ethanol Usage ...........................................................
Weather Prediction ..............................................................................................
Restoration of Dropped NPOESS Instruments ..................................................
Record of Hurricane and Cyclone Intensity .......................................................

(III)

9
10

10
11

12

13

13

13

15
17
26
27

28
29

36
39
55

56
57
58
60
61
62
63
64
66

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Need of Satellite System for Agricultural Production .......................................
Consequences of Gaps in Data Records ..............................................................
Physical Improvements vs. Environmental Improvements ..............................
Global Dimming ...................................................................................................
Remote Sensing and Earthquake Activity .........................................................
Potential for Private or International Partnerships in Remote Sensing .........
Impact on American Competitiveness ................................................................

Appendix:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Dr.  Richard  A.  Anthes,  President,  University  Corporation  for  Atmospheric
Research  (UCAR);  Co-Chair,  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Applications
from Space, National Research Council, The National Academies ..................
Dr. Berrien Moore III, University Distinguished Professor, Director, Institute
for  the  Study  of  Earth,  Oceans,  and  Space,  University  of  New  Hampshire;
Co-Chair,  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space,  Na-
tional Research Council, The National Academies ............................................
Honorable  James  Geringer,  Director  of  Policy  and  Public  Sector  Strategy,
Environmental Systems Research Institute (ESRI) ..........................................

Page
66
67
68
69
70
71
74

78

83

87

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

NATIONAL  IMPERATIVES  FOR  EARTH  AND
CLIMATE  SCIENCE  RESEARCH  AND  APPLI-
CATIONS  INVESTMENTS  OVER  THE  NEXT
DECADE

TUESDAY,  FEBRUARY  13,  2007

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:00  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Bart  Gordon
[Chairman of the Committee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

National Imperatives for Earth

and Climate Science Research and

Applications Investments Over

the Next Decade

TUESDAY, FEBRUARY 13, 2007

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

Purpose

On February 13, 2007 the Committee on Science and Technology will hold a hear-
ing to examine the findings and recommendations of the National Academies report
‘‘Earth Science and Applications from Space: National Imperatives for the Next Dec-
ade  and  Beyond,’’  also  known  as  the  Decadal  Survey.  The  report  recommends  a
prioritized  set  of  investments  in  new  satellite-borne  instruments  and  spacecraft  to
gather Earth, atmospheric, and climate data. These new satellites would replace our
aging space-based observing system to support national needs for research and mon-
itoring  of  the  dynamic  Earth  system  during  the  next  decade,  as  well  as  identifying
important  research  and  applications  directions  that  should  influence  planning  for
the following decade.

The  Decadal  Survey  panel  described  the  national  strategy  outlined  in  its  report
as having ‘‘as its overarching objective a program of scientific discovery and develop-
ment  of  applications  that  will  enhance  economic  competitiveness,  protect  life  and
property, and assist in the stewardship of the planet for this and future generations.’’
The  Committee  will  hear  testimony  from  three  witnesses.  Two  of  the  witnesses
were the co-chairs of the Decadal Survey, and they will discuss the findings and rec-
ommendations  of  their  report.  The  third  witness  will  discuss  the  application  of  re-
mote sensing data to meet agricultural, resource management, and other needs.
Background

Although  the  development  of  decadal  strategies  for  astronomy  and  astrophysics
research has been the practice since the 1980s, the report examined at this hearing
represents the first such decadal strategy to be developed for Earth science. The Na-
tional  Academies  of  Science  and  Engineering  was  asked  to  undertake  the  task  by
NASA’s Office of Earth Science, NOAA’s National Environmental Satellite Data and
Information  Service  (NESDIS),  and  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey  (USGS)  Geography
Division. The study was overseen by an 18-member executive committee and carried
out  be  seven  thematically  organized  panels  with  a  total  of  more  than  80  members.
The panels consisted of the following:

1. Earth Science Applications and Societal Needs
2. Land-use Change, Ecosystem Dynamics and Biodiversity
3. Weather (including space weather and chemical weather)
4. Climate Variability and Change
5. Water Resources and the Global Hydrologic Cycle
6. Human Health and Security
7. Solid-Earth Hazards, Resources and Dynamics

Major Findings and Recommendations of the Decadal Survey
Interim Report

The Decadal Survey panel issued an interim report in the spring of 2005, entitled
Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space:  Urgent  Needs  and  Opportunities  to
Serve the Nation. In that report, the panel made the following observations:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

‘‘The  current  U.S.  civilian  Earth  observing  system  centers  on  the  environmental
satellites operated by NOAA; the atmosphere-, biospheres-, ocean-, ice-, and land-
observation  satellites  of  NASA’s  Earth  Observing  System  (EOS);  and  the
Landsat  satellites,  which  are  operated  by  a  cooperative  arrangement  involving
NASA,  NOAA,  and  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey  (USGS).  Today,  this  system  of
environmental  satellites  is  at  risk  of  collapse.  Although  NOAA  plans  to  mod-
ernize  and  refresh  its  weather  satellites,  NASA  has  no  plan  to  replace  its  EOS
platforms  after  their  nominal  six-year  lifetimes  end  (beginning  with  the  Terra
satellite in 2005), and it has canceled, descoped, or delayed at least six planned
missions, including the Landsat Data Continuity Mission.
‘‘These decisions appear to be driven by a major shift in priorities at a time when
NASA  is  moving  to  implement  a  new  vision  for  space  exploration.  This  change
in  priorities  jeopardizes  NASA’s  ability  to  fulfill  its  obligations  in  other  impor-
tant presidential initiatives, such as the Climate Change Research Initiative and
the  subsequent  Climate  Change  Science  Program.  It  also  calls  into  question  fu-
ture U.S. leadership in the Global Earth Observing System of Systems, an inter-
national  effort  initiated  by  the  current  Administration.  The  Nation’s  ability  to
pursue  a  visionary  space  exploration  agenda  depends  critically  on  its  success  in
applying  knowledge  of  the  Earth  to  maintain  economic  growth  and  security  at
home.
‘‘Moreover, a substantial reduction in Earth observation programs today will re-
sult  in  a  loss  of  U.S.  scientific  and  technical  capacity,  which  will  decrease  the
competitiveness of the United States internationally for years to come. U.S. lead-
ership  in  science,  technology  development,  and  societal  applications  depends  on
sustaining competence across a broad range of disciplines that include the Earth
sciences.’’

Final Report

In January 2007, the National Academies released the final report of the Decadal
Survey panel. In the final report, the panel reiterated the concerns expressed in the
Interim  Report  about  the  Nation’s  system  of  environmental  satellites  being  ‘‘at  risk
of  collapse.’’  In  that  regard,  the  final  report  states:  ‘‘In  the  short  period  since  the
publication  of  the  Interim  Report,  budgetary  constraints  and  programmatic  difficul-
ties at NASA and NOAA have greatly exacerbated this concern. At a time of unprece-
dented  need,  the  Nation’s  Earth  observation  satellite  programs,  once  the  envy  of  the
world, are in disarray.’’

The  Decadal  Survey  panel  made  a  series  of  recommendations  in  its  report  to  ad-
dress  the  perceived  problems.  The  first  was  an  overarching  recommendation  that:
• The  U.S.  Government,  working  in  concert  with  the  private  sector,  aca-
deme, the public, and its international partners, should renew its invest-
ment  in  Earth  observing  systems  and  restore  its  leadership  in  Earth
science and applications.
Other major recommendations of the report are as follows:

• NASA  should  ensure  continuity  of  measurements  of  precipitation  and

land cover by:

Æ Launching  the  Global  Precipitation  Measurement  (GPM)  mission  in

or before 2012

Æ Securing a replacement to Landsat 7 data before 2012

The  Landsat  program  has  operated  for  over  30  years.  Landsat  images  are  used
by  governments,  the  research  community,  and  the  private  sector  in  a  wide  variety
of  applications  including  monitoring  of  crop  productivity,  documenting  changes  in
land  use,  water  management,  monitoring  and  tracking  ‘‘red’’  tides,  monitoring
changes  in  coastal  wetlands,  citing  power  and  transportation  routes,  monitoring
changes  in  glacial  features,  and  many  other  applications.  The  current  Landsat  in-
strument is in need of replacement. It is currently producing degraded imagery and
may not have many more years of functionality.
• In  addition  to  implementing  the  re-baselined  National  Polar-orbiting
Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System 
(NPOESS)  and  Geo-
stationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  (GOES)  program  and
completing research missions currently in development, NASA and NOAA
should  undertake  a  set  of  17  recommended  missions,  comprised  of  small
(<$300  million),  medium  ($300  million  to  $600  million),  and  large  ($600
million to $900 million) cost missions, and phased appropriately over the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

next  decade.  Larger  facility-class  (>$1  billion)  missions  are  not  rec-
ommended. [See Attachment 1 for list of recommended missions.]
NOAA  operates  two  satellite  systems  that  collect  data  for  weather  forecasting.
The  polar  satellites  orbit  the  Earth  and  provide  information  for  medium  to  long-
range weather forecasts. The geostationary satellites gather data above a fixed posi-
tion  on  the  Earth’s  surface  and  provide  information  for  short-range  warnings  and
current  weather  conditions.  Both  of  these  systems  are  scheduled  for  replacement
through the NPOESS and GOES–R programs, respectively.

Significant  cost  and  schedule  problems  have  arisen  in  the  NPOESS  program.  A
number  of  instruments  that  would  have  provided  continuity  of  our  current  Earth
and  climate  monitoring  programs  were  planned  to  fly  on  the  NPOESS  satellites
were eliminated from the program to reduce its cost and complexity.

The suite of 17 priority missions outlined by the NAS are intended to provide con-
tinuity  of  the  Earth  science  and  climate  data  sets  as  well  as  advance  our  under-
standing of the Earth system and climate.
• U.S.  civil  space  agencies  should  aggressively  pursue  technology  develop-
ment  that  supports  the  recommended  missions;  plan  for  transitions  to
continue  demonstrably  useful  research  observations  on  a  sustained,  or
operational, basis; and foster innovative new space-based concepts.
The  above  recommendation  includes  three  main  points:  NASA,  as  the  primary
space  research  and  development  agency  should  increase  funding  allotted  for  the
early design and testing phases of technology development that serves the research
and operational missions recommended in this NAS report. The Panel believes that
greater  investments  made  early  in  the  development  of  new  instrumentation  and
spacecraft will result in more robust designs and prototypes which then move to de-
velopment  and  deployment  on  a  smoother,  less  risky  path  (and  therefore  with  a
more predictable budget).

The Panel also recommends that NASA develop a new Program to take on newer,
more  risky  projects  and  demonstrate  their  feasibility  and  applicability  to  research
and  operational  needs.  The  NAS  recommends  this  program  focus  on  low-cost  mis-
sions  ($100–200  million)  and  that  it  have  a  strong  focus  on  technical  innovation  as
well  as  education  and  training  of  future  scientists  and  engineers  working  in  the
field of Earth and climate science.

Finally, the Panel recommended that NOAA allocate increased funding to support
the  transition  of  NASA-developed  satellites  and  spacecraft  that  are  identified  as
having operational utility to NOAA’s missions.

The  transition  from  research  to  operations  continues  to  be  a  problem  for  NOAA
because  there  are  no  funds  specified  for  the  transition  activities  that  must  occur  to
move research satellites and spacecraft to operational status. Consequently, procure-
ment  programs  for  operational  systems  now  often  carry  these  costs  resulting  in
higher risks of cost overruns, schedule slips, and higher risk of breaks in operational
data for weather forecasting.
• The NASA Science Mission Directorate should develop a science strategy
for obtaining long-term, continuous, stable observations of the Earth sys-
tem  that  are  distinct  from  observations  to  meet  requirements  by  NOAA
in support of numerical weather prediction.

• Earth  system  observations  should  be  accompanied  by  a  complementary
system  of  observations  of  human  activities  and  their  effects  on  Earth,
and  socioeconomic  factors  should  be  considered  in  the  planning  and  im-
plementation  of  Earth  observation  missions  and  in  developing  the  Earth
Information System.

• NOAA, working with the Climate Change Science Program and the inter-
national  Group  on  Earth  Observations,  should  create  a  climate  data  and
information system to meet the challenge of ensuring the production, dis-
tribution,  and  stewardship  of  high-accuracy  climate  records  from
NPOESS and other relevant observational platforms.

• As  new  Earth  observation  missions  are  developed,  there  must  also  be
early  attention  to  developing  the  requisite  data  processing  and  distribu-
tion  system,  and  data  archive.  Distribution  of  data  should  be  free  or  at
low cost to users, and provided in an easily-accessible manner.

• NASA  should  increase  support  of  its  Research  and  Analysis  (R&A)  pro-

gram to a level commensurate with its ongoing and planned missions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

Data  gathered  by  satellite-based  instruments  and  spacecraft  must  be  properly
documented,  analyzed  and  archived  to  be  useful.  Funding  for  these  activities  has
traditionally  lagged  behind  funding  for  the  hardware  and  software  needed  to  build,
launch  and  operate  satellite-based  instruments  and  spacecraft.  In  addition  to  R&A
cuts made as part of an overall budget-balancing exercise, cost-overruns experienced
in the development and procurement of an observing system may lead to cuts in the
funding allocated for analysis of the data generated by the observing system.
• NASA,  NOAA,  and  USGS  should  increase  their  support  for  Earth  system
modeling,  including  provision  of  high-performance  computing  facilities
and support for scientists working in the areas of modeling and data as-
similation.

• A  formal  interagency  planning  and  review  process  should  be  put  into
place  that  focuses  on  effectively  implementing  the  recommendations
made  in  the  present  decadal  survey  report  and  sustaining  and  building
the  knowledge  and  information  system  for  the  next  decade  and  beyond.
• NASA, NOAA, and USGS should pursue innovative approaches to educate
and  train  scientists  and  users  of  Earth  observations  and  applications.  A
particularly  important  role  is  to  assist  educators  in  inspiring  and  train-
ing  students  in  the  use  of  Earth  observations  and  the  information  de-
rived from them.

Witnesses
Dr.  Richard  Anthes,  President  of  the  University  Corporation  for  Atmos-
pheric Research (UCAR):

Dr. Anthes served as Co-Chair of the Decadal Survey. He has conducted research
directed  at  better  understanding  of  tropical  cyclones  and  mesoscale  meteorology,  as
well as on techniques for doing atmospheric sounding. He chaired the 2003 National
Academies  Committee  on  NASA–NOAA  Transition  of  Research  to  Operations.  Dr.
Anthes  is  a  fellow  of  the  American  Meteorological  Society  and  the  American  Geo-
physical Union.
Dr. Berrien Moore, Professor and Director of the Institute for the Study of
Earth, Oceans, and Space at the University of New Hampshire:

Dr.  Moore  served  as  Co-Chair  of  the  Decadal  Survey.  His  research  has  focused
on the carbon cycle, global biogeochemical cycles, and global change. Dr. Moore has
served  on  a  number  of  NASA  advisory  committees,  and  he  chaired  the  Scientific
Committee of the International Geosphere-Biosphere Programme (IGBP) from 1998–
2002. He currently serves on the Science Advisory Board of NOAA and the Advisory
Board of the National Center for Atmospheric Research (NCAR).

Dr. Anthes and Dr. Moore will discuss the criteria the Decadal Survey Committee
used to determine the priorities recommended in the Report. They will also discuss
the  utility  of  the  research  and  application  activities  to  the  Nation  and  the  inter-
national  community.  Dr.  Anthes  and  Dr.  Moore  will  also  provide  an  assessment  of
the  President’s  FY  2008  budget  request  for  NASA  and  NOAA  as  they  relate  to  the
recommendations included in the Decadal Survey Report.
Honorable  James  Geringer,  Director  of  Policy  at  the  Environmental  Sys-
tems Research Institute in Wyoming and former Governor of Wyoming:

Former  Wyoming  Governor  James  Geringer  has  been  active  in  the  Alliance  for
Earth  Observations  and  was  the  force  behind  the  Western  Governors  Association’s
call for a National Integrated Drought Information System (NIDIS).

Governor Geringer will discuss the utility of data derived from the current Earth
observing systems we have in place. He will discuss the applicability of remote sens-
ing data to agriculture, natural resource management, municipal water supply man-
agement,  and  to  tourism  and  recreation.  The  Governor  will  provide  information  re-
garding  the  accessibility  of  remote  sensing  data  to  different  user  communities  and
discuss the role of private sector companies that provide value-added products from
remote sensing data. He will also provide a perspective on how widely remote sens-
ing  data  are  used  by  government  and  industry  people  working  in  agriculture  and
natural resource management.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

Chairman  GORDON.  It  is  10  o’clock  and  time  to  get  started,  so
good  morning,  everyone.  I  would  like  to  welcome  our  witnesses  to
today’s hearing. We look forward to hearing your views.

As  you  know,  last  week  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee
held the first hearing in Congress on the just-released report of the
Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC).  That  hearing
provided a useful glimpse into the current scientific understanding
of climate change.

It is clear that the advances in our scientific understanding of cli-
mate  change  are  critically  dependent  on  the  data  collection  and
modeling enabled by our investments in Earth science research and
applications  at  NOAA  and  NASA.  In  addition,  those  investments
play  a  crucial  role  in  improving  the  accuracy  of  our  weather  fore-
casts, monitoring land use, and managing our natural resources.

In  short,  this  nation  needs  to  continue  to  invest  in  robust  sys-

tems of environmental satellites.

Two witnesses—or rather two years ago, one of today’s witnesses,
Dr.  Berrien  Moore,  stated  that  the  Interim  Report  of  the  National
Academies’ Decadal Survey had concluded that the Nation’s system
of  environmental  satellites  was,  and  I  quote,  ‘‘at  risk  of  collapse.’’
That was a sobering assessment.

Now the Decadal Survey is finished, and we will be hearing their

findings and recommendations today.

One  of  those  findings  is  particularly  troubling.  And  once  again,
I quote: ‘‘In the short period since the publication of the Interim Re-
port,  budgetary  constraints  and  programmatic  difficulties  at  NASA
have  greatly  exacerbated  this  concern.  At  a  time  of  unprecedented
need,  the  Nation’s  Earth  observation  satellite  programs,  once  the
envy of the world, are in disarray.’’

I  don’t  think  the  National  Academies  could  be  clearer  than  that
in voicing its concern. So at today’s hearing, I want to get answers
to the following questions.

When the Decadal Survey panel says that the Nation’s Earth ob-
servation satellite programs ‘‘are in disarray,’’ what does that mean
in specific terms?

What is the impact of that disarray, and why does it matter?
And, what needs to be done to fix this situation?
Of  course,  in  these  times  of  tight  budgets,  some  will  look  at  the
Academies’ recommendations and simply say, ‘‘We can’t afford to do
more  than  we  are  now.’’  However,  the  simple  fact  of  the  matter  is
that  our  nation  is  getting  ready  to  spend  a  lot  of  money  to  deal
with  climate  change  in  the  coming  years,  both  public  dollars  and
private dollars.

We  will  continue  to  need  good  data  to  make  sure  that  those  in-
vestments  are  wise  ones  and  that  we  are  getting  the  intended  re-
sults. I am worried that we are going to be ‘‘flying blind’’ if we don’t
ensure  that  the  Nation’s  environmental  satellite  system  is  up  to
the task of collecting critical climate science data, and the Decadal
Survey is sounding the alarm that unless we take steps to reverse
the current decline, we aren’t going to have the satellite system we
need in the coming decade.

And we have got a lot to discuss today, so I want to welcome our
witnesses,  and  now,  I  want  to  recognize  Ranking  Member  Hall  for
any opening remarks that he would like to make.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

[The prepared statement of Chairman Gordon follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BART GORDON

Good morning.
I’d like to welcome our witnesses to today’s hearing.
We look forward to hearing your views.
As  you  know,  last  week  the  Science  and  Technology  Committee  held  the  first
hearing  in  Congress  on  the  just-released  report  of  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on
Climate Change (IPCC).

That  hearing  provided  a  useful  glimpse  into  the  current  scientific  understanding

of climate change.

It  is  clear  that  advances  in  our  scientific  understanding  of  climate  change  are
critically dependent on the data collection and modeling enabled by our investments
in Earth science research and applications at NASA and NOAA.

In addition, those investments play a crucial role in improving the accuracy of our

weather forecasts, monitoring land use, and managing our natural resources.

In  short,  this  nation  needs  to  continue  to  invest  in  a  robust  system  of  environ-

mental satellites.

Two  years  ago,  one  of  today’s  witnesses,  Dr.  Berrien  Moore,  stated  that  the  In-
terim Report of the National Academies’ Decadal Survey had concluded that the Na-
tion’s system of environmental satellites was ‘‘at risk of collapse.’’

That was a sobering assessment.
Now  the  Decadal  Survey  is  finished,  and  we  will  be  hearing  their  findings  and

recommendations today.

One of those findings is particularly troubling.
Namely: ‘‘In the short period since the publication of the Interim Report, budgetary
constraints  and  programmatic  difficulties  at  NASA  have  greatly  exacerbated  this
concern.  At  a  time  of  unprecedented  need,  the  Nation’s  Earth  observation  satellite
programs, once the envy of the world, are in disarray.’’

I  don’t  think  the  National  Academies  could  be  any  clearer  than  that  in  voicing

its concern.

So at today’s hearing, I want to get answers to the following questions:

ellite programs ‘‘are in disarray,’’ what does that mean in specific terms?

• When the Decadal Survey panel says that the Nation’s Earth observation sat-
• What is the impact of that disarray, and why does it matter?
• And, what needs to be done to fix the situation?

Of  course,  in  these  times  of  tight  budgets,  some  will  look  at  the  Academies  rec-

ommendations and simply say ‘‘we can’t afford to do more than we are now.’’

However,  the  simple  fact  of  the  matter  is  that  the  Nation  is  getting  ready  to

spend a lot of money to deal with climate change in the coming years.

We will continue to need good data to make sure that those investments are wise

ones and that we are getting the intended results.

I’m worried that we are going to be ‘‘flying blind’’ if we don’t ensure that the Na-
tion’s  environmental  satellite  system  is  up  to  the  task  of  collecting  critical  climate
science data. . .and the Decadal Survey is sounding the alarm that unless we take
steps to reverse the current decline, we aren’t going to have the satellite system we
will need in the coming decade.

Well, we have a lot to discuss today.
I  again  want  to  welcome  our  witnesses,  and  I  now  want  to  recognize  Ranking

Member Hall for any opening remarks he would care to make.

Mr. HALL. Mr. Chairman, I want to thank you for calling today’s
hearing to examine the recently released Decadal Survey on Earth
Sciences,  produced  by  the  National  Academies.  This  report,  which
provides strategic advice to the government on the scope and goals
of future Earth-observing missions, especially those flown by NASA
and NOAA, will need great help to guide the federal investment de-
cisions now and in the years ahead of us.

I  want  to  begin  by  thanking  Dr.  Anthes  and  Dr.  Moore  and  all
your  colleagues  that  served  with  you  on  the  National  Academies
committee.  Drafting  the  first  ever  of  such  a  report  could  not  have
been  easy,  but  I  am  certain  that  the  community  is  stronger,  and
I  thank  you  for  it,  and  perhaps  more  cohesive  as  a  result.  And  I

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

hope  you  will  tell  your  friends  and  colleagues  that  we  are  grateful
for their very hard work.

Governor  Geringer,  thank  you  for  taking  time  from  your  very
busy schedule today to describe how remote sensing data and prod-
ucts  are  used  by  industry  and  government.  I  want  to  add,  par-
enthetically,  that  in  my  State  of  Texas  and  for  many  residents  in
the  western  states,  monitoring  and  measuring  drought  conditions
is rapidly gaining importance.

During  the  last  Congress,  I  was  able  to  work  with  my  friends
here in the House to draft and pass a bill establishing the National
Integrated  Drought  Information  System,  and  I  am  glad  that  the
President agreed to sign it into law. But having said that, to many
in this room, weather forecasting products are about all we under-
stand.  Governor—we  look  forward  to  your  testimony,  and  those  of
you  who  ran  your  governments  about  the  numerous  other  applica-
tions of remote sensing information.

Beyond articulating the science questions and missions, the Sur-
vey  challenges  the  government  to  reassess  the  amount  of  funding
dedicated to Earth science. It urges government to increase invest-
ment  in  NASA’s  Earth  sciences  program  by  $500  million  a  year,
about a 33 percent increase over current levels.

This  presents  the  Administration  and  Congress  with  a  tremen-
dous  challenge.  It  is  no  mystery  to  everyone  in  this  room  that
NASA  is  struggling  to  afford  its  current  slate  of  programs,  from
human space flight to aeronautics, astrophysics, planetary sciences,
and  redirecting  funding  from  any  of  these  activities  is  not  an  op-
tion.  We  need  all  of  them.  Either  NASA  maintains  the  status  quo
with,  perhaps,  marginal  adjustments  in  content  to  its  Earth
sciences  program  or  its  top-line  funding  should  be  increased.  And
I strongly prefer the latter. I think that is what we have to do. We
have to increase these fundings.

The report also recommends new missions for NOAA that would
total $565 million over the next 10 years. I hope the witnesses will
help  us  understand  what  weather  forecasting  improvements  these
missions  would  provide  and  why  the  Decadal  Survey  recommends
them.

In  closing,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  do  want  to  be  clear.  I  support  the
Decadal  Survey  and  its  recommendations.  It  lays  out  a  course  of
research that should be followed. It raises questions that are of im-
mediate importance to our way of living, and, if truly implemented,
it will provide planning tools that will help future generations mon-
itor  and  mitigate  the  effect  of  changes  to  Earth’s  weather  system.
Unfortunately, in the current budget climate, I fear we cannot fully
implement the recommendations. And in that vein, I intend to ask
hard questions today about which of the recommendations and mis-
sions are most important.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  and  yield  back  the

balance of my time.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hall follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RALPH M. HALL

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  calling  today’s  hearing  to  examine  the  recently  re-
leased Decadal Survey on Earth Sciences produced by the National Academies. This
report,  which  provides  strategic  advice  to  the  government  on  the  scope  and  goals

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

of future Earth observing missions, especially those flown by NASA and NOAA, will
be help guide federal investment decisions now and in the years to come.

I  want  to  begin  by  thanking  Dr.  Anthes  and  Dr.  Moore,  and  all  your  colleagues
that  served  with  you  on  the  National  Academies  committee.  Drafting  the  first-ever
such  report  could  not  have  been  easy,  but  I  am  certain  the  community  is  stronger,
and  perhaps  more  cohesive  as  a  result,  and  I  hope  you’ll  tell  your  friends  and  col-
leagues that we are grateful for their hard work.

Governor Geringer, thank you for taking time from your busy schedule to be with
us  today  to  describe  how  remote  sensing  data  and  products  are  used  by  industry
and  government.  I  want  to  add,  parenthetically,  that  in  my  State  of  Texas,  and  for
many residents in the western states, monitoring and measuring drought conditions
is rapidly gaining importance. During the last Congress I was able to work with my
friends  here  in  the  House  to  draft  and  pass  a  bill  establishing  the  National  Inte-
grated  Drought  Information  System,  and  I’m  glad  the  President  agreed  to  sign  it
into law.

But  having  said  that,  to  many  in  this  room,  weather  forecasting  products  are
about all we understand. Governor, we look forward to your testimony about the nu-
merous other applications of remote sensing information.

flight 

Beyond  articulating  the  science  questions  and  missions,  the  survey  challenges
government  to  reassess  the  amount  of  funding  dedicated  to  Earth  science.  It  urges
government to increase investment in NASA’s Earth Sciences program by $500 mil-
lion  a  year,  about  a  33  percent  increase  over  current  levels.  This  presents  the  Ad-
ministration and Congress with a tremendous challenge. It’s no mystery to everyone
in  this  room  that  NASA  is  struggling  to  afford  its  current  slate  of  programs,  from
human  space 
to  aeronautics,  astrophysics,  planetary  sciences,  and
heliophysics.  Redirecting  funding  from  any  of  these  activities  is  not  an  option.  Ei-
ther NASA maintains the status quo, with perhaps marginal adjustments in content
to its Earth Sciences program, or its top-line funding should be increased. I strongly
prefer the latter.

The  report  also  recommends  new  missions  for  NOAA  that  would  total  $565  mil-
lion  over  the  next  ten  years.  I  hope  the  witnesses  will  help  us  understand  what
weather  forecasting  improvements  these  missions  would  provide  and  why  the
Decadal Survey recommends them.

In  closing,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  do  want  to  be  clear;  I  support  the  Decadal  Survey
and  its  recommendations.  It  lays  out  a  course  of  research  that  should  be  followed.
It  raises  questions  that  are  of  immediate  importance  to  our  way  of  living,  and  if
fully  implemented,  it  will  provide  planning  tools  that  will  help  future  generations
monitor,  and  mitigate  the  effects  of  changes  to  Earth’s  weather  systems.  Unfortu-
nately,  in  the  current  budget  climate  I  fear  we  cannot  fully  implement  the  rec-
ommendations  and  in  that  vein  I  intend  to  ask  hard  questions  today  about  which
of the recommendations and missions are most important.

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  and  yield  back  the  balance  of  my

time.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Mr. Hall.
I  ask  unanimous  consent  that  all  additional  opening  statements
be  submitted  by  the  Committee  Members  to  be  included  in  the
record. Without Mr. Sensenbrenner’s objection, so ordered.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Costello follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE JERRY F. COSTELLO

Good  Morning.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman  for  calling  this  hearing  to  examine  the
findings and recommendations of the National Academies report ‘‘Earth Science and
Applications  from  Space:  National  Imperatives  for  the  Next  Decade  and  Beyond,’’
also known as the Decadal Survey.

Today’s  report  represents  the  first  decadal  strategy  developed  for  Earth  Science.
The  Survey  Panel  has  made  a  series  of  recommendations  to  address  the  perceived
problems regarding our nation’s system of environmental satellites. I am aware that
budgetary  constraints  and  programmatic  difficulties  at  the  National  Aeronautics
and  Space  Administration  (NASA)  and  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Ad-
ministration  (NOAA)  have  contributed  to  the  degradation  of  our  Earth  observation
programs, specifically the NOAA satellites for data collection and forecasting.

I recognize that our nation’s ability to pursue a visionary space exploration agen-
da  depends  on  its  success  in  applying  greater  knowledge  of  the  Earth  and  I  look
forward  to  hearing  the  panel’s  recommendations.  Further,  I  am  interested  in  hear-
ing the witnesses’ thoughts on how the U.S. Government should proceed with fund-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

ing  for  Earth  Science  and  Climate  Science  Research  for  the  upcoming  fiscal  year
and beyond.

I look forward to the testimony of today’s witnesses.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Mitchell follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE HARRY E. MITCHELL

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Last  week,  we  heard  from  some  of  the  world’s  top  scientists  about  the  growing
threat of global warming who reported to this committee some of the important find-
ings of the International Panel on Climate Change.

I  think  many  of  us  were  concerned  about  what  they  had  to  say,  and  troubled  by
the  scientific  data  that  demonstrates  the  threat  of  global  warming  and  climate
change isn’t simply a threat—it’s happening all across the world.

I  got  a  sense  from  my  colleagues  at  that  hearing  that  many  in  this  Congress  on
both  sides  of  the  aisle  believe  that  the  United  States  has  an  important  and  unique
role to play in solving the climate crisis.

The  United  States  is  a  world  leader  in  scientific  discovery  and  innovation,  and  I
think that most of the American people would agree that we should use our unique
spirit and ingenuity for good.

We  have  especially  succeeded  when  it  comes  to  space  exploration.  We  put  a  man
on the Moon, have discovered so much about our galaxy, and the universe. We have
worked with the international community to build a space station.

Yet  not  all  of  the  important  things  we  have  discovered  are  about  space.  We  have

also learned about ourselves, and the planet Earth.

NASA and NOAA satellites have been instrumental in monitoring so many things
about  the  Earth.  Everything  from  temperatures  and  wind  patterns  to  changes  in
land, ocean tides, and glacial features—and so much more.

The  Earth  observation  systems  we  use  are  critical  to  enhancing  our  under-
standing  of  the  planet,  and  critical  to  understanding  how  global  warming  is  affect-
ing all of us.

The Decadal Survey report that these observation systems are at ‘‘the risk of col-
lapse’’  and  are  in  ‘‘disarray’’  is  unacceptable.  The  report  makes  clear  that  the  state
of  these  systems  is  because  of  ‘‘major  shift  in  priorities’’  by  the  Administration.  If
that’s the case, it’s time for new priorities.

I’m  encouraged  by  the  recommendations  of  the  Decadal  Survey  panel  that  we
should invest in the technology that will grow our ability to make further scientific
discoveries, and I look forward to hearing their testimony today.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ehlers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE VERNON J. EHLERS

It  takes  a  tenacious  group  of  people  to  scrutinize  our  Earth  observational  chal-
lenges  and  to  make  recommendations  on  what  we  might  do  to  ensure  we  are  able
to improve our forecasting and observational capabilities. I am pleased the members
of  the  Decadal  Survey  committee  were  up  to  the  task.  The  findings  of  the  report
are  a  wake-up  call  and  will  help  scientists  and  policy-makers  consider  future  mis-
sions  flown  by  NASA  and  NOAA  in  addition  to  understanding  the  consequences  of
gaps in our observational capabilities.

I am especially concerned about the future capabilities of the National Polar-orbit-
ing  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS)  and  am  glad  that  the
Decadal  Survey  Committee  has  not  endorsed  many  of  the  proposed  cost-cutting
measures  to  limit  the  escalating  costs  of  the  program.  I  realize  NPOESS  has  been
plagued by cost-overruns, but I believe we have to carefully weigh the long-term im-
pact of removing NPOESS sensors on our global environmental monitoring capabili-
ties.  NPOESS  oversight  will  continue  by  this  committee  and  we  welcome  your  sur-
vey’s wisdom in determining the most strategic future for the program.

Finally,  coherent  integration  is  imperative  in  successful  observation,  and  I  look
forward to learning more about how we can ensure that the consumers of Earth ob-
servation information can use this data. I thank our witnesses for being here today
and look forward to their testimony.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Neugebauer follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE RANDY NEUGEBAUER

Mr. Chairman:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

Thank you for holding this hearing. I welcome the opportunity to take part in this
important  discussion  and  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  distinguished  panelists.
As we discovered from the hearing last week, climate change is an extremely im-
portant issue, yet controversial at the same time. While most of us agree that global
warming  is  occurring,  there  are  disputes  regarding  the  cause  and  degree  of  this
change. Part of this disagreement stems from the evolving nature of science.

Science  is  a  process  of  constant  re-evaluation  of  old  hypotheses  and  theories,  col-
lection  of  new  data,  and  continuous  development  of  new  models  and  approaches  to
critical questions. In order to properly understand climate change, it is critical that
we have access to accurate data and technology. Therefore, I look forward to hearing
the expert testimonies and recommendations of the panelists regarding the satellite
technology  we  need  to  continue  to  gather  accurate  Earth,  atmospheric,  and  climate
data.

For  many  years  the  U.S.  has  led  the  world  when  it  comes  to  space  exploration
and scientific development. I look forward to working with my colleagues in this re-
gard  to  ensure  that  the  U.S.  will  continue  to  be  a  global  leader  of  research,  tech-
nology, and innovation.

We  in  Congress,  and  in  this  committee  especially,  are  called  upon  to  make  sci-
entific and environmental policy that will affect our economy; our security; and our
general  welfare;  and  not  just  for  us,  but  for  future  generations  of  Americans,  as
well.

Thank you.
Chairman GORDON. We are fortunate to have three distinguished
witnesses  at  today’s  hearing.  I  will  now  yield  to  Representative
Udall to introduce the first witness.

Mr. UDALL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. Good morning.
It  is  my  privilege  to  introduce  Dr.  Richard  Anthes  today.  He  is
the  President  of  the  University  Corporation  for  Atmospheric  Re-
search,  otherwise  known  as  UCAR,  a  non-profit  consortium  of  70
member universities that award Ph.D.s in atmospheric and related
sciences.  He  is  the  co-chair  of  the  National  Research  Council’s
Earth Science Decadal Survey. Dr. Anthes is a highly-regarded at-
mospheric  scientist,  author,  educator,  and  administrator  who  has
contributed  considerable  research  to  the  field.  He  has  published
over  100  peer-reviewed  articles  and  books  and  participated  on  or
chaired  over  400—excuse  me,  40  different  U.S./national  commit-
tees. Dr. Anthes is currently President of the American Meteorolog-
ical  Society.  His  many  research  contributions  involve  particularly
the areas of tropical cyclones and mezoscale meteorology, including
the  development  of  the  first  successful  three-dimensional  model  of
the  tropical  cyclone,  which  evolved  into  one  of  the  world’s  most
widely  used  mezoscale  models,  the  Penn  State  NCAR  Mezoscale
Model, which is now in its fifth generation.

Welcome, Dr. Anthes.
Dr.  ANTHES.  Thank  you  very  much,  Congressman  Udall.  I  don’t
think  I  have  ever  been  introduced  by  a  Congressman  before,  and
that saves me 30 seconds of my five minutes.

I would like to start out with——
Chairman  GORDON.  If  you  don’t  mind,  sir,  let  us  go  ahead,  and

we will recognize the other witnesses——

Dr. ANTHES. Oh, okay.
Chairman  GORDON.—and  then  we  will  begin  with  you.  But  you

are correct, you were well introduced there.

Our  second  witness  is  Dr.  Berrien  Moore,  who  is  the  other  co-
chair  of  the  National  Academies’  Decadal  Survey.  Dr.  Moore  is  a
Professor  and  Director  of  the  Institute  for  the  Studies  of  Earth,
Oceans, and Space at the University of New Hampshire. Welcome.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

Our  third  witness  is  former  Wyoming  Governor,  Dr.  Jim—I
mean,  rather  Jim  Geringer.  Governor  Geringer  has  been  very  ac-
tive  in  the  Alliance  for  Earth  Observations,  and  he  was  the  force
behind the Western Governors Association call for a National Inte-
grated Drought Information System.

I  want  to  welcome  each  of  you  and  look  forward  to  your  testi-

mony.

You  will  each  be  given  five  minutes  for  your  spoken  testimony.
Your written testimony will be included in the record for the hear-
ing.  With  my  friend,  Mr.  Rohrabacher’s  indulgence,  I  will  say  that
we will try to be liberal with your five minutes, because this is very
important, and we want to hear from you.

When  all  three  of  you  have  completed  your  testimony,  we  will
begin with questions. Each Member will have five minutes to ques-
tion the panel.

Doctor, we will begin with you.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  RICHARD  A.  ANTHES,  PRESIDENT,  UNI-
VERSITY  CORPORATION  FOR  ATMOSPHERIC  RESEARCH
(UCAR); CO-CHAIR, COMMITTEE ON EARTH SCIENCE AND AP-
PLICATIONS  FROM  SPACE,  NATIONAL  RESEARCH  COUNCIL,
THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES
Dr. ANTHES. Okay. Thank you very much.
Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Minority  Member,  and  Members  of  the

Committee, thanks for inviting us here to testify here today.

I would like—this is one of my favorite rooms in the whole world,
because of that—the statement, ‘‘Where there is no vision, the peo-
ple  perish,’’  from  Proverbs  29:18.  I  think  that  is  what  we  need  to
keep our eye on, not the individual observations, not the individual
dollars, but we really do need a vision for Earth science and appli-
cations from space. And I just love that saying. It is a perfect lead
in.

Our  vision  from  our  Decadal  Survey  is  carried  over,  actually,
from  the  Interim  Report.  And  I  want  to  read  it  to  you.  I  think  it
is  very  important.  I  believe  in  it  deeply.  ‘‘Understanding  the  com-
plex,  changing  planet  on  which  we  live,  how  it  supports  life,  and
how human activities affect its ability to do so in the future is one
of  the  greatest  intellectual  challenges  facing  humanity.  It  is  also
one  of  the  most  important  challenges  for  society  as  it  seeks  to
achieve prosperity, health, and sustainability.’’

So  this  is  the  dual  message,  the  dual  vision  of  our  report,  that
understanding  the  Earth  is  one  of  the  most  exciting  intellectual
challenges  we  can  think  of.  And  it  is  also  critically  important  for
applications of immediate and long-term benefit to humanity.

As  detailed  in  our  report  and  further  emphasized  by  the  latest
issue of the IPCC, which came out a couple weeks ago, our society
is  faced  with  a  number  of  profound  scientific  and  societal  chal-
lenges,  including  climate  change  and  all  of  the  aspects  of  the  cli-
mate  change  that  is  occurring  at  an  unprecedented  rate.  And  yet,
at a time when the need has never been greater, we are faced with
an  Earth  observation  program  that  will  dramatically  diminish  in
capability over the next five to ten years.

As you mentioned already, our Interim Report said that the sys-
tem  of  U.S.  environmental  satellites  was  at  risk  of  collapse.  This

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

judgment was based on the observed precipitous decline in funding
and the consequent cancellation, descoping, and delay of a number
of critical missions and instruments.

Otherwise,  let  me  interject  here  and  deviate  from  my  prepared

talk a little bit.

This  is  not  primarily  about  money  and  decreasing  budgets.  It  is
primarily about doing the job that needs to be done for society, and
the  modest  investments  that  are  required  will  repay  themselves
many times over. So please focus on the benefits to society, the in-
tellectual challenges, and what we are proposing as a balanced sys-
tem rather than the declining budgets.

So  I  have  been  asked,  you  know,  what  will  we  lose  if  we  don’t
do  what  the  Decadal  Survey  mentions.  And  I  think  my  colleague,
Dr.  Moore,  will  give  you  some  examples,  but  let  me  just  give  you
some examples that are not really in the Survey.

Weather  forecasts  and  warnings  may  start  becoming  less  accu-
rate.  We  have  seen  a  tremendous  run-up  of  increased  accuracy  in
weather forecasting and warnings over the last 30 years, primarily
because  of  Earth  observations  from  space.  The  Hurricane  Katrina
forecast  was  incredibly  accurate,  saving,  perhaps,  100,000  lives,
one of the few bright spots in that whole tragic episode. But we are
actually  in  danger,  if  the  observations  continue  to  decrease,  of  los-
ing  that  improving  weather  forecasts  and  warning  capabilities.
Very serious.

The Earth is warming because of a small imbalance in radiation
between  the  sun  and  the  Earth,  a  very  small  difference  between
two very large terms. What is coming in from the sun, a huge num-
ber and what is going back out to space. We need to measure that
small imbalance very accurately. We need to measure what is com-
ing  in  from  the  sun  and  what  is  going  out  from  the  Earth  so  that
we  know  whether  the  Earth  is  going  to  warm  up  faster,  whether
it  is  going  to  slow  down  in  its  warming  up,  and  finally,  when  we
reach  a  new  equilibrium  and  there  is  no  more  change.  Climate
models have improved steadily over the past years, but they are far
from  perfect.  They  don’t  do  very  well  on  regional  scales,  which  is
what  we  are  really  interested  in.  Is  the  dryness  in  the  west  going
to continue? Are hurricanes going to become more frequent or more
intense? Those kinds of things. So we need the observations to im-
prove  the  climate  models.  We  could  never  rely  on  models  without
observations.

Sea  levels  are  rising,  and  the  ice  around  the  Earth  is  melting.
But how fast? Is this going to accelerate—these things going to ac-
celerate  or  decelerate,  slow  down?  We  have  got  to  measure  sea
level and the ice around the Earth, especially in Greenland.

As I mentioned, there is controversy about whether the frequency
and  intensity  of  tropical  storms  or  hurricanes  is  going  to  increase
or  decrease.  We  simply  don’t  know.  And  without  observations,  we
won’t be able to resolve that critical issue.

And finally, Earth science is built fundamentally on observations,
not  theory  and  not  models.  And  it  will—it  is  impossible  for  me  to
sit here and predict what discoveries won’t be made in the next 20
years if we don’t have observation. I can’t do that, but I can surely
say  that  if  the  present  trend  of  decreasing  observations  continues,
we will—the rate of scientific progress will be greatly slowed.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

So  the  plan  we  recommend  calls  for  undertaking  17  new  NASA
and NOAA missions from the period 2008 to 2020 as well as restor-
ing some of the capabilities lost on NPOESS and GOESS.

Our  recommendations  for  NASA  can  be  implemented  in  a  cost-
effective  manner.  I  think  my  colleague,  Dr.  Moore,  will  talk  about
this.  We  are  merely—to  do  the  required  program,  and  again,  the
required  program  is  what  is  important,  not  the  money,  we  need  to
simply restore the NASA Earth sciences budget to what it was five
years ago.

Finally, implementing these missions will not only greatly reduce
the  risks  to  the  people  of  our  country  in  the  world  of  natural  haz-
ards of all kinds, it will support more efficient management of nat-
ural  resources,  including  water,  energy,  fisheries,  ecosystems  that
support  the  economy  and  our  lives  and—so  that  the  cost  of  this
program is repaid many times over.

Thank  you  very  much  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you

today, and I look forward to any questions that you might have.

Thank you.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Anthes follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICHARD A. ANTHES

Mr. Chairman, Ranking Minority Member, and Members of the Committee: thank
you for inviting me here to testify today. My name is Richard Anthes, and I am the
President  of  the  University  Corporation  for  Atmospheric  Research,  a  consortium  of
70  research  universities  that  manages  the  National  Center  for  Atmospheric  Re-
search,  on  behalf  of  the  National  Science  Foundation,  and  additional  scientific  edu-
cation, training and support programs. I am also the current President of the Amer-
ican  Meteorological  Society.  I  appear  today  in  my  capacity  as  Co-Chair  of  the  Na-
tional Research Council (NRC)’s Committee on Earth Science and Applications from
Space: A Community Assessment and Strategy for the Future.

The  National  Research  Council  is  the  unit  of  the  National  Academies  that  is  re-
sponsible  for  organizing  independent  advisory  studies  for  the  Federal  Government
on  science  and  technology.  In  response  to  requests  from  NASA,  NOAA,  and  the
USGS, the NRC has recently completed a ‘‘decadal survey’’ of Earth science and ap-
plications  from  space.  (‘‘Decadal  surveys’’  are  the  10-year  prioritized  roadmaps  that
the NRC has done for 40 years for the astronomers; this is the first time it is being
done  for  Earth  science  and  applications  from  space.)  Among  the  key  tasks  in  the
charge to the decadal survey committee were to:

• Develop  a  consensus  of  the  top-level  scientific  questions  that  should  provide
the focus for Earth and environmental observations in the period 2005–2020;
and
• Develop a prioritized list of recommended space programs, missions, and sup-

porting activities to address these questions.

The  NRC  survey  committee  has  prepared  an  extensive  report  in  response  to  this
charge,  which  I  am  pleased  to  be  able  to  summarize  here  today.  Over  100  leaders
in  the  Earth  science  community  participated  on  the  survey  steering  committee  or
its seven study panels. It is noteworthy that this was the first Earth science decadal
survey,  and  the  committee  and  panel  members  did  an  excellent  job  in  fulfilling  the
charge and establishing a consensus—a task many previously considered impossible.
A copy of the full report has also been provided for your use.

The committee’s vision is encapsulated in the following declaration, first stated in

the committee’s interim report, published in 2005:

‘‘Understanding the complex, changing planet on which we live, how it supports
life,  and  how  human  activities  affect  its  ability  to  do  so  in  the  future  is  one  of
the  greatest  intellectual  challenges  facing  humanity.  It  is  also  one  of  the  most
important  challenges  for  society  as  it  seeks  to  achieve  prosperity,  health,  and
sustainability.’’

As  detailed  in  the  committee’s  final  report,  and  as  we  were  profoundly  reminded
by  the  latest  report  from  the  International  Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC),  the
world  faces  significant  and  profound  environmental  challenges:  shortages  of  clean

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

and  accessible  freshwater,  degradation  of  terrestrial  and  aquatic  ecosystems,  in-
creases in soil erosion, changes in the chemistry of the atmosphere, declines in fish-
eries, and above all the rapid pace of substantial changes in climate. These changes
are  not  isolated;  they  interact  with  each  other  and  with  natural  variability  in  com-
plex  ways  that  cascade  through  the  environment  across  local,  regional,  and  global
scales.  Addressing  these  societal  challenges  requires  that  we  confront  key  scientific
questions related to ice sheets and sea level change, large-scale and persistent shifts
in  precipitation  and  water  availability,  transcontinental  air  pollution,  shifts  in  eco-
system  structure  and  function  in  response  to  climate  change,  impacts  of  climate
change  on  human  health,  and  occurrence  of  extreme  events,  such  as  hurricanes,
floods and droughts, heat waves, earthquakes, and volcanic eruptions.

Yet  at  a  time  when  the  need  has  never  been  greater,  we  are  faced  with
an Earth observation program that will dramatically diminish in capability
over the next 5–10 years.

Last April, my co-chair, Dr. Berrien Moore, came before Congress to testify in re-
sponse to release of the committee’s 2005 interim report. His testimony highlighted
the  key  roles  played  by  NASA  and  NOAA  over  the  past  30  years  in  advancing  our
understanding  of  the  Earth  system  and  in  providing  a  variety  of  societal  benefits
through  their  international  leadership  in  Earth  observing  systems  from  space.  He
noted  that  while  NOAA  had  plans  to  modernize  and  refresh  its  weather  satellites,
NASA  had  no  plans  to  replace  its  Earth  Observing  System  platforms  after  their
nominal six year lifetimes end. He also noted that NASA had canceled, scaled back,
or  delayed  at  least  six  planned  missions,  including  a  Landsat  continuity  mission.
This led to the main finding in the interim report, which stated ‘‘this system of envi-
ronmental satellites is at risk of collapse.’’

Since  the  publication  of  the  interim  report,  the  Hydros  and  Deep  Space  Climate
Observatory  missions  were  canceled;  the  flagship  Global  Precipitation  Mission  was
delayed for another two and a half years; significant cuts were made to NASA’s Re-
search  and  Analysis  program:  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  mission  was  de-
layed for a year and a half; a key atmospheric profiling sensor planned for the next
generation  of  NOAA  geostationary  satellites  was  canceled;  and  the  NPOESS  pro-
gram  breached  the  Nunn-McCurdy  budget  cap.  As  you  have  all  heard,  the  certified
NPOESS  program  delays  the  first  launch  by  three  years,  eliminates  two  of  the
planned six spacecraft, and de-manifests or de-scopes a number of instruments, with
particular  consequences  for  measurement  of  the  forcing  and  feedbacks  that  need  to
be measured to understand the magnitude, pace, and consequences of global and re-
gional climate change. It is against this backdrop that I discuss the present report.
As you will see in the report, between 2006 and the end of the decade, the number
of  operating  missions  will  decrease  dramatically  and  the  number  of  operating  sen-
sors  and  instruments  on  NASA  spacecraft,  most  of  which  are  well  past  their  nomi-
nal lifetimes, will decrease by some 35 percent, with a 50 percent reduction by 2015
(see  Figure  1  below).  Substantial  loss  of  capability  is  likely  over  the  next  several
years  due  to  a  combination  of  decreased  budgets  and  aging  satellites  already  well
past  their  design  lifetimes.  This  will  result  in  an  overall  degradation  of  the
system  of  Earth  observing  satellites,  with  the  following  potential  con-
sequences:

• After decades of steady improvement, weather forecasts, including those of se-
vere  weather  such  as  hurricanes,  may  start  becoming  less  accurate,  putting
more  people  at  risk  and  diminishing  the  proven  economic  value  of  accurate
forecasts.

• The  ozone  hole  in  the  stratosphere  has  apparently  reached  its  maximum  in-
tensity. Models predict it will start to slowly recover. Without observations we
may not be able to verify its recovery or explain why it is occurring.

• Earth is warming because of a small imbalance between incoming solar radi-
ation  and  outgoing  radiation  from  Earth.  Measuring  this  small  imbalance  is
critical to determining how fast Earth is warming and when the warming will
stop.  Without  the  measurements  we  are  recommending  will  not  be  able  to
quantify how this net energy imbalance is changing.

• Climate  models  have  improved  steadily  over  the  years,  but  are  far  from  per-
fect. We need observations of the Earth system, the atmosphere, oceans, land
and ice to verify and improve the climate models. These models have real im-
pact  on  the  U.S.  economy,  in  predicting  El  Nin˜ o  and  other  seasonal  fluctua-
tions  in  climate,  which  are  used  in  energy,  water  and  agriculture  manage-
ment.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

• Sea  level  is  rising  and  ice  around  the  world  is  melting,  yet  there  is  uncer-
tainty  in  how  fast  these  are  occurring  and  whether  or  not  they  are  accel-
erating  or  decelerating.  Without  the  observations  we  are  recommending,  we
will  be  unable  to  know  for  sure  how  these  rates  are  changing  and  what  the
implications will be for coastal communities.
• There is controversy about whether the frequency and intensity of hurricanes
are  increasing  as  the  climate  warms;  observations  of  the  atmosphere  and
oceans are required to resolve this important issue.
• The  risk  of  missing  early  detection  of  earthquakes,  tsunamis,  and  volcanic
• Air  quality  forecasts,  which  require  the  global  perspectives  of  satellites  to
identify  pollution  transport  across  borders,  will  become  less  accurate,  with
negative  implications  for  both  human  health  and  urban  pollution  manage-
ment efforts.
• Earth  science  is  based  fundamentally  on  observations.  While  it  is  impossible
to predict what scientific advances will not occur without the observations, or
what  surprises  (like  the  ozone  hole)  we  will  miss,  we  can  be  sure  the  rate  of
scientific progress will be greatly slowed without a robust set of Earth obser-
vations.

eruptions will increase.

In  its  report,  the  committee  sets  forth  a  series  of  near-term  and  longer-term  rec-
ommendations  in  order  to  address  these  troubling  trends.  It  is  important  to  note
that  this  report  does  not  ‘‘shoot  for  the  Moon,’’  and  indeed  the  committee  exercised
considerable  constraint  in  its  recommendations,  which  were  carefully  considered
within  the  context  of  challenging  budget  situations.  Yet,  while  societal  applications
have  grown  ever-more  dependent  upon  our  Earth  observing  fleet,  the  NASA  Earth
science budget has declined some 30 percent in constant-year dollars since 2000 (see
Figure  2  below).  This  disparity  between  growing  societal  needs  and  diminished  re-
sources  must  be  corrected.  This  leads  to  the  report’s  overarching  recommendation:
‘‘The  U.S.  Government,  working  in  concert  with  the  private  sector,  academe,  the
public,  and  its  international  partners,  should  renew  its  investment  in  Earth  ob-
serving systems and restore its leadership in Earth science and applications.’’

The report outlines near-term actions meant to stem the tide of capability deterio-
ration  and  continue  critical  data  records,  as  well  as  forward-looking  recommenda-
tions to establish a balanced Earth observation program designed to directly address
the  most  urgent  societal  challenges  facing  our  nation  and  the  world  (see  Figure  3
below for an example of how nine of our recommended missions support in a syner-
gistic  way  one  of  the  societal  benefit  areas—extreme  event  warnings).  It  is  impor-
tant  to  recognize  that  these  two  sets  of  recommendations  are  not  an  ‘‘either/or’’  set
of  priorities.  Both  near-term  actions  and  longer-term  commitments  are  required  to
stem  the  tide  of  capability  deterioration,  continue  critical  climate  data  records,  and
establish  a  balanced  Earth  observation  program  designed  to  directly  address  the
most  urgent  societal  challenges  facing  our  nation  and  the  world.  It  is  important  to
‘‘right  the  ship’’  for  Earth  science,  and  we  simply  cannot  let  the  current  challenges
we  face  with  NPOESS  and  other  troubled  programs  stop  progress  on  all  other
fronts.  Implementation  of  the  ‘‘stop-gap’’  recommendations  concerning  NPOESS,
NPP,  and  GOES–R  are  important—and  the  recommendations  for  establishing  a
healthy  program  going  forward  are  equally  as  important.  Satisfying  near-term  rec-
ommendations  without  placing  due  emphasis  on  the  forward-looking  program  is  to
ignore  the  largest  fraction  of  work  that  has  gone  into  this  report.  Moreover,  such
a  strategy  would  result  in  a  further  loss  of  U.S.  scientific  and  technical  capacity,
which  could  decrease  the  competitiveness  of  the  United  States  internationally  for
years to come.

Key elements of the recommended program include:

1. Restoration  of  certain  measurement  capabilities  to  the  NPP,  NPOESS,  and

GOES–R spacecraft in order to ensure continuity of critical data sets.

2. Completion of the existing planned program that was used as a baseline as-
sumption for this survey. This includes (but is not limited to) launch of GPM
in or before 2012, securing a replacement to Landsat 7 data before 2012.

3. A  prioritized  set  of  17  missions  to  be  carried  out  by  NOAA  and  NASA  over
the  next  decade  (see  Tables  1  and  2  below).  This  set  of  missions  provides  a
sound  foundation  for  Earth  science  and  its  associated  societal  benefits  well
beyond  2020.  The  committee  believes  strongly  that  these  missions  form  a
minimal,  yet  robust,  observational  component  of  an  Earth  information  sys-
tem that is capable of addressing a broad range of societal needs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

4. A technology development program at NASA with funding comparable to and
in addition to its basic technology program to make sure the necessary tech-
nologies  are  ready  when  needed  to  support  mission  starts  over  the  coming
decade.

5. A new ‘‘Venture’’ class of low-cost research and application missions that can
establish  entirely  new  research  avenues  or  demonstrate  key  application-ori-
ented  measurements,  helping  with  the  development  of  innovative  ideas  and
technologies.  Priority  would  be  given  to  cost-effective,  innovative  missions
rather than ones with excessive scientific and technological requirements.

6. A robust NASA Research and Analysis program, which is necessary to maxi-
mize  scientific  return  on  NASA  investments  in  Earth  science.  Because  the
R&A programs are carried out largely through the Nation’s research univer-
sities, such programs are also of great importance in supporting and training
next generation Earth science researchers.

7. Sub-orbital  and  land-based  measurements  and  socio-demographic  studies  in

order to supplement and complement satellite data.

8. A  comprehensive  information  system  to  meet  the  challenge  of  production,
distribution,  and  stewardship  of  observational  data  and  climate  records.  To
ensure  the  recommended  observations  will  benefit  society,  the  mission  pro-
gram  must  be  accompanied  by  efforts  to  translate  raw  observational  data
into  useful  information  through  modeling,  data  assimilation,  and  research
and analysis.

Further, the committee is particularly concerned with the lack of clear agency re-
sponsibility  for  sustained  research  programs  and  the  transitioning  of  proof-of-con-
cept  measurements  into  sustained  measurement  systems.  To  address  societal  and
research needs, both the quality and the continuity of the measurement record must
be  assured  through  the  transition  of  short-term,  exploratory  capabilities,  into  sus-
tained observing systems. The elimination of the requirements for climate research-
related  measurements  on  NPOESS  is  only  the  most  recent  example  of  the  Nation’s
failure to sustain critical measurements. Therefore, our committee recommends that
the Office of Science and Technology Policy, in collaboration with the relevant agen-
cies,  and  in  consultation  with  the  scientific  community,  should  develop  and  imple-
ment  a  plan  for  achieving  and  sustaining  global  Earth  observations.  This  plan
should recognize the complexity of differing agency roles, responsibilities, and capa-
bilities  as  well  as  the  lessons  from  implementation  of  the  Landsat,  EOS,  and
NPOESS programs.

Mr.  Chairman,  the  observing  system  we  envision  will  help  establish  a  firm  and
sustainable  foundation  for  Earth  science  and  associated  societal  benefits  through
the year 2020 and beyond. It can be achieved through effective management of tech-
nology  advances  and  international  partnerships,  and  broad  use  of  satellite  science
data  by  the  research  and  decision-making  communities.  Our  report  recommends  a
path  forward  that  restores  U.S.  leadership  in  Earth  science  and  applications  and
averts  the  potential  collapse  of  the  system  of  environmental  satellites.  As  docu-
mented in our report, this can be accomplished in a fiscally responsible manner, and
I urge the committee to see that it is accomplished.

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today.  I  am  prepared  to  an-

swer any questions that you may have.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Supporting Tables and Graphics

21

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

BIOGRAPHY FOR RICHARD A. ANTHES

Since  1988  Dr.  Richard  Anthes  has  been  President  of  the  University  Corporation
for  Atmospheric  Research  (UCAR).  He  is  a  highly  regarded  atmospheric  scientist,
author,  educator  and  administrator  who  has  contributed  considerable  research  to
the  field.  UCAR  is  a  non-profit  consortium  of  70  member  universities  that  award
Ph.D.s in atmospheric and related sciences. UCAR manages the National Center for
Atmospheric  Research,  in  addition  to  collaborating  with  many  international  mete-
orological institutions.

Dr.  Anthes  has  published  over  100  peer-reviewed  articles  and  books  and  partici-
pated  on  or  chaired  over  40  different  U.S.  national  committees.  His  many  research
contributions in the areas of tropical cyclones and mesoscale meteorology include the
development  of  the  first  successful  three-dimensional  model  of  the  tropical  cyclone
which evolved into one of the world’s most widely used mesoscale models, the Penn
State-NCAR mesoscale model, now in its fifth generation (MM5). In recent years he
became  interested  in  the  radio  occultation  technique  for  sounding  Earth’s  atmos-
phere  and  was  a  key  player  in  the  highly  successful  proof-of-concept  GPS/MET  ex-
periment. This grew into an internationally sponsored project called COSMIC (Con-
stellation  Observing  System  for  Meteorology,  Ionosphere  and  Climate)  which  re-
cently launched a globe-spanning constellation of six satellites, expected to improve
weather forecasts, monitor climate change, and enhance space weather research.

Dr.  Anthes  has  also  received  numerous  awards  for  his  sustained  contributions  to
the  atmospheric  sciences.  In  October  2003  he  was  awarded  the  Friendship  Award
by  the  Chinese  government,  the  most  prestigious  award  given  to  foreigners,  for  his
contributions  over  the  years  to  atmospheric  science  and  weather  forecasting  in
China.  He  is  Co-Chair  of  the  National  Research  Council’s  Committee  on  Earth
Science and Applications from Space: National Imperatives for the Next Decade and
Beyond.  Dr.  Anthes  is  currently  President  of  the  American  Meteorological  Society.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

Chairman GORDON. Thank you. Right on time.
Dr. Moore.

STATEMENT OF DR. BERRIEN MOORE III, UNIVERSITY DISTIN-
GUISHED  PROFESSOR,  DIRECTOR,  INSTITUTE  FOR  THE
STUDY  OF  EARTH,  OCEANS,  AND  SPACE,  UNIVERSITY  OF
NEW  HAMPSHIRE;  CO-CHAIR,  COMMITTEE  ON  EARTH
SCIENCE  AND  APPLICATIONS  FROM  SPACE,  NATIONAL  RE-
SEARCH COUNCIL, THE NATIONAL ACADEMIES
Dr.  MOORE.  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Minority
Member,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  inviting—for
inviting me to testify today.

I  would  like  to  repeat  what  my  colleague,  Rick  Anthes,  said.  At
a  time  when  the  need  has  never  been  greater,  we  are  faced  with
an  Earth  observation  program  that  will  dramatically  diminish  in
capability over the next five to ten years.

Now we can ask, ‘‘Why did this occur?’’ Simply stated, the NASA
Earth  science  budget  declined,  in  real  terms,  by  a  third  from  the
year 2000 to now. And as you well know, technical and managerial
difficulties in the NPOESS program offset the budget increases for
NOAA’s planned satellites over the same period. And regardless of
where  or  whether  blame  is  placed,  we  are  still  in  the  same  situa-
tion. That is where we are.

The  Survey  set  forth  a  strategy  for  a  strong,  balanced  national
program  in  Earth  science  to  reverse  this  trend.  It  recommends,  as
Rick said, that the Nation commit to leadership in Earth’s observa-
tions  in  part  through  implementing  a  series  of  17  missions  care-
fully  chosen  to  augment  and  replace  our  aging  satellite  fleet.  The
set of recommended 15 new missions to NASA may seem large nu-
merically, but we believe that through focusing on smaller missions
and  avoiding  large,  multi-instrumented  platforms,  a  robust  strat-
egy for the future of Earth science can be achieved with reasonable
investments.  As  Rick  Anthes  just  said,  the  program  could  be  re-
stored if we could just simply get back to the year 2000 levels.

I would like to call attention to what happened. It is in my writ-
ten  testimony.  To  show  this  33  percent  decline  in  real  terms  from
2000 to the present.

What about the future?
Is  the  President’s  fiscal  year  2008  budget  adequately  preparing

us for the future?

In short, no.
The President’s budget provides only a brief respite to a dramati-
cally  diminished  observational  system.  The  respite,  lasting  until
2010,  does  allow  us  to  move  forward  with  plans  to  measure  global
rainfall,  the  Global  Precipitation  Mission,  and  general  land  cover
characteristics  to  the  Landsat,  but  by  2012,  the  budget  will  leave
NASA’s Earth science with nearly 50 percent less buying power in
comparison to the year 2000 and unable to pursue the critical top-
ics  just  described  by  my  colleague.  The  fall  by  2012  will  put  us  at
a 20-year low in real terms for Earth science.

NOAA’s  budget  also  appears  to  be  inadequate  to  solve  the  cost
of growth within the NPOESS and GOES–R programs and to miti-
gate some of the NPOESS losses by reinstating the solar and Earth
radiation  measurements,  which,  as  Rick  just  said,  are  central  to

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

the  climate  system.  Reinstating  the  high-resolution  measurements
of  the  atmospheric  ozone  profiles,  a  key  measurement  to  allow  to
understand  the  post-CFC  era,  and  realizing  an  operational  active
radar-based measurement of sea surface winds.

Can  anything  be  done  now  about  the  Committee’s  recommenda-

tions for the next decade?

Definitely, yes.
For  instance,  the  Survey  presented  a  set  of  guidelines  for  man-
aging  the  implementation  of  the  new  missions  that  included  early
investments  in  technologies.  This  is  an  opportunity  for  the  new
decade,  starting  now.  NASA  should  consider  investing  $10  million
per  year  per  mission  across  the  first  half  of  the  15  missions.  That
takes an investment of $70 million. With that investment, we could
actually begin to implement the Decadal Survey right now.

It  would  also  send  a  message  that  we  are  proceeding  to  develop
the  needed  and  recommended  Earth  observing  program.  These  in-
vestments  would  avoid  technological  surprises  that  have  plagued
other  programs.  And  I  think  that,  in  itself,  is  a  reason  to  go  for-
ward with that kind of technology-based building.

Now how can we justify increasing resources in this time of par-

ticularly difficult budget issues, as Congressman Hall noted?

I  believe  it  is  because  of  the  benefits:  more  reliable  forecasts  of
infectious diseases; the identification of active faults and the moni-
toring  of  crustal  movements  to  improve  building  code  designs  in
earthquake-prone regions; better weather forecasts, particularly for
severe storms; climate predictions based on better understanding of
carbon  sources  and  sinks,  ocean  temperature,  ice  sheet  volume
changes,  and,  as  we  have  noted,  the  inputs  from  the  sun  and  the
thermal response of the Earth; enhanced precipitation and drought
forecasts to improve water quality management and water resource
management;  and  improved  land-use  agriculture  to  ocean  produc-
tivity forecasts for better planning harvest cycles; and finally, more
reliable  air  quality  forecasts  to  enable  effective  urban  pollution
management  and  to  protect  the  elderly  and  other  populations  at
risk.

Thank you very much, and I will be happy to answer any further

questions.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Moore follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BERRIEN MOORE III

Mr. Chairman, Ranking Minority Member, and Members of the Committee: thank
you  for  inviting  me  here  to  testify  today.  My  name  is  Berrien  Moore,  and  I  am  a
Professor  of  systems  research  at  the  University  of  New  Hampshire  and  Director  of
the  Institute  for  the  Study  of  Earth,  Oceans,  and  Space.  I  appear  today,  like  Dr.
Anthes, in my capacity as Co-Chair of the National Research Council (NRC)’s Com-
mittee on Earth Science and Applications from Space.

As  you  know,  the  NRC  is  the  unit  of  the  National  Academies  that  is  responsible
for  organizing  independent  advisory  studies  for  the  Federal  Government  on  science
and  technology.  The  NRC  has  been  conducting  decadal  strategy  surveys  in  astron-
omy for four decades, but this is the first decadal survey in Earth science and appli-
cations from space.

On March 2, 2006, I testified before this committee at a hearing entitled, NASA’s
Science  Mission  Directorate:  Impacts  of  the  Fiscal  Year  2007  Budget  Proposal.  At
that hearing, I showed the table below, which is taken from the 2005 Interim Report

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

of  our  study.  This  table  shows  the  effects  of  the  FY  ’06  budget.1 I  then  discussed
my concerns about the proposed cuts in the FY ’07 budget, especially the continuing
reductions in funding for Research and Analysis, which I believed was having a very
negative effect on a program already pared to the bone.

Since  my  appearance,  there  have  been  further  cancellations  and  delays  of  NASA
missions  and  dramatic  and  deleterious  changes  in  plans  for  the  next  generation  of
NOAA  meteorological  satellites,  especially  regarding  their  capability  to  support  the
needs for prediction, assessment, and mitigation of the effects of climate change.

With this as background, I will now turn to the questions posed to me in advance

of this hearing.
1. How  did  the  Decadal  Survey  committee  determine  the  priorities  that  it
recommended  the  Nation  pursue  in  Earth  and  climate  science  research
and applications?
As  noted  in  testimony  of  my  co-chair,  Dr.  Richard  Anthes,  the  Decadal  Survey’s
vision,  which  was  first  expressed  in  the  committee’s  2005  Interim  Report,2 is  for  a
program  of  Earth  science  research  and  applications  in  support  of  society.  The
present  report  reaffirms  this  vision,  the  fulfillment  of  which  requires  a  national
commitment to a program of Earth observations from space in which practical bene-
fits to humankind play an equal role with the quest to acquire new knowledge about
the Earth.

The  Interim  Report  described  how  satellite  observations  have  been  critical  to  sci-
entific efforts to understand the Earth as a system of connected components, includ-
ing the land, oceans, atmosphere, biosphere, and solid-Earth. It also gave examples
of how these observations have served the Nation, helping to save lives and protect
property,  strengthening  national  security,  and  contributing  to  the  growth  of  our

1 Note  that  the  Glory  mission  was  subsequently  restored.  The  latest  plan  for  LDCM  is  to  im-

plement the mission as a free-flyer.

2 National  Research  Council,  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space:  Urgent  Needs  and

Opportunities to Serve the Nation, The National Academies Press, Washington, D.C., 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

economy3 through  provision  of  timely  environmental  information.  However,  the  In-
terim Report also identified a substantial risk to the continued availability of these
observations,  warning  that  the  Nation’s  system  of  environmental  satellites  was  ‘‘at
risk of collapse.’’ As noted above, in the short period since the publication of the In-
terim  Report,  budgetary  constraints  and  programmatic  difficulties  at  NASA  and
NOAA have greatly exacerbated this concern. At a time of unprecedented need, the
Nation’s Earth observation satellite programs, once the envy of the world, are in dis-
array.

The  decadal  survey  was  led  by  an  Executive  Committee  that  drew  on  the  work

of seven thematically-organized study panels:4

1. Earth science applications and societal needs.
2. Land-use change, ecosystem dynamics, and biodiversity.
3. Weather (including space weather5 and chemical weather6 ).
4. Climate variability and change.
5. Water resources and the global hydrologic cycle.
6. Human health and security.
7. Solid-Earth hazards, resources, and dynamics.

As  described  in  Chapter  2  of  our  final  report,  each  of  the  panels  used  a  common
template in establishing priority lists of proposed missions (see Table 1 below). The
potential  to  deliver  tangible  benefits  to  society  was  an  overriding  consideration  for
panel deliberations.

Because  execution  of  even  a  small  portion  of  the  missions  on  the  panels’  short
lists  was  not  considered  affordable,  panels  worked  with  each  other  and  with  mem-
bers  of  the  Executive  Committee  to  pare  the  number  of  missions;  they  also  devel-
oped  synergistic  mission  ‘‘rollups’’  that  would  maximize  science  and  application  re-
turns across the panels while keeping within a more affordable budget. Frequently,
the  recommended  missions  represented  a  compromise  in  an  instrument  or  space-
craft  characteristic  (including  orbit)  between  what  two  or  more  panels  would  have
recommended individually without a budget constraint.

All  the  recommendations  offered  by  the  panels  would  merit  support—indeed,  the
panels’  short  lists  of  recommendations  were  distilled  from  the  over  100  responses
that we received in response to a request for mission concepts, as well as other sub-
missions—but  the  Executive  Committee  took  as  its  charge  the  provision  of  a  strat-
egy  for  a  strong,  balanced  national  program  in  Earth  science  for  the  next  decade
that  could  be  carried  out  with  what  are  thought  to  be  realistic  resources.  Difficult
choices  were  inevitable,  but  the  recommendations  presented  in  this  report  reflect
the committee’s best judgment, informed by the work of the panels and discussions
with the scientific community, about which programs are most important for devel-
oping and sustaining the Earth science enterprise.

The  recommended  NASA  program  can  be  accomplished  by  restoring  the  Earth

science budget in real terms to the levels of the late 1990s.

3 It  has  been  estimated  that  one  third  of  the  $10  trillion  U.S.  economy  is  weather-sensitive
or  environment-sensitive  (NRC,  Satellite  Observations  of  the  Earth’s  Environment:  Accelerating
the  Transition  of  Research  to  Operations,  The  National  Academies  Press,  Washington,  D.C.,
2003).

4 The Panel Chairs were members of the Executive committee.
5 The  term  space  weather  refers  to  conditions  on  the  Sun  and  in  the  solar  wind,
magnetosphere,  ionosphere,  and  thermosphere  that  can  influence  the  performance  and  reli-
ability  of  space-borne  and  ground-based  technological  systems  and  that  can  affect  human  life
and health.

6 There  is  no  single  definition  of  chemical  weather,  but  the  term  refers  to  the  state  of  the  at-
mosphere  as  described  by  its  chemical  composition,  particularly  important  variable  trace  con-
stituents such as ozone, oxides of nitrogen, and carbon monoxide. Chemical weather has a direct
impact in a number of areas of interest for this study, especially air quality and human health.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

2. What  are  the  practical  benefits  of  the  research  and  applications  activi-

ties that your Decadal Survey recommended?
Our report presents a vision for the Earth science program; an analysis of the ex-
isting Earth observing system and recommendations to help restore its capabilities;
an  assessment  of  and  recommendations  for  new  observations  and  missions  needed
for  the  next  decade;  an  examination  of  and  recommendations  concerning  effective
application of those observations; and an analysis of how best to sustain that obser-
vation and applications system. A critical element of the study’s vision is its empha-
sis  on  the  need  to  place  the  benefits  to  society  that  can  be  provided  by  an  effective
Earth observation system on a par with scientific advancement.

The integrated suite of space missions and supporting and complementary activi-
ties  that  are  described  in  our  report  will  support  the  development  of  numerous  ap-
plications  of  high  importance  to  society.  Expected  benefits  of  the  fully-implemented
program include:

• Human Health

More  reliable  forecasts  of  infectious  and  vector-borne  disease  outbreaks  for
disease control and response.
• Earthquake Early Warning

Identification  of  active  faults  and  prediction  of  the  likelihood  of  earthquakes
to  enable  effective  investment  in  structural  improvements,  inform  land-use
decisions, and provide early warning of impending earthquakes.

• Weather Prediction

Longer-term, more reliable weather forecasts.

• Sea Level Rise

Climate predictions based on better understanding of ocean temperature and
ice sheet volume changes and feedback to enable effective coastal community
planning.

• Climate Prediction

Robust  estimates  of  primary  climate  forcings  for  improved  climate  forecasts,
including  local  predictions  of  the  effects  of  climate  change;  determination  in
time and space of sources and sinks of carbon dioxide.

• Freshwater Availability

More accurate and longer-term precipitation and drought forecasts to improve
water resource management.

• Ecosystem Services

• Air Quality

More  reliable  land-use,  agricultural,  and  ocean  productivity  forecasts  to  im-
prove planting and harvesting schedules and fisheries management.

More reliable air quality forecasts to enable effective urban pollution manage-
ment.

• Extreme Storm Warnings

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

Longer-term,  more  reliable  storm  track  forecasts  and  intensification  pre-
dictions to enable effective evacuation planning.

3. How consistent is the President’s FY 2008 budget request for NASA and

NOAA with the recommendations of the Decadal Survey Committee?
It  is  important  to  note  we  were,  of  course,  not  privy  to  the  details  of  the  Presi-
dent’s fiscal year 2008 budget, which was developed prior to the release of our final
report.  The  NRC  report  is  a  forward-looking  document  and  therefore  focuses  pri-
marily on the new missions; whereas, the Interim Report dealt with the difficulties
and  challenges  of  the  Earth  observing  programs  at  NASA  and  NOAA,  as  they  ex-
isted in early 2005.

Let  me  address  first  the  President’s  FY  ’08  budget  request  for  NASA  Earth
science.  It  is  a  mixture  of  some  good  news  and  bad  news.  The  primary  good  news
is  the  small  bottom  line  increases  for  2008  and  2009.  These  increases  address  the
needs  of  currently  planned  missions  already  in  development,  the  completion  of
which is consistent with the decadal survey’s baseline set of assumptions.

Unfortunately,  the  out-year  budgets  reveal  fundamental  flaws  in  the  budget  and
NASA’s  Earth  science  plans—the  budgets  are  totally  inadequate  to  accomplish  the
decadal survey’s recommendations.

In  2010,  the  Earth  science  budget  begins  to  decline  again  and  reaches  a  20-year
low,  in  real  terms,  in  2012.  This  decline  reflects  that  the  2008  budget  contains  no
provision for new missions, nor does it allow us to address the significant challenges
facing our planet. The 2008 budget also ignores our repeatedly stated concern about
declines  in  the  Research  and  Analysis  portion  of  the  Earth  science  budget.  The  In-
terim  Report  raised  this  concern  about  the  FY  2006  budget  and  the  importance  of
a  robust  Research  and  Analysis  program  is  reaffirmed  in  the  final  report,  but  re-
grettably,  the  FY  08  budget  for  R&A  is  13  percent  below  the  FY  ’06  budget  in  real
terms. These disturbing broad trends are captured in Figure 1.

Before turning to NOAA, I want to emphasize that the problems in the out-years
appear to be due entirely to the lack of adequate resources. In fact, at a NASA town-
hall meeting that followed the release of our report on January 15, 2007 at the 2007
annual  meeting  of  the  American  Meteorological  Society,  the  head  of  NASA’s  Earth
Science  program  stated  that  the  recommendations  in  our  report  provided  the  road-
map for the Earth Science program we should have.

The NOAA NESDIS budget picture is also a mixture of some good and bad news.
In  this  case,  the  budget  takes  a  small  downturn  in  FY08,  followed  by  significant

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

growth  in  FY09–FY10,  before  turning  down  again  in  FY11  (Figure  2).  It  remains
to be seen whether this ∼$200 M/year growth in FY09 and FY10 can enable restora-
tion  of  some  of  the  lost  capabilities  to  NPOESS  and  GOES–R.  There  appears  to  be
no  budgetary  wedge  for  new  starts.  Finally,  for  a  variety  of  reasons,  the  NOAA
NESDIS  budget  is  far  from  transparent,  especially  in  the  out-years,  and  the  level
of  detail  that  is  readily  available  makes  it  difficult  to  respond  adequately  to  Com-
mittee’s question.

4. What  will  be  the  impact  if  present  trends  in  Earth  and  climate  science

research and applications investments continue?
As  detailed  in  our  report  and  as  summarized  by  my  co-chair,  between  2006  and
the end of the decade, the number of operating U.S. missions will decrease dramati-
cally  and  the  number  of  operating  sensors  and  instruments  on  NASA  spacecraft,
most  of  which  are  well  past  their  nominal  lifetimes,  may  decrease  by  some  35  per-
cent.  If  present  trends  continue,  reductions  of  some  50  percent  reduction  are  pos-
sible by 2015.

Were  this  to  pass,  we  would  have  chosen,  in  effect,  to  partially  blind  ourselves
at a time of increasing need to monitor, predict, and develop responses to numerous
global environmental challenges. Vital climate records, such as the measurement of
solar  irradiance  and  the  Earth’s  response,  will  be  placed  in  jeopardy  or  lost.  Meas-
urements of aerosols, ozone profiles, sea surface height, sources and sinks of impor-
tant  greenhouse  gases,  patterns  of  air  and  coastal  pollution,  and  even  winds  in  the
atmosphere are among the numerous critical measurements that are at risk or sim-
ply  will  not  occur  if  we  follow  the  path  of  the  President  2008  budget  and  the  pro-
posed out-year run out.

Taking  this  path,  we  will  also  forgo  the  economic  benefits  that  would  have  come,
for  example,  from  better  management  of  energy  and  water,  and  improved  weather
predictions.7 Again,  as  my  co-chair  notes  in  his  comments  and  testimony,  without

7 In a typical hurricane season, NOAA’s forecasts, warnings, and the associated emergency re-
sponses result in a $3 billion savings. Two-thirds of this savings, $2 billion, is attributed to the
reduction  in  hurricane-related  deaths,  and  one-third  of  this  savings,  $1  billion,  is  attributed  to
a  reduction  in  property-related  damage  because  of  preparedness  actions.  Advances  in  satellite
information,  data  assimilation  techniques,  and  more  powerful  computers  to  run  more  sophisti-
cated  numerical  models,  have  lead  to  more  accurate  weather  forecasts  and  warnings.  Today,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

action  on  the  report’s  recommendations,  a  decades-long  improvements  in  the  skill
in  which  we  make  weather  forecasts  will  stall,  or  even  reverse;  this  may  be  accom-
panied  by  diminished  capacity  to  forecast  severe  weather  events  and  manage  dis-
aster response and relief efforts. The Nation’s capabilities to forecast space weather
will also be at risk, with impacts on commercial aviation and space technology.8

The  world  is  facing  significant  environmental  challenges:  shortages  of  clean  and
accessible  freshwater,  degradation  of  terrestrial  and  aquatic  ecosystems,  increases
in  soil  erosion,  changes  in  the  chemistry  of  the  atmosphere,  declines  in  fisheries,
and  the  likelihood  of  significant  changes  in  climate.  These  changes  are  occurring
over and above the stresses imposed by the natural variability of a dynamic planet,
as  well  as  the  effects  of  past  and  existing  patterns  of  conflict,  poverty,  disease,  and
malnutrition. Further, these changes interact with each other and with natural var-
iability  in  complex  ways  that  cascade  through  the  environment  across  local,  re-
gional,  and  global  scales.  In  summary,  absent  a  reversal  of  the  present  trends  for
Earth observation capabilities, we see the following:

• Weather forecasts: After decades of steady improvement, weather forecasts,
including  those  of  severe  weather  such  as  hurricanes,  may  become  less  accu-
rate,  putting  more  people  at  risk  and  diminishing  the  proven  economic  value
of accurate forecasts.

• Earthquakes,  tsunamis,  landslides,  and  volcanic  eruptions:  We  risk
missing  early  detection  of  these  and  other  hazards.  We  also  lose  our  ability
to  assess  damage  and  mitigate  the  loss  of  further  human  life  once  they  have
occurred. Satellite monitoring of volcanic plumes, for example, has a very real
impact on air traffic control.

• Water  resources:  We  lose  many  of  the  needed  observations  to  monitor  the
health  of  our  water  storage  reservoirs,  and  predict  droughts  with  sufficient
time to mitigate their impact.

• Oceans:  Sea  level  is  rising  and  ice  around  the  world  is  melting,  yet  there  is
uncertainty in how fast these are occurring and whether or not they are accel-
erating  or  decelerating.  We  will  become  less  able  address  these  issues,  and
assess their implications for our coastal communities.

• Climate: We  are  losing  critical  observations  of  the  Earth  system,  the  atmos-
phere, oceans, land, and ice needed to verify and improve the climate models.
These models will be increasingly important to the U.S. economy because they
best capture the likely patterns of future climate change and variability.

• Ecosystems: We lose the ability to assess the health of our forests, wetlands,
coastal regions, fisheries, and farmlands and to determine the impact and ef-
fectiveness of regulations designed to protect our food supply.

• Health:  Land-use,  land  cover,  oceans,  weather,  climate,  and  atmospheric  in-
formation  observations,  now  used  by  public  health  officials  to  determine  the
effects  of  infectious  diseases,  skin  cancers,  chronic  and  acute  illnesses  result-
ing from contamination of air, food, and water are all at risk. As an example,
air  quality  forecasts,  which  use  the  global  perspective  of  satellites  to  identify
pollution  transport  across  borders,  will  become  less  accurate,  with  negative
implications for both human health and urban pollution management efforts.
I  would  like  to  thank  the  Committee  for  inviting  me  to  testify,  and  I  would  be

delighted to answer any further questions.

Chairman GORDON. Governor.

NOAA’s  five-day  hurricane  forecasts,  which  utilize  satellite  data,  are  as  accurate  as  its  three-
day forecasts were 10 years ago. The additional advanced notice has a significant positive effect
on many sectors of our economy. See statement and references therein of Edward Morris, Direc-
tor,  Office  of  Space  Commercialization,  NOAA,  Hearing  on  Space  and  U.S.  National  Power,
Committee  on  Armed  Services  Subcommittee  on  Strategic  Forces,  U.S.  House  of  Representa-
tives, June 21, 2006. Available at: http://www.legislative.noaa.gov/Testimony/morris062106.pdf

8 Ibid.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

STATEMENT  OF  HONORABLE  JAMES  GERINGER,  DIRECTOR
OF  POLICY  AND  PUBLIC  SECTOR  STRATEGY,  ENVIRON-
MENTAL SYSTEMS RESEARCH INSTITUTE (ESRI)
Mr. GERINGER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Members of the Com-
mittee,  Ranking  Member  Hall.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be
with you today.

I  am  Jim  Geringer.  As  you  have  introduced  me,  I  am  with  the
Environmental  Systems  Research  Institute,  a  leader  in  geospatial
information  systems.  I  served  as  Governor  of  Wyoming.  I  also  rep-
resent the Alliance for Earth Observations, which is a group of peo-
ple  who  are  interested  in  an  observation  system  of  a  totally  inte-
grated type that includes academia, non-profits, non-governmental,
as well as industrial members.

My  past  includes  time  as  an  ag-producer,  a  farmer.  I  have  used
Earth observation information for several years and also worked on
the  unmanned  space  program,  launching,  among  other  things,  a
Global Positioning Satellite system that we knew as NABSTAR, at
the time.

I deeply appreciate what Dr. Moore and Dr. Anthes have put to-
gether  through  their  committee.  I  serve  on  the  Mapping  Science
Committee also under the National Research Council. I am not as-
sociated with their activity, but I very well understand the quality
and  breadth  of  reports  that  just—don’t  just  happen.  It  takes  a  lot
of effort.

My  role  here,  I  believe,  is  to  speak  from  the  practical  point  of
view, those who have to do something with the information. For all
of the college degrees that there might be, the Bachelors, the Mas-
ters,  and  the  Ph.D.s,  I  think  mine  is  more  relevant  as  the  BT,  the
‘‘been there’’ degree.

As  a  former  governor  and  ag-producer,  my  staff  used  to  say,  ‘‘It

doesn’t take a rocket scientist to be governor, but it helps.’’

One  example  I  would  give  is  what  Congressman  Hall  already
brought  up,  the  National  Integrated  Drought  Information  System.
My  part  of  the  Rocky  Mountain  west  is  still  suffering  from  a  sig-
nificant drought. I know that we would certainly like to balance out
what New York is getting right now.

Drought can last long and extend across larger areas than hurri-
canes,  tornadoes,  floods,  earthquakes,  and  it  causes  hundreds  of
millions  of  dollars  in  losses,  and  it  certainly  dashes  our  hopes  and
dreams. And when the 19 western governors got together and said,
‘‘We would like to support the use of satellite and other observation
information to lessen droughts’ impact on our region,’’ we requested
the NIDIS system, as it is called, because rather than spending bil-
lions of dollars, federal dollars, in particular, on drought assistance
after the fact, we would rather spend more on avoidance before the
fact.

The strongest case for NIDIS and then extending on through the
broader  Earth  observation  activities  is  to  enable  risk  management
by  individuals  to  make  better  judgment  and  policy  decisions  by
business, by government, and shifting from our practice of reaction
and restitution to one of prediction and mitigation.

The Decadal Survey goes far beyond just climate change. It high-
lights many other Earth science areas of practical benefit. Looking
at  what  is  happening  with  increased  populations  located  in  high-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

risk zones, such as earthquake faults or near sea coasts, the short-
age  of  clean  and  accessible  freshwater,  the  shortage  of  water,  as  a
commodity,  will  be  the  dominate  issue  from  here  forward,  human
health  and  security,  degradation  of  both  terrestrial  and  aquatic
ecosystems,  soil  erosion,  invasive  species,  and  certainly  our  oppor-
tunity  to  do  disaster—better  disaster  management.  So  all  of  those
are  even  beyond  the  climate  change  issues  that  have  already  been
raised.

There  is  also  a  concern  that  I  would  bring  to  you  that  the  lack
of access to and the relevance of remotely-sensed data frustrates a
lot  of  users.  We  need  to  devote  more  time  asking  the  users  what
they  need  and  help  them  find  it.  Many  times  it  is  available.  They
just  don’t  know  it  is  there.  We  need  a  streamlined  process  for  ac-
cessing  remotely-sensed  data  by  the  public,  policy-makers,  edu-
cational communities, as well as industry.

In  terms  of  three  broad  areas  of  recommendation  I  would  bring
to you, based on the Decadal Survey. Number one, enable the best
possible  personal  and  policy  decisions,  the  best  information  for  all
kinds of people, providing our citizens with information, technology,
and tools to monitor and respond in their own way to our changing
world, protecting their lives, livelihood, and property. Number two,
provide an Integrated Earth Observation System, otherwise known
as  IEOS,  to  assure  U.S.  competitiveness.  Our  American  competi-
tiveness is slipping without the projects and the missions described
by  the  two  co-chairmen  here.  And  number  three,  designate  clear
leadership responsibilities to resolve the issues and attain the goals
identified in the Decadal study.

Our  United  States  private  sector  capabilities  lead  all  other  na-
tions today. With activities such as GoogleEarth, Microsoft, Yahoo,
and our own product at ESRI, providing online mapping sites using
remotely-sensed  imagery  that  the  public  now  takes  for  granted.
Other  private  sector  companies,  such  as  GeoEye  and  DigitalGlobe,
well  known  in  Colorado,  provide  high-resolution  imagery  for  tour-
ism, real estate, insurance companies to use. It has enabled correc-
tions  to  legal  descriptions,  settled  land  ownership  disputes,  Light
Detection and Ranging, or LiDAR, sensors are used to map terrain
and to define flood plain mapping and allow state and local govern-
ments to aid in their own development decisions.

There  are  so  many  sources  that  are  brought  to  bear  in  addition
to satellite imagery to mitigate and respond to catastrophic events.
And  I  was  also  asked  to  specifically  address  how  Earth  observa-
tions  are  used  in  the  agricultural  sector.  But  first,  let  me  address
how they are not.

Current Earth observations are highly fragmented, with different
systems  that  were  set  at  different  times  by  different  organizations
and  by  different  Congresses  for  different  reasons,  and  few,  if  any,
of  them  are  cross-correlated,  especially  within  the  federal  space.
NOAA has their weather observations. The FAA has surface obser-
vations. The USGS has stream gauging, and the Department of Ag-
riculture, through the NRCS, employs snow pack telemetry. We do
not have a coherent, integrated system to deliver each of the prod-
ucts  so  that  we  can  tell  their  relationships  and  their  interrelation-
ships.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

Satellite  remote  sensing,  indeed,  though,  is  broadly  used  in  sus-
tainable agriculture: forestry; responsible natural resource steward-
ship both in the public and the private domain; monitoring foreign
and  domestic  yearly  yields  on  harvests  of  food  and  fiber  to  predict
where the balances and the imbalances might occur; measuring soil
erosion  from  wind  and  water;  evaluating  the  impact  of  climate
change; detecting the presence of invasive species, plants, animals,
insects, and diseases that affect a wide range of agriculture; detect-
ing  and  measuring  contamination  of  soil,  water,  and  air  resources;
looking at landscape health; measuring resources involved with the
development of biofuels, and certainly with the shift from food pro-
duction to biofuels being able to monitor that.

So  remotely-sensed  observations  support  the  entire  agriculture
value stream from monitoring and detecting change, identifying so-
lutions, taking action, and then finding out, in return, what the re-
sult of those actions were.

There are many uses of agriculture in—such as hyperspectral im-
agery  by  individual  farmers  and  ranchers  all  the  way  up  to  what
you  are  doing  on  this  committee,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of
the  Committee.  Whatever  the  user  is,  they  want  objective,  timely,
and  accurate  information.  And  timeliness  is,  by  far,  the  most  im-
portant,  because  the  value  of  information  is  the  highest  when  un-
certainty is the highest, and it is certainly—uncertainty is certainly
common in agriculture.

One  of  the  statements  in  the  report  says  that  satellites—and  I
quote,  ‘‘Satellite  observations  have  spatial  and  temporal  resolution
limitations  and  hence,  alone,  do  not  provide  a  picture  of  Earth’s
system  that  is  sufficient  for  understanding  all  of  the  key  physical,
chemical,  and  biological  processes.’’  What  we  need  is  a  system  of
space,  ground,  airborne,  and  ocean-based  sensors,  both  public  and
private, that can gather complementary information and can be in-
tegrated with a minimum of duplication. In addition, we need a na-
tional network of web-based information integration of how our col-
lective  efforts,  and  I  had  proposed  in  the  appendix  attached  to  my
written remarks how we could integrate that through a geospatial-
enabled information system.

So  to  sum  up,  we  can  build  on  the  Decadal  Study  results  by  en-
suring  that  the  United  States  has  long-term  Earth-observation  ca-
pability and that it is maintained, certainly whatever we heard this
morning  is  we  are  not  even  maintaining;  addressing  the  void  in
leadership  and  how  the  vision  can  pull  it  all  together;  addressing
a  single  point  of  contact  or  program  office  within  the  Office  of
Science  and  Technology  Policy;  improving  our  research  to  oper-
ations  efforts  across  all  agencies;  establishing  a  common,  inte-
grated  information  infrastructure  readily  available  through  web
portals  to  the  public  and  policy-makers  alike;  implement  the  U.S.
Integrated  Earth  Observation  System,  IEOS,  which  is  part  of  the
Global Earth Observation System of Systems, or GEOSS; and then
begin  a  dialogue  with  the  private  sector,  industry,  academia,  and
non-governmental  organizations  to  assure  that  all  observation  as-
sets  respond  to  the  needs  of  all  of  our  various  sectors,  as  well  as
to consider new technology solutions. A high-level commission that
includes  the  private  sector,  non-governmental,  and  governmental

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

representatives, particularly state and local, could further examine
and develop an integrated plan for Earth observations.

Mr. Chairman, thank you.
[The prepared statement of Mr. Geringer follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF JAMES GERINGER

Chairman  Gordon,  Ranking  Member  Hall,  Members  of  the  Committee,  special
guests,  ladies  and  gentlemen.  I  am  Jim  Geringer,  currently  Director  of  Policy  and
Public Sector Strategy for Environmental Systems Research Institute (ESRI), the in-
dustry  leader  for  geospatial  information  systems.  I  served  as  Governor  of  Wyoming
from  1995  to  2003.  I  am  also  a  representative  of  the  Alliance  for  Earth  Observa-
tions, a nonprofit initiative to unite the private sector in the mission to promote the
understanding  and  use  of  Earth  observations  for  societal  and  economic  benefit.  My
past  includes  time  spent  as  an  agricultural  producer  and  user  of  Earth  observation
information  and  several  years  with  the  unmanned  space  program  configuring  re-
mote sensing satellites. I will relate some of my perspective from each of these roles.
We  each  benefit  from  Earth  science,  remote  sensing  and  location-based  informa-
tion  every  day.  Through  TV,  newspapers,  PDAs  and  online  information,  we  check
the  weather,  the  latest  headlines  and  map  out  where  to  meet  someone  for  dinner.
On  a  broader  scale,  we  can  track  indicators  of  change  across  our  planet.  The  Na-
tional Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) reported that last year was
the warmest on record for the United States. My part of the Rocky Mountain West
continues to suffer extreme drought. Last week’s report from the Intergovernmental
Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) confirms what we already knew anecdotally—that
human activity is adversely affecting our climate.

Today’s  discussion  centers  on  Earth  science  and  applications  from  space  and  the
requisite  analytical  tools  that  are  necessary  to  make  use  of  the  data.  As  a  former
governor, agricultural producer and now involved with geospatial technology, I sup-
port  the  programs  dealing  with  Earth  science,  applications,  and  observational  tech-
nologies for public use, business decisions, and everyday personal choices.

I thank Drs. Berrien Moore and Rick Anthes for their leadership as Co-Chairs of
the  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  study,  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from
Space:  National  Imperatives  for  the  Next  Decade  and  Beyond,  which  is  the  focus  of
this  hearing.  I  congratulate  them  and  the  other  members  of  the  Committee  for  an
exceptional  report.  I  serve  on  a  related  committee  under  the  NRC,  the  Mapping
Science  Committee,  so  I  know  that  the  quality  and  breadth  of  reports  such  as  this
don’t just happen; they require a very dedicated and concerted effort.
Response to the Report

Quoting  from  the  report,  ‘‘the  United  States’  extraordinary  foundation  of  global
observations  is  at  great  risk.  Between  2006  and  the  end  of  the  decade,  the  number
of  operating  missions  will  decrease  dramatically  and  the  number  of  operating  sen-
sors  and  instruments  on  NASA  spacecraft,  most  of  which  are  well  past  their  life-
times, will decrease by 50 percent.’’ A fifty percent reduction in today’s space-based
information systems is in sharp contrast to ever increasing demand.

Quoting  further,  the  Committee  was  ‘‘challenged  by  the  rapidly  changing  budg-
etary environment of NASA and NOAA environmental-satellite programs. By defini-
tion,  decadal  surveys  are  forward-looking  documents  that  build  on  a  stable  founda-
tion of existing and approved programs. In the present survey, the foundation erod-
ed  rapidly  over  the  course  of  the  study.’’  It  is  difficult  maintain  your  vision  from
a crumbling vantage point.

I offer three recommendations to the Committee for your consideration and delib-

eration:

• Enable  the  best  possible  personal  and  policy  decisions  by  providing  our
citizens with information, technology and tools to monitor and respond to our
changing world, thereby protecting lives and property;
• Provide an integrated Earth observation system to assure U.S. competitive-
• Designate  clear  leadership  responsibilities  to  resolve  the  issues  and  attain

ness;

the goals identified in the Decadal Study.

Enable the Best Decisions

The American people need and deserve the most comprehensive and timely infor-
mation  possible  about  our  world.  The  value  of  objective,  timely,  and  accurate  infor-
mation  has  never  been  higher.  We  all  would  like  to  have  predictable  certainty  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

security,  in  our  lives.  The  value  of  information  is  high  when  uncertainty  is  high.
Today nearly every issue we face has increasing uncertainty which drives the neces-
sity for better information. We devote funding and resources to modern medicine to
keep our bodies healthy using the best information; likewise, we should have quality
information  about  our  nation’s  food  supply,  water  supply,  energy,  climate  change
and  national  security  or  face  more  and  more  uncertainty.  In  today’s  world  of  RSS
feeds,  24-hour  news  channels  and  e-mails  that  propagate  rumor  far  faster  than
truth,  information  that  is  dangerously  incomplete  is  being  used  to  influence  deci-
sion-makers.  Today’s  media  and  Internet  capabilities  can  and  should  provide  more
and  better  information.  Remote  sensing  with  the  right  analytical  technology  can
provide  an  objective  and  accurate  assessment  of  the  situation  before  decisions  are
made with information that has not yet been validated.

We  should  develop  a  culture  among  agencies  and  levels  of  government  to  share
data,  applications  and  predictions,  then  serve  the  results  to  the  public  so  that  we
individually  and  collectively  are  more  self-reliant,  less  vulnerable  and  can  assure
long-term sustainability for our world.

A  policy-maker  in  Washington,  a  water  resource  manager  in  the  West,  a  farmer
in Indiana each must have good information upon which to base decisions. We must
have access to the most accurate and comprehensive science information to develop
a policy of sustainability for ourselves and for future generations.
Earth Observations Are Vital to American Competitiveness

Integrated  Earth  observation  capabilities  are  vital  to  American  competitiveness.
The  Decadal  Survey  helps  us  realize  that  the  U.S.  Earth  observation  capability  is
not keeping up with expectations and our competitiveness is at risk. We must have
the  global  information  infrastructure  that  is  critical  to  our  interconnected  society.
Comprehensive  science  information  ensures  that  decisions  will  be  made  based  on
evidence  rather  than  anecdotes.  Long-term,  sustained  data  is  needed  to  identify
trends.  Without  U.S.  long-term  climate  data,  the  IPCC  assessment  would  not  have
been possible.

Small  satellites  such  as  the  Disaster  Monitoring  Constellation  (DMC)  from  the
United  Kingdom,  Algeria,  China,  Nigeria  and  Turkey,  provide  information  for  dis-
aster prediction and mitigation. But one of the most effective applications has been
the  monitoring  of  opium  production  in  Afghanistan.  A  constellation  of  low-cost  sat-
ellites  showed  that  the  area  under  opium  cultivation  grew  to  a  record  165,000  hec-
tares in 2006 compared to 104,000 hectares in 2005. The U.S. is not alone in innova-
tive approaches.

On June 21, 2004, the Western Governors unanimously adopted a report entitled,
Creating  a  Drought  Early  Warning  System  for  the  21st  Century:  The  National  Inte-
grated  Drought  Information  System.  I  encourage  the  Members  to  download  a  copy
from http://www.westgov.org/wga/publicat/nidis.pdf. I was pleased to provide tes-
timony on their behalf before the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science & Trans-
portation, Subcommittee on Disaster Prevention & Prediction last April that helped
with the passage of H.R. 5136 authorizing NIDIS. Last week the President proposed
$4.4 million in the FY 2008 budget to fund it.

The  strongest  case  for  NIDIS  is  to  enable  risk  management  by  individuals,  busi-
nesses and governments, dramatically shifting from our practice of reaction and re-
sponse  to  one  of  prediction  and  mitigation.  Our  competitive  capability  will  increase
with  better  risk  management.  We  cannot  do  this  without  accurate  and  regular  sat-
ellite observations. With better sensors, data, applications, tools and ever-improving
technology we should reward risk management over resignation to the elements.

Of all the commodities sought in our marketplaces today, none will affect our com-
petitiveness  in  the  future  more  than  water.  Not  oil  or  gold  or  pork  bellies,  but
water. Our municipalities must have timely information that enables water policies
that  minimize  or  eliminate  water  shortages,  farmers  to  plant  alternative  crops,
ranchers  to  locate  alternatives  for  grazing,  river  barges  to  anticipate  low  flows  in
navigable waterways, and health agencies to control disease.

Space sensors and satellite observations improve our understanding and response
to  climate  change  to  sustain  international  competitiveness.  In  today’s  global  econ-
omy,  innovation  is  the  key  to  competitiveness.  The  United  States  must  stay  at  the
forefront  of  Earth  observation  and  geospatial  technologies  to  better  forecast  and
mitigate the impact of climate change, natural disasters and not only lead the com-
petition  but  leave  a  more  sustainable  world  for  our  children.  The  motivations  and
aspirations  of  the  next-generation  workforce  are  being  shaped  today.  We  should  be
setting  a  long-range  vision  in  place  to  encourage  today’s  youth  to  pursue  science,
math,  technology  and  engineering  professions  to  assure  future  innovation  and  com-
petitiveness.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

Our  commitment  today  to  technology  and  greater  knowledge  of  the  Earth  would
allow  us  to  better  protect  life  and  property  and  create  unprecedented  opportunities
to promote economic vitality. The right instruments and information systems enable
our ability to make forecasts that help anticipate outbreaks of infectious disease, en-
sure  adequate  water  availability  and  quality,  or  increase  agricultural  productivity.
The recommendations by the NRC report would enable a global view of issues and
activities.  But  a  global  view  alone  is  not  sufficient  to  make  policy  or  decisions.  We
need researchers, geospatial modeling and analysis that integrate pertinent sources
of data. We should promote the use of established standards and protocols to assimi-
late data from multiple sensors and sources—including commercial providers, State
and  local  governments,  academia  and  international  partners—and  provide  the  data
through user-friendly web portals.

The  U.S.  private  sector  capabilities  lead  other  nations.  Google,  Microsoft,  Yahoo
and  MapQuest  provide  online  mapping  sites  with  remotely  sensed  imagery  that  we
take for granted. In the private sector, companies such as GeoEye and DigitalGlobe
provide high-resolution satellite imagery. Tourism, real estate and insurance compa-
nies  routinely  use  remote  sensing  information  available  online.  High-resolution  im-
agery  has  enabled  corrections  to  legal  descriptions  and  settled  ownership  disputes
of land parcels. Light Detection and Ranging, or LiDAR sensors are used extensively
to  map  terrain  and  elevation  allowing  state  and  local  governments  to  aid  in  plan-
ning and development decisions.

Dr.  Glenn  Hill  of  Texas  Tech  University  used  3–D  imaging  to  catalog  and  pre-
serve the archaeological heritage in Mesa Verde National Park. If space-based tech-
nology were developed to produce images of the quality created by Hill’s team, high-
definition 3–D images of entire national parks would enhance our ability to manage
our  national  parks.  These  and  many  other  examples  point  out  how  public  expecta-
tions continue to increase for good science and timely assessment.

I affirm the comment in the NRC report that ‘‘Satellite observations have spatial
and temporal resolution limitations and hence do not alone provide a picture of the
Earth  system  that  is  sufficient  for  understanding  all  of  the  key  physical,  chemical,
and  biological  processes.’’  We  need  a  system  of  space,  ground,  airborne  and  ocean-
based sensors, both public and private, that can gather complementary information
and  can  be  integrated  with  a  minimum  of  duplication.  In  addition  we  need  a  na-
tional  network  information  integration  that  can  be  provided  by  collective  efforts
such as a Geographic Information System for the Nation described in the paper at-
tached to my written testimony as Appendix A.
Clear Leadership is Essential

Clear  leadership  is  essential  to  resolve  the  issues  and  attain  the  goals  identified
in  the  Decadal  Study.  The  report  before  you  calls  for  increased  funding  to  improve
our current national Earth monitoring capability. Yes, funding is important but the
essential  missing  element  is  leadership.  Scientific  assessment,  increased  budgets,
improved technical capabilities, and coordinated public-private engagement must be
accompanied by designated, consolidated leadership. Critical elements including sat-
ellite  and  aircraft  sensors,  in  situ  instruments  such  as  stream  gauges,  and
geospatial  information  systems,  have  been  fragmented  among  our  federal  agencies,
always a secondary mission, never the priority responsibility.

Earth observation is not a priority mission for any designated agency at the cabi-
net level. Not within NASA, the Department of Commerce, the Department of Inte-
rior  nor  any  other  federal  agency.  The  important  technologies  that  enable  us  to
measure  climate  change  and  identify  and  monitor  the  impacts  to  our  environment,
our  lives  and  our  livelihood  are  the  sole  responsibility  of  no  one  agency  or  person.
Our federal policy and programs are fragmented, even duplicative, and fall short of
national goals. Our Earth observation systems that might help mitigate such things
as drought or major disasters are neither efficient nor integrated. Consequently our
current  laws  and  practices  foster  dependency  rather  than  enabling  risk  manage-
ment, creating expectations that the Federal Government will bail us out of any and
all misfortunes.

Who should be the lead agency or position for U.S. Earth observation capabilities?
What is our national vision for Earth observations? How are requirements from the
federal  operational  sector  such  as  NOAA,  USGS,  USDA  and  EPA  reflected  in  our
research and development programs within NASA and NSF? Are requirements from
the private sector being addressed?

Leadership is essential to:

• Protect these critical assets;

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

• Develop  a  national  Earth  observation  strategy  to  appropriately  addresses  cli-
mate  change  and  other  environmental  challenges  based  on  evidence  over
anecdote;

pheric and ocean observations;

• Assure economy and efficiency in agency plans and budgets;
• Allow a smooth transition from research to operations;
• Improve  U.S.  land-observing  capabilities  to  an  equal  priority  with  atmos-
• Improve  capability  and  cooperation  among  government,  private  sector,  aca-
• Assure  the  much  needed  integration  of  our  national  and  international  Earth
• Develop  the  products  needed  to  make  the  best  decisions  for  our  country  and

demia, and non-governmental organizations;

observation systems;

future generations.

I support the report recommendation that:

The  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  in  collaboration  with  the  relevant
agencies, and in consultation with the scientific community, should develop and
implement a plan for achieving and sustaining global Earth observations. Then
a single point of contact or program office at the Cabinet level should be estab-
lished to assure complementary rather than duplicative or fragmented effort for
all operational aspects of Earth observation and analysis.

I urge that the private sector—industry, academia, and non-governmental organi-
zations—be  consulted  regarding  an  integrated  plan  for  Earth  observations  through
a  high-level  Commission  (e.g.,  Congressional  or  White  House).  Good  ideas  and  best
practices abound outside of government.

The U.S. Integrated Earth Observation System (IEOS) would also advance our na-
tional capabilities. IEOS would be the U.S. component of the Global Earth Observa-
tion System of Systems (GEOSS), which is now supported by more than 66 countries
and  46  international  organizations.  This  U.S.-initiated  effort  is  intended  to  allow
federal  interagency  and  multi-national  coordination  to  assure  that  disparate  envi-
ronmental-related  data  systems  here  at  home  and  abroad  are  inter-operable  and
compatible. A strong IEOS effort should be characterized by clear designation of re-
sponsibilities,  enabled  by  a  web-based  system  of  rapid  communication,  and  funded
across agency boundaries with a clear purpose. IEOS/GEOSS would improve the ca-
pabilities  for  today’s  decision-makers  by  providing  new  information  products.  That
is  not  the  case  today.  IEOS  has  neither  been  funded  nor  has  program  leadership
been designated.

We  take  for  granted  our  capability  to  use  credit  or  ATM  cards  almost  anywhere
in the world. The financial and banking systems throughout the world are inter-op-
erable—they exchange, transfer, translate, and deliver data that is used in decision
support tools. If insufficient funds exist, both the bank and the account holder know.
Decision support tools used by banks flag and even stop transactions. We should do
the same with today’s Earth observations systems. Unfortunately, they are not inte-
grated. Our current systems do not allow users to easily access, integrate or deliver
data,  nor  do  they  include  adequate  decision  support  tools.  We  need  a  common  inte-
grated information architecture that IEOS/GEOSS would require.

Space-based  assets  made  possible  the  discovery  of  the  Antarctic  ozone  hole,  en-
abled  forecasting  more  than  40  hours  beforehand  as  to  where  and  when  Hurricane
Katrina  was  likely  to  make  landfall,  and  now  help  us  to  understand  the  evidence
and impacts of climate change. These same technologies are used by farmers, energy
executives, and coastal managers for their daily operational decisions.
Satellite Measurements for Agriculture and Other Areas

Mr. Chairman, I have generally covered all of the questions in your letter of invi-

tation for me to testify. I submit these additional comments:
1. Describe the capabilities and applications made possible by data derived
from remote sensing satellites. What kinds of measurements are of chief
interest to each of the following communities:
• Agriculture
• Natural resource managers
• Municipal water supply managers
• Tourism and recreation officials

Each of these communities is heavily dependent on accurate weather and climate

forecasts provided by NOAA and private sector weather information companies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

Earth  observations  are  widely  used  for  assessments  of  production  and  resource
conditions  at  a  point  in  time.  We  need  to  move  beyond  the  emphasis  of  a  single
snapshot  to  the  incorporation  of  observations  made  over  time,  analyzed  by  models
that  can  be  used  to  predict  yield  or  resources  status  as  a  consequence  of  future  cli-
mate, management, biological or societal changes.

According  to  our  U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture,  remote  sensing  associated  with
sustainable  agriculture,  forestry,  and  responsible  natural  resource  stewardship
would include:

cluding dispersion of pollutants.

tion to biofuels.

and chemistry.

gens and monitoring progress of remediation.

production at field, local, regional and global scales.

radation on agri-ecosystems and natural ecosystems.

• Monitoring domestic and foreign yearly yields and harvests of food, and fiber
• Measuring soil erosion from wind and water.
• Evaluating impacts of global change, especially climate.
• Detecting the presence of, and then monitoring the spread of invasive species
including plants, animals, insects and diseases affecting agriculture, forestry,
and natural resources.
• Detecting  and  measuring  contamination  of  soil,  water,  and  air  resources,  in-
• Detecting indicators of landscape health such as the impacts of resource deg-
• Measuring  resources  involved  in  the  development  and  production  of  biofuels.
• Evaluating  the  effect  on  food  supplies  of  agriculture’s  shift  from  food  produc-
• Detecting and measuring the impact of, and the progress of recovery from, ep-
isodic  catastrophic  events  such  as  drought,  flood,  hurricanes,  tornadoes,  vol-
canic eruptions, earthquakes and wildfires.
• Detecting the effects of bioterrorism such as plant diseases, water-born patho-
• Establish  metrics  for  maintenance  of  soil  quality,  especially  organic  matter,
• Detecting and measuring landscape factors indicating compliance with agree-
ments  between  landowners/operators  and  federal  and  State  agencies  such  as
the Conservation Reserve Program (CRP), easements, timber sales, rangeland
management and public lands.
• Detecting  and  measuring  landscape  factors  indicating  compliance  with  inter-
• Identifying  pathways  that  transport  hazardous  waste,  and  measuring  the
• Measuring the status and changes of habitat and effects on plant and animal
• Understand  the  effect  of  energy  development  activities  on  or  near  critical
• Measurements  to  identify  and  quantify  factors  influencing  water  quantity,
• Measuring  carbon  sequestration  strategies  to  determine  beneficial  climate
• Measuring  the  long-term  effects  of  the  increasing  removal  of  ground  water
• Calculate the near-term and long-term effects of urban sprawl on agricultural

habitat for threatened and endangered species.

national treaties and agreements.

amounts and ultimate fates of waste.

water quality and air quality.

change.

from underground aquifers.

biological diversity.

production, critical habitat and recreation opportunities.

Agricultural  users  require  direct  measurements  from  hyperspectral  imagery  to
identify  ground  cover  or  to  the  type  and  health  of  vegetation  and  soils,  such  as  too
much  or  too  little  water,  fertilizer  or  ripeness,  on  a  short  time  scale  of  days  to
weeks. Archived, these same parameters provide climatologists with longer-trend in-
formation, from seasonal to yearly variations such as El Nin˜ o, for capacity planning
such as transportation and silo storage. The Drought Monitor is consulted by farm-
ers,  ranchers,  and  land  managers  especially  in  the  West,  and  internationally  by
those  who  seek  competitive  advantage  in  export  markets  or  where  they  may  gain
temporary  advantage  in  their  own  country  or  region  when  drought  would  decrease
our exports into their countries.

Natural  resource  managers  use  direct  measurement  by  hyperspectral  imagery
from  aircraft  or  from  space  to  provide  signatures  of  water  resource  conditions  such
as  algae  and  contaminants.  These  same  measurements  can  provide  forestry  with

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

tree  type  and  conditions  of  their  health.  Measurement  of  atmospheric  temperature
and moisture provide input to atmospheric forecast models that predict future tem-
perature,  precipitation,  and  severe  weather,  which  could  place  healthy  resources  at
risk.

Municipal water supply managers also use atmospheric temperature and moisture
measurements  to  provide  input  to  atmospheric  forecast  models  that  predict  tem-
perature and precipitation for planning in usage and supply.

Tourism  and  recreation  officials  assess  atmospheric  temperature  and  moisture
measurements to provide input to atmospheric forecast models that predict weather
and severe hazards for travel and tourist site conditions.

The  World  Meteorological  Organization  (WMO)  has  recognized  26  Essential  Cli-
mate  Variables  (ECVs)  documented  by  the  science  community—26  measurements
that are critical to the models that forecast weather and climate.

NASA, the U.S. Geological Survey, the Environmental Protection Agency, the De-
partment  of  Energy,  the  Department  of  Agriculture,  the  Department  of  Commerce
and  others  are  developing,  deploying,  and  maintaining  Earth  observation  data  sets
used in key models and decision support tools.
2. How  do  these  groups  gain  access  to  remote  sensing  data?  Is  special
training  required  to  understand  remote  sensing  data,  and  if  so,  how  is
it derived? Do private companies provide value-added products for these
groups?
Groups  access  remotely  sensed  data  several  ways.  The  NOAA  weather  and  cli-
mate  forecasting  services  (National  Weather  Service,  National  Hurricane  Center)
provide  data  and  information  through  NOAA  maintained  portals  and  servers  that
provide access to over 250 individual information products, including forecasts. Pri-
vate  sector  companies  (Accuweather,  ZedX  Incorporated,  The  Weather  Channel)  ac-
cess and exploit this information for individual clients. Commercial companies such
as  Google  and  ESRI  provide  online  portals,  and  consulting  and  software  solutions
used by many of the companies to visualize information for several of these markets
and to enable modeling and workflow analysis.

Raw  remote  sensing  data  by  itself  is  not  entirely  useful.  Training  and  education
vary by the level and sophistication of the end user. Ordinary citizens use data pro-
vided through many types of media. Capabilities range from basic literacy skills up
to doctoral research, certified professionals and technology aware managers. Special
expertise  is  required  to  turn  data  into  actionable  information.  Public  domain  and
general  information  is  provided  through  government  agencies  while  tailored  infor-
mation for special and commercial users is provided by value-added companies.

User  communities  throughout  the  U.S.  are  generally  fairly  sophisticated,  bene-
fiting  from  training  and  information  provided  by  NOAA,  NASA,  and  NSF,  the  Air
Force,  and  professional  societies  such  as  the  American  Meteorological  Society,  the
National  Association  of  Broadcasters.  Individual  companies  such  as  ESRI  also  pro-
vide specialized training programs. There are thousands of registered meteorologists
and  GIS  professionals  throughout  the  United  States  that  are  trained  in  the  use  of
the  observations  and  the  Earth  science  models  that  use  them  to  create  trends  and
forecasts.

The  number  and  diversity  of  players  in  the  satellite  observation  field  is  growing.
New  and  emerging  capabilities  offered  by  GoogleEarth,  Microsoft  Virtual  Earth  3–
D,  ESRI’s  Explorer  and  others  deliver  all  types  of  data  and  information  products
to a wide variety of users particularly through Internet-based web services and data
portals that allow many users to discover and extract information.

As a cautionary note—we risk becoming too complacent about having imagery and
maps  right  at  our  fingertips.  Visualization  is  interesting  but  can  be  so  shallow  as
to  be  misleading.  Development  of  good  policy  alternatives  and  decisions  depend  on
the  quality  and  configuration  of  remotely  sensed  data.  Data  must  be  described  in
terms  of  metadata,  or  its  appropriateness  for  use.  Compatibility  of  diverse  date
sources  is  essential.  The  casual  user  of  online  free  imagery  may  not  realize  how
much  useful  spatial  and  spectral  information  can  come  from  satellite  sensors  and
used for analysis. The full value of remotely sensed data comes from computer pro-
grams and analytical models that extract and transform information from validated
and verified sources.

Academia  plays  a  very  important  role  in  delivering  information  products  and
training.  Our  universities  not  only  provide  vital  research,  but  they  are  also  devel-
oping the next generation of scientists, engineers and end users.

We  don’t  just  need  more  data.  We  need  more  data  that  becomes  information  to
enable decisions. The Data was there that said that the nursing home in New Orle-
ans  was  putting  the  residents  at  risk.  But  the  data  wasn’t  available  in  the  right
form  and  wasn’t  used  to  make  decisions,  a  tragic  outcome  for  those  who  needed  it.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

You  as  Members  of  Congress  are  enabled  through  a  wide  variety  of  information
through  the  Library  of  Congress  that  helps  suggest  a  range  of  policy  options  that
you may use in legislative deliberations.
3. Based  on  your  experience,  how  broadly  are  government  and  industry
using  remote  sensing  data  to  plan  and  manage  crop  production  and
other natural resources?
The  most  positive  potential  for  government  and  industry  alike  is  to  leverage  and
integrate  information  in  a  complementary  way.  The  most  negative  potential  is  for
agencies  to  be  fragmented  in  approach,  duplicative  in  some  efforts  and  void  in  oth-
ers.

Both government and industry use remote sensing data to plan and manage many
activities  including  crop  production  and  natural  resources.  The  U.S.  Department  of
Agriculture, for example, benefits greatly from access to a robust set of observations
and forecasts that are provided by a wide range of Earth observation systems (pub-
lic and private). These are used by the Foreign Agriculture Service (FAS) to provide
the  monthly  global  crop  assessment  products.  These  products  are  key  to  policy  and
management  decisions  on  agriculture  worldwide.  Business  entities  that  advise  the
agriculture community are critically dependent on NOAA and other sources of near-
term  weather  forecasts  and  seasonal  to  inter-annual  forecasts  of  climate  conditions
that  are  used  in  decisions  of  what  to  plant,  when  to  plant,  and  when  to  harvest.
NASA’s  MODIS  satellite  has  been  an  invaluable  source  of  information  to  detect
and  fight  wildfires  in  the  West.  Knowing  where  the  active  fire  lines  are  helps  pro-
tect  the  safety  of  our  firefighters.  The  sensors  help  scientists  monitor  the  extent  of
irrigated agriculture and deforestation worldwide and provide data that private ana-
lysts  use  to  predict  the  global  agricultural  production  including  which  crops  will  be
in short or over supply.

As  industries  become  more  dependent  on  managing  on  small  margins  or  man-
aging against disaster risk, information from remote sensing will become even more
important. Weather risk managers seek to identify the economic consequences of ad-
verse weather on enterprises and organizations by relating their revenues, margins
and  costs  to  critical  weather  variables.  A  professional  market  exists  that  makes  its
business  in  assuming  this  weather  risk.  In  exchange  for  a  premium  or  other  bene-
fits,  these  businesses  take  on  this  risk  based  on  indices  of  pertinent  weather  vari-
ables, such as average temperature or rainfall.

A couple of years ago, the Metropolitan Area Planning Agency representing sixty-
four  member  organizations  from  five  counties  in  Nebraska  and  Iowa  contracted  to
provide aerial data acquisition, digital orthophotography, and production services for
over  2,200  square  miles  in  Nebraska  and  Iowa.  It  was  a  multi-sensor  program  in-
volving a large consortium of government user communities. It included a combina-
tion  of  Lidar  mapping,  floodplain  mapping,  data  for  master  planning,  design  and
construction  projects,  floodplain  analyses,  web  services,  highway  and  road  design,
3D visualizations, GIS municipal requirements, and various engineering and public
works functions.

There  is  similar  interest  in  managing  the  economic  impact  of  extreme  events—
earthquakes,  hurricanes,  monsoon  and  typhoons—by  utilizing  indices  based  on
windstorms,  seismic  magnitude  and  seismic  intensity  in  ways  that  are  very  similar
to the way the weather risk market uses weather data. The risk-management busi-
ness has strong interest in serious, systematic attempts to improve, expand and in-
tensify  the  capture  of  data  relating  to  our  planet.  We  also  see  growing  interest  in
the  risk  management  and  insurance  industries  for  understanding  shorter-term
weather  risk  in  terms  of  climate  change.  In  sum,  better,  fuller  data  mitigates  data
risk and model risk for the providers of risk capital.
Moving Forward

As  noted  earlier,  the  American  people  deserve  the  best  and  most  comprehensive
information  about  our  changing  planet.  Recent  revelations  about  climate  change,
particularly  as  affected  by  human  activity,  elevate  the  importance  of  ensuring  na-
tional  climate  observing  systems.  We  must  approach  our  environmental  security
with as much rigor and commitment as we approach homeland security.

We should build upon the Decadal Study results by:

• Ensuring that the U.S. long-term climate monitoring capability is maintained;
• Addressing the void in Earth observation leadership and vision;
• Establishing  a  single  point  of  contact  or  program  office  within  the  Office  of
• Improving our research-to-operations efforts across all relevant agencies;
• Establishing a common integrated information infrastructure;

Science and Technology Policy;

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

Global Earth Observation System of Systems (GEOSS);

• Implementing  the  U.S.  Integrated  Earth  Observation  System  (IEOS)  of  the
• Immediately  beginning  a  dialogue  with  the  private  sector—industry,  Aca-
demia,  and  non-governmental  organizations—to  ensure  our  satellite  observa-
tion assets respond to the needs of various sectors as well as to consider new
technology  solutions,  such  as  the  Geographic  Information  System  for  the  Na-
tion described in Appendix A.
• Establish  a  high-level  Commission  composed  of  private  sector  (industry,  Aca-
demia, and non-governmental organizations) representatives to further exam-
ine and develop an integrated plan for Earth observations.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

BIOGRAPHY FOR JAMES GERINGER

• Native of Wheatland, Wyoming.
• B.S. in Mechanical Engineering from Kansas State University.
• Veteran of 10 years active and 12 years reserve in the U.S. Air Force.
• Worked  as  project  officer  to  launch  several  space  based  satellites  for  the  un-
manned space programs of the Air Force and NASA, including the Global Po-
sitioning  Satellite  System,  remote-sensing  early  detection/warning  systems,
the Interim Upper Stage for the Space Shuttle, the Mars Viking Lander, acti-
vation of the Peacekeeper missile system and disaster recovery from nuclear,
biological and chemical warfare.

• Served  in  the  Wyoming  Legislature  from  1983  to  1994,  including  six  years
each in the House and the Senate. Committee chairmanships included Appro-
priations, Judiciary and Management Audit.

• Contract  administrator  for  the  construction  of  a  1700  megawatt  coal-fired

electric power generation plant near Wheatland Wyoming 1977–79.

• Went into full-time farming in 1980, continued through 1994.
• First elected as Wyoming Governor in 1994, reelected in 1998, completed sec-
ond  term  in  January  2003.  Focused  on  improving  education  through  stand-
ards,  accountability  and  technology,  modernized  economic  planning  to  exten-
sively  include  technology,  changed  how  natural  resource  agencies  among
State, Federal and local governments worked together, implemented strategic
planning  tied  to  performance  based  budgeting  and  upon  leaving  office,  pro-
vided  Wyoming  state  government  with  a  budget  surplus,  one  of  very  few
states to make that claim early in 2003.

• Emphasized  community  based  solutions  particularly  for  health  and  social
services and promoted the use of consensus building to resolve difficult issues.

• Past Chair of the Western Governors’ Association.
• Chairman of the Education Commission of the States.
• Served on the GeoSpatial One Stop Board of Directors, National Commission
on  Mathematics  and  Science  Teaching  for  the  21st  Century,  the  National
Commission  on  Service-Learning,  the  National  Commission  on  Teaching  and
America’s  Future,  Chair  of  the  National  Governors  Association  Technology
Task  Force  and  as  charter  member  and  current  Chair  of  the  Board  of  Trust-
ees, Western Governors University.

• Current  memberships:  Mapping  Sciences  Committee  under  the  National
Academy  of  Sciences  National  Research  Council;  Western  Interstate  Energy
Board; Association of Governing Boards for higher education; Operation Pub-
lic Education; the Board of Governors of the Oquirrh Institute; and, Co-Chair
of the Policy Consensus Initiative.

• Joined  Environmental  Systems  Research  Institute  (ESRI)  in  the  summer  of
2003 as Director of Policy and Public Sector Strategies, focused on how senior
elected  and  corporate  officials  can  enable  productivity  through  technology
more  effectively  in  business  and  government.  Primary  responsibility  is  to  fa-
cilitate  development  of  a  policy  for  a  decision  support  system  for  national  lo-
cation based information integration. ESRI, the world leader in location based
software and applications, is headquartered in Redlands, California.

• Recent keynotes include presentations on health care, health data standards,
alternative  energy,  education  policy,  natural  resources,  homeland  security,
the importance of government services enabled through Internet portals, web-
based infrastructure, e-government planning and sustainability of Earth’s re-
sources.

• Received  the  National  Association  of  State  Chief  Information  Officers

(NASCIO) 2004 National Technology Champion Award.

• Governor  Geringer  and  his  wife  Sherri  have  five  children  and  ten  grand-
children.  They  reside  in  Wheatland,  Wyoming,  the  site  of  ESRI’s  newest  sat-
ellite office.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

DISCUSSION

CONSEQUENCES OF EARTH OBSERVATION DROP-OFF

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Governor.  And  those  were  good
recommendations  that  we  certainly  want  to  put  in  the  mix.  Thank
you for that real-world suggestion.

Dr.  Moore,  as  you  showed  us  this—the  budget,  it  demonstrates
that,  really,  these  systems  have  been  hit  with  a  double-whammy.
One  is  the  reduction  in  funding  and  secondly,  just  the  ineptitude
at  NPOESS.  It  is,  you  know—the  waste  of  money  there  is  so  dis-
heartening.  It—this—that  is  a  major  priority  for  this  committee
under Chairman Boehlert, he did his best to try to get a handle on
that,  and  I  don’t  think  that  we  got  good  information,  and  he—I
think he would concur with that.

I have talked both with the Secretary of Commerce as well as the
President  and  CEO  of  Northrup  Grumman.  They  tell  me  they  are
on top of this now, and it is going to be our priority. And so I hope
we are going to see it brought back into line.

But let me—what I would like to ask you about is you mentioned
there were 17 replacement missions, although none of those are in
the budget for 2008, and it is—if history is any lesson to us, it is—
certainly, I think we can assume that all 17 won’t be in the future,
and very possibly, none.

So  can  you  tell  me—can  you  break  that  down  in  terms  of  what
we  are  going  to  lose  in  terms  of  just  status  quo  if  we  don’t  have
these  17  missions  versus  what  we  are  going  to  lose  in  terms  of
keeping up with the state-of-the-art?

Dr.  MOORE.  Yes.  Congressman  Gordon,  let  me  first  agree  with
you  that  circumstances  we  face  today  are  the  result  of  a  perfect
storm.  A  decline  in  the  NASA  budget  and  then  the  failure  on  the
NPOESS leave us in a very precarious position.

What are we not going to have?
We recommended earlier in our—early in the study, for the early
phase, an ICESat follow-on—the ICESat mission failed. There were
difficulties. And yet we know the ICE measurements are one of the
critical measurements as we look at the question of climate change.
The  Earth  radiation—this  is  fundamental  to  any  climate  model.
That  was  descoped  off  of  the  NPOESS  system.  And  so  now  we  are
vulnerable.

I  think  the  issue  of  carbon  sources  and  sinks,  there  is  a  mission
that is being developed, the Orbiting Carbon Observatory. But it is
sunlight-dependent, and it must operate in a very clear sky. When
you don’t study the carbon cycle, the sources and sinks, because of
photosynthesis,  adequately  with  a  sunlight-dependent  mission.  So
we  have  to  have  a  follow-on  that  uses  lasers.  That  is  not  in  the
budget.

The  issue  of  hyperspectral,  for  instance,  in  determining  disease
outbreaks, this is something we have tried to achieve for a number
of years. That is not in the budget.

Air pollution modeling—monitoring, that is not in the budget.
And  I  want  to  go  back  to  one  thing  that  we  mentioned  earlier.
All  we  have  to  do  is  to  get  back  to  where  we  were.  And  so  as  a
percent  of  GDP,  as  a  percent  of  the  NASA  budget,  as  a  percent  of
household  income,  that  would  be  lower  in  the  future  than  it  was

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

in  the  year  2000  and  the  year  1996.  At  that  time,  this  country
thought  that  these  measurements  were  important,  and  we  have
just gone down this slide. And I think that the extraordinary thing
is  we  can  achieve  this  robust  program  if  we  could  just  simply  get
the budget restored back to where it was in the year 2000.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you.
Governor, do you endorse this proposal?
Mr.  GERINGER.  Chairman,  yes,  there  are  several  features  of  this
proposal,  in  particular,  the  ones  that  call  for  innovation  and  cre-
ative  approaches,  and  a  formal  planning  and  program  office,  such
as  through  the  OSTP,  to  pull  everything  together  to  consolidate  a
vision,  in  a  practical  way,  put  a  process  together  to  where  it  could
be administered to phase it and make it work.

Chairman GORDON. And Governor, as a Republican western gov-
ernor,  who,  as  you  say,  has  seen  this  up  firsthand,  could  you,
again,  tell  us  what  you  think  if—you  know,  we  have  all  seen  the
ad  about  pay  me  now  or  pay  me  later.  I  mean,  in  terms  of  money,
public  and  private  dollars,  in  terms  of  suffering  of  folks,  just  at
least in Wyoming and the west, what is your opinion of what kind
of price are we going to pay if we don’t do this?

Mr.  GERINGER.  Well,  the  price  you  pay  is  tough  to  quantify,  but
in  terms  of  just  what  we  enable  other  people  to  do,  I  guess  my
focus would be on not the dollars that are spent but the frustration
of  individuals  who  know  what  they  could  do  if  they  had  the  tools
and  the  information  to  make  decisions,  to  manage  the  risks,  to
make their own business work.

Now we have five children, 10 grandchildren. They are all inter-
ested  in  what  they  might  do.  And  instead  of  expecting  a  job,  we
would like them to go out and make a job. Well, how do you make
a job if you don’t know the information required to plan your indus-
try,  to  manage  the  risk,  and  to  understand  the  marketplace?  And
the marketplace is driven by a lot of external information, particu-
larly  derived  from  satellites,  such  as  this.  So  it  is—the  cost  is  be-
yond dollar amounts. It is just in our ability to enable the next gen-
eration.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you.
My time has expired.
Mr. Hall.

PRIORITIES AND RECOMMENDATIONS OF DECADAL SURVEY

Mr.  HALL.  Governor,  the  Decadal  Survey,  as  you  know,  rec-
ommends  an  increase  of  $500  million  per  year  in  NASA’s  Earth
science budget to implement the Survey’s recommendations, but we
are  told  in  what  we  hear  and  what  we  read  and  what  seems  to  be
every—almost everyone’s understanding is that we are not likely to
see  that  large  an  increase  in  NASA’s  budget  any  time  in  the  near
future.

Given  the  limited  funding  situation,  which  of  the  missions  rec-
ommended  by  the  Decadal  Survey  do  you  believe  are  the  most  im-
portant for the Federal Government to implement?

Mr. GERINGER. Chairman—Congressman Hall, the—I don’t know
that  I  would  pick  out  any  one,  but  I  would  pick  out  an  approach,
I guess is the best way to put it.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

The recommendation, and this is not a mission in particular, but
it  is  a  recommendation  where  the—where  OSTP  pulls  together  ev-
erything, I think, is one of the lowest costs and probably a very sig-
nificant  cost-avoidance  recommendation.  So  we  can  put  together  a
plan  to  achieve  and  sustain.  I  think  the  first  concentration  needs
to be on to sustain what we expect to be out there. Look at the pre-
dictive capabilities for today’s storm here in DC. If we lose that ca-
pability,  I  can’t  imagine  what  would  go  on  outside  your  doorstep
here.

The  other  things,  and  Dr.  Anthes  and  I  were  talking  earlier
about  GPS  systems,  the  Global  Positioning  Satellites  that  are  up
there that can be used with suborbital sensors to detect changes in
the atmosphere, major density. It is a relative low-cost mission that
could  be  accomplished  with  existing  satellites  complemented  with
a marginal increase in funding.

I particularly like one of the recommendations that says that the
three  agencies,  principle  agencies,  NASA,  NOAA,  and  USGS,
should  pursue  innovative  approaches.  I  think  we  need  to  cut  them
loose and let them pursue some innovative approaches. That is one
of  the  things  that  has  always  benefited  our  economy  and  our  com-
petitiveness.  Let  us  not  be  so  rigid.  Let  us  get  them  the  tools,  the
ability, and the funding to make it work in creative ways.

Mr. HALL. I will ask one other question of Dr. Anthes.
You  made  the  statement  that  I  agree  with.  You  said  we  want  to
get back to where we were. And we are in the second month of that
this year of wanting to get back to where we were prior to the No-
vember election. So I am going to—I think you made a good state-
ment. You must be a Republican.

IMPROVEMENT OF WEATHER FORECASTS

Seriously,  let  me  ask  you  this.  Explain  to  us,  with  some  kind  of
concrete  example,  how  the  missions  recommended  in  the  Decadal
Survey  is  going  to  improve  weather  forecasts.  And  are  we  talking
about  more  accurate  predictions,  longer-range  predictions,  or  some
other type of improvement——

Dr. ANTHES. Thank you very much——
Mr.  HALL.—to  get  back  where  Dr.  Moore  says  we  ought  to  be?
Dr. ANTHES.—Congressman Hall.
I  was 

the  non-partisan 

of  Earth

referring 

state 

observations——

to 

Mr. HALL. Okay.
Dr. ANTHES.—just for the record.
I appreciate that question.
I think this gives me an opportunity to talk about what we need
is a system of observations. It is not—we don’t have a silver bullet
out there to improve weather forecasting. It is very much like when
you  go  to  the  doctor  for  a  check-up,  you  don’t  just  ask—he  doesn’t
just ask you—or she ask you how much you weigh or how tall you
are  or  what  your  blood  pressure  is  or  what  your  cholesterol  level
is or how fast you can do a treadmill or what your heart condition
is  or  your  lung  condition  is.  You  need  to  know  all  of  these  things
about  the  body.  So  you  need  many  different  kinds  of  observations,
if, number one, you are going to understand the health of the body,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

and  number  two,  if  you  are  going  to  make  any  kind  of  projections
about what your prognosis is for the future.

So  weather  forecasting  is  kind  of  like  that.  We  don’t  need  just
temperatures in the atmosphere or just ocean temperatures or just
winds  or  just  cloud  cover.  We  need  it  all,  because  they  all  con-
tribute independent information.

So  what  we  are  suggesting  is  this  balanced  set  of  recommenda-
tions,  which  includes  winds,  temperature,  water  vapor,  ocean  tem-
perature.  These  are  going  to  improve  all  aspects  of  weather  fore-
casting  from  the  two-week  forecasts—by  the  way,  I  did  a  hearing
at  the  Senate  just  a  week  ago.  When  I  got  back  to  the  hotel,  I
looked at the long-range forecast, and I said to my colleagues here,
‘‘Tuesday  is  going  to  be  a  big  storm  event  in  the  east.  Watch  out.’’
That  is  a—seven  days  in  advance,  and  that  is  not  bad.  We  stand
to  lose  that  capability  if  the  present  trends  toward  observations—
loss of observations continue.

On the positive side, we are not anywhere near the limit in pre-
dictability,  what  we  could  do.  Look  at  Katrina.  Katrina,  a  wonder-
ful  forecast,  but  that  was  unusually  good.  We  need  to  get  every
hurricane  forecast  hitting—heading  for  the  Gulf  Coast,  the  East
Coast with that accuracy.

So  it  is  not  just  a  negative  thing  about  forecasts  getting  worse
if we don’t get more—if we lose observations that there is a positive
benefit  here  of  getting  a  balanced  set  of  observations  and  improv-
ing  our  forecasts  of  tornadoes,  hurricanes,  extending  the  warnings
of  severe  events,  and  right  into  the  interseasonal  variability  of  cli-
mates, including the droughts that the Governor talked about.

Mr.  HALL.  How  long  would  it  take—excuse  me.  Is  my  time  up?
Chairman  GORDON.  It  has,  but,  sir,  you  go  right  ahead  if  you

Mr.  HALL.  I  just  wanted  to  ask  a  follow-up.  How  long  would  it
take  the  average  citizen,  with  all  of  those  types  of  tests  that—all
of  us  can  understand  any  of  them  individually  but  not  all  of  them
together.  How  long  would  it  take  until  the  natural—the  average
citizen would see these improvements in daily operational weather
forecasts?  And  if  accuracy  is  your  main  thrust,  what  about  the
long-range, the timeliness of it?

Dr. ANTHES. Well, forecast improvements have been gradual, and
they  will  continue  to  be  gradual.  So  the—but  what  happens  is  the
humans’ expectation grows as the accuracy gets better. So what we
take  for  granted  now  as  a  three—as  a  good  three-day  forecast,  we
are now expecting that at six days or seven days. And so the expec-
tations rise as the accuracy rises.

However,  people  who  really  look  at  this  and  depend  on  it  for  an
economic  living  know.  They  keep  track  of  the  scores,  accuracy  in-
creases  and  such,  because  they  are  making  decisions  based  on
probabilities.  And  so  the  people  who  really  need  it  to  make  quan-
titative decisions are doing this right now.

For  you  and  me,  the  public,  it  will  be  so  gradual,  it—you  know,
you  will  wake  up  10  years  from  now  and  we  will  have  good  two-
week forecasts instead of good week forecasts.

So  it  is  gradual  for  the  public.  It  is  very  valuable  and  well  mon-

need——

itored for the decision-maker.

Mr. HALL. I thank all three of you.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

Yield back.
Chairman GORDON. The gentleman’s time has expired.
Mr. Udall is recognized for five minutes.
Mr. UDALL. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I  wanted—I  want  Judge  Hall  to  know  that  we  always  take  him

seriously.

DETAILS OF DECADAL SURVEY RECOMMENDATIONS

I  did  also,  in  the  Decadal  Survey  recommendations,  note  that
there  were  over  100  proposed  missions,  and  you  all  distilled  it
down to 17, with the idea that they are integrated. And I am sure
there were some tough trade-offs there, but I think it is important
that  the  Committee  understand  that  and  the  general  public  that
this  is  not  just  a  wish  list.  This  is  a  very  focused  effort  to  identify
where we would have the maximum return on our investment.

If  I  could,  in  that  spirit,  I  wanted  to  talk  about  the  opportunity
cost to explore that if we do not maintain a robust Earth-observing
system.  And  as  I  understand  it,  we  need  continuity  in  Earth-ob-
serving  data  over  long  time  periods  to  improve  smaller-scale  re-
gional  climate  projection  models.  And  it  seems  to  me  that  we  are
going to need better regional information that would allow us to be
better prepared for changes in climate that are likely to occur, even
if we stabilize greenhouse gas emissions.

And then also, if we—and I shouldn’t say if. I want to say when
we  adopt  measures  to  limit  greenhouse  gases,  we  will  need  to
verify that the measures we adopt are, in fact, resulting in reduced
emissions and lower concentrations of greenhouse gases.

So  what  role  would  the  Earth-observing  system  you  are  pro-
posing play in fulfilling those needs? And is it going to be more dif-
ficult to—or take longer to accomplish these two things without an
Earth-observing system?

low on.

Maybe start with Dr. Anthes, and then Dr. Moore, you could fol-

Dr. ANTHES. Well, that is a very excellent question. And the pro-
grams  that  we  are  proposing—first  of  all,  it  is  a  really  good—you
noted that we went from over 100 proposed missions to 17. And one
of the criteria we had for prioritization was that it had to be afford-
able.

The second point is it is a balanced program. It supports climate
as  well  as  weather.  It  supports  industry,  agriculture,  water  man-
agement,  as  well  as  science.  And  so  the  program  we  are  proposing
is  an  integrated  set  of  observations,  and  we  think  we  need  them
all for exactly the reasons that you iterated.

Mr. UDALL. Dr. Moore.
Dr. MOORE. Let me just draw attention to three points.
First of all, as you note, stabilization of greenhouse gas emissions
is going to be a very real challenge, but a challenge we must meet.
Stabilization of emissions does not lead to a stable concentration in
the  atmosphere.  Stabilization  of  emissions  is  a  step  towards  stabi-
lizing  the  concentration  of  the  atmosphere.  But  stable  emissions
will  only  lead  to  a  constant  growth  of  CO2,  for  instance,  in  the  at-
mosphere.  So  that  means  that  we  have  to  face  this  question  of  cli-
mate change head on.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

One  of  the  missions  that  we  recommend  for  the  early  timeframe
focuses  on  soil  moisture.  Soil  moisture  is,  perhaps,  one  of  the  key
ingredients  in  climate  models  as  well  as  in  terms  of  what  is  really
important to the people who live based on—in areas based upon ag-
riculture.  But  it  also  means  that  if  you  live  in  an  area  that  is  a
flood plain. So I—that is a key issue.

And the third is that the kind of missions that we recommended,
for  instance,  on  CO2 where  we  looked  at  sources  and  sinks  of  car-
bon  dioxide.  Any  kind  of  management  system  of  greenhouse  gases
is going to require the knowledge of what are the sources and sinks
for carbon dioxide. It is fundamental.

Mr.  UDALL.  Chairman  Gordon,  I  know  the  clock  isn’t  running.  I
am  assuming  I  have  got  a  minute  or  two  left.  Or  I  should  say  the
lights aren’t working.

ADDRESSING EMERGING REGIONAL AND GLOBAL

CHALLENGES

Chapter  2  in  the  report  lists  six  emerging  regional  global  chal-
lenges.  To  mention  two  of  them,  changes  in  natural  systems  due
to  climate  change  and  the  role  of  ice  sheets  and  the  sea  level  rise,
and there are four other identified challenges.

Can  we  address  those  challenges  if  we  don’t  maintain  an  Earth-
observing system? And maybe you could provide an example or two
that  would  illustrate  our  ability  to  respond  to  these  challenges
would  be  limited  by  the  lack  of  information  from  Earth-observing
systems if we don’t have those up in place.

Dr.  ANTHES.  Well,  there  is—we  could  all  probably  come  up  with

many examples. Let me just give one.

Sea  level  rise  is  one  of  the  most  important  issues  facing  society,
particularly  in  the  next  generation  and  the  generation  after  that.
For  many  years,  the  models  of  glaciers  indicated  a  relatively  slow
melt of the Greenland ice cap. But just in the last few months and
years,  through  measurements,  very  precise  measurements  of  the
Earth’s  gravity  field,  we  could  tell  that  the—Greenland  was  losing
mass  at  a  far  faster  rate  than  the  models  of  ice  melt  would  indi-
cate.  And  what  apparently  is  happening,  and  I  am  not  a
glaciologist,  so  bear  with  me,  but  apparently,  it  is  the—water  is
running down and causing slippage of the ice off the continent, and
perhaps  a  much  faster  rate  of  ice  melt  than  we  were  predicting  a
few—even a few years ago.

So if we suddenly stop measuring the Earth’s gravity or suddenly
stop measuring how fast the ice is melting, we don’t know whether
that  is  an  anomaly,  you  know,  that  happened  to  be  an  anomaly
over  the  last  couple  of  years,  a  rapid  ice  melt  and  is  going  to  go
back to a slow melt, or it is going to continue to accelerate.

And  so  what  we  might  be  thinking  is  100-year  problem  might
suddenly become a 25-year problem. We don’t know. But these are
the  kinds  of  questions  and—that  we  really  need  to  stay  on  top  of,
because we are going to have surprises.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Doctor.
The gentleman’s time is expired.
Mr. Bartlett is recognized for five minutes.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

ENVIRONMENTAL DATA AND ETHANOL USAGE

Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much.
As you probably have noted in the papers, our zeal for producing
ethanol  has  driven  the  price  of  corn  from  $2.11  a  bushel  in  Sep-
tember  to  $4.08  a  bushel  in  December.  This  is  very  likely,  I  think,
to encourage farmers to take lands out of agricultural reserve, most
of  which  lands  shouldn’t  really  be  farmed,  which  is  why  they  are
in there, but $4-a-bushel corn is going to be a big incentive to take
those  lands  out  of  the  agricultural  reserve  and  put  them  into  pro-
duction.

There are other reasons for being concerned about the use of fos-
sil fuels. But if we limit ourselves just to the environmental effects,
clearly,  we  need  to  understand  the  environmental  effects  of  CO2,
and we do, but there are also going to be big environmental effects
of  taking  these  lands  out  of  agricultural  reserve  and  putting  them
into production.

My question is how much will our decision-makers lose in quality
data  for  making  decisions  to  how  we  need  to  move  in  the  future
relative  to  this  ethanol  thing  if  we  don’t  have  the  additional  pro-
grams that you all are encouraging?

Dr.  MOORE.  This  is  an  area  where  I  want  to  compliment  NASA.
It does appear that the increase in 2008 and 2009, which is an in-
crease  of  a  downward  trend,  is  to  essentially  address,  as  I  have
mentioned  in  my  testimony,  the  precipitation  mission  and  the
Landsat. The Landsat satellite system will be fundamental in mon-
itoring  agricultural  regions,  absolutely  fundamental.  You  need  the
high  resolution  if  you  are  to  determine  what  type  of  crop  is  grow-
ing. And so this whole issue of biofuels will be very dependent upon
the  Landsat  system.  For  that,  I  think  that  NASA  is  doing  a  good
job at getting it back on track.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Our  public  policy  people  are  going  to  be  caught
on  the  horns  of  a  dilemma.  Clearly,  greenhouse  gases  are  impli-
cated in the increase to Earth’s temperature. And that is a big en-
vironmental concern. But all of life on Earth is dependent on about
the upper eight inches of topsoil. If you can’t grow food, you are not
here. And as we take this land out of reserve and put it in produc-
tion, we are going to be losing more topsoil. And so our policy-mak-
ers are going to be faced with a tough decision. Do we save our top-
soil by increasing CO2, which is the greater of those two evils? And
my  concern  is  that  we  will  need  more,  not  less,  information  for
making those decisions.

And  I  would  just  like  to  get  on  the  record  my  concern,  and  the
concerns of a great many people, that there are two environmental
concerns  here  that  are  kind  of  intentioned.  And,  you  know,  which
way are we going to go? And I think that will be largely dependent
on the quality of the information we get.

And  so  in  a  very  real  sense,  this  is  more  than  just  an  academic
exercise. It will affect each one of us, not only by the quality of the
air we breathe, but potentially, by the volume of crops that we are
able to grow.

Mr.  GERINGER.  Mr.  Chairman,  let  me—I  think  it  was  more  of  a

statement than a question, but let me respond anyway.

You asked what would happen.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

One  of  the  things  that  agriculture  uses,  one  thing  that  a  gov-
ernor uses is as much information as it can. Having been in politics
for a number of years, I am struck by how, in the absence of infor-
mation,  we  make  decisions  anyway.  Anecdotes  serve  us  well,  don’t
they?  It  is  easier  to  make  a  judgment  based  on  an  anecdote  from
a story back home, absent any other information.

So  now  let  me  turn  it  around  and  say  if  we  had  better  informa-
tion,  such  as  what  Landsat-5  and  Landsat-7  started  but  are  not
going to continue, and certainly the granularity and the detail that
we need today just to make individual decisions in agriculture pro-
duction for individuals and then to take that beyond and say what
has  been  the  impact  of  increasing  ethanol  or  other  renewable  fuel
production  as  an  offset  to,  say,  food  supply  or  the  loss  and  erosion
of topsoil? What are the practices that happened? How do we know
that  they  are  happening,  other  than  anecdote,  if  we  don’t  have  a
broader  view  that  only  satellite  imagery  can  provide,  as  well  as
ground-based information?

So  you  need  a  combination.  We  are  not  going  to  be  able  to  even
evaluate  the  shift  of  production  from  food  to  fuel  if  we  don’t  have
the sensors in place.

Chairman  GORDON.  Thank  you,  Doctor—Governor,  and  thank

you, Dr. Bartlett.

Mr. BARTLETT. Mr. Chairman, I know my time is up, but I would
like unanimous consent to submit a question for the record, if I——

Chairman GORDON. Certainly.
Mr. BARTLETT.—might.
Chairman GORDON. Certainly.
Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you, sir.
Chairman GORDON. Dr. Wu.
Mr. WU. Thank you very much.
And  my  mom  always  wished  I  had  finished  medical  school,  and

I have been upgraded. And I am going to tell her about this.

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman.
First  just  a—drop-out  is  such  a  harsh  word.  I  am  on  a  leave  of
absence  from  my  medical  school,  which  has  now  gone  on  for  ap-
proximately—well, we are approaching the end of the third decade.
Chairman  GORDON.  Of  course,  that  was  after  getting  a  law  de-

gree, too, so——

Mr. WU. And I am told—I am sure that if I just admitted my dire
mistake,  they  would  let  me  back  in,  because  the  admissions  com-
mittee there never makes mistakes.

WEATHER PREDICTION

But first, just a question of curiosity, for you gentlemen.
A  meteorologist  friend  of  mine  said  years  ago  that  at  five  days,
the  forecast  is  random.  You  might  as  well  just,  you  know,  just
throw  it  against  the  wall,  but  that  was  a  few  years  ago.  At  what
point  does  your  forecasts  or  any  meteorologist’s  forecasts  just  kind
of go random these days? And I am just kind of curious.

Dr. ANTHES. Well, that is an excellent question.
Years  ago,  there  was  some  theory  done  on  non-linear  systems,
which  said  there  was  a  predictability  limit  of  about  two  weeks.
That was the theoretical limit. That is after two weeks, things were
deemed random.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

We  may  be  a  little  longer  than  that,  but  that  is  still  the  order.
We don’t see what we call the typical weather forecasts being accu-
rate,  ever,  beyond  more  than  a  couple  of  weeks.  Right  now,  we
have a pretty good scale out to seven to ten days.

Mr. WU. Seven to ten days? Okay. Yeah. My Blackberry gives me

six days, so it is within that margin.

Dr. ANTHES. Yeah.
Mr. WU. Yeah. Okay.

RESTORATION OF DROPPED NPOESS INSTRUMENTS

A  more  serious  question.  The  Chairman  referred  earlier  to  the
NPOESS  program.  And  my  understanding  is  that  because  of  cost
issues,  cost  overruns,  that  various  instruments  have  been  sort  of
thrown  off  the  bus.  And  they  tend  to  be  the  climate  instruments.
And Dr. Moore, you mentioned earlier that soil moisture is a very,
very  important  factor  to  track  for  climate  change  purposes.  And  it
also is the case that our military is very interested in soil moisture
for other reasons. So I assume climatologists have a very strong in-
terest  in  soil  moisture  for  one  set  of  reasons,  and  the  U.S.  armed
forces have the same interest.

Now  I  think  a  list  is  coming  of  the  various  instruments,  which
were  tossed  off  the  NPOESS  for  budgetary  reasons,  and  I  just
want—I am just asking you all, if you are familiar enough with it,
if  you  could  identify  the  order  in  which  you  would  bring  the  cast-
off  instruments  back.  If  you  are  not  familiar  with  the  hardware
enough,  at  least  the  data  streams  that  you  would  like  to  see,  the
cavalry coming, the data that you would like to see from NPOESS.

Dr. MOORE. Yes, Congressman Wu.
In the Decadal, we prioritize under a very limited basis. We rec-
ognized the budgetary difficulties. And the first was the Earth radi-
ation  budget  instruments,  that  is  to  measure  the  solar  radiance
and  the  reflected  energy  off  the  planet.  The  second  was  the  profile
of ozone in the atmosphere, because we are in this period of regula-
tion  the  fluorocarbons,  and  we  are  going  to  see,  hopefully,  the  res-
toration  ozone  hole.  Monitoring  that  profile,  the  different  con-
centrations in altitude is the second priority.

Mr. WU. Would that be aerosols?
Dr. MOORE. No, that certainly is a priority, but now we are—we,
essentially,  felt  that,  given  the  constraints  of  the  budget  on
NPOESS,  that  was  about  as  far  as  we  would  recommend  in  terms
of restoration.

Is that all we need to do? Absolutely not.
Mr. WU. I am sorry. I am just trying to look on my list here, and
I  am  not  finding  an  ozone  meter,  per  se,  but  which  instrument
would that be in?

Dr.  MOORE.  Yeah.  It  is  called  ozone—the  OMPS  instrument.  It

is the limb-sounding aspect that was lost, the——

Mr. WU. OMPS limb.
Dr. MOORE. Right.
Mr. WU. Okay.
Dr.  MOORE.  That  was  lost,  so  that  we  are  recommending  to  put
back on, and the series and the solar radiance monitor we are rec-
ommending to put back on.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

With  regards  to  the  soil  moisture,  that  was  to  be  measured  by
an  instrument  called  CMIS.  This  is  a  follow-on  to  what  is  on  the
Defense  meteorological  satellites  right  now.  Given  the  fact  that
that  was  the—descoped,  we  called  for  the  preservation  of  sea  sur-
face temperatures and winds. And then we offset the loss of the soil
moisture by recommending a NASA mission in soil moisture.

And  I  must  say  that  there  are  a  lot  of  very  important  measure-
ments.  For  instance,  sea  surface  altimetry  that  Dr.  Anthes  spoke
about. The sea level height. That instrument is gone. We are trying
to  compensate  for  that  by  recommending  an  altimeter  to  NASA.  It
is  true  that  most  of  the  climate  measurements  were  lost  on
NPOESS,  and  I  think  that  perhaps  the  best  strategy  is  the  pro-
gram we are recommending to NASA.

Mr. WU. If you are pushing over to NASA, is that realistic, given

the budget crunch over on that side of the house, if you will?

Dr. MOORE. No, I——
Chairman GORDON. A quick answer, please, sir.
Dr.  MOORE.  I  understand  this  budget  issue  and  the  budget
crunch,  but  the  fact  remains  is  that  the  observational  needs  exist.
And the budget was reduced over six years by a third. That seems
to have been an error——

Chairman GORDON. The gentleman’s time——
Dr.  MOORE.—therefore,  we  need  to  restore  that  budget  so  that

we can meet the observational needs of the planet.

Chairman GORDON. The gentleman’s time has expired.
Mr. Rohrabacher is—has five minutes.
Mr. ROHRABACHER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
First,  I  would  like  to  congratulate  you  on  your  report  and  the
hard work that went into this and the discipline necessary to actu-
ally  come  up  with  something  that  does  not  totally  depend  on  what
I consider to be a trendy issue of the day, which is climate change
overall.  You  have  made  your  arguments  that  included  climate
change  as  a  reason,  but  you  have  well  outlined  your—you  know,
your—basically,  the  benefits  that  we  will  derive  even  if  we  don’t
have a global warming scenario. You have outlined the need for the
type of observation that you are advocating.

And let me also note that it is unfortunate that we lost—I guess
it  was  a  $3  billion  overrun  for  NPOESS.  I  mean,  that  is  what  we
are talking about. The $3 billion, let me note, Mr. Chairman, what
could  we  do  with  $3  billion?  We  could  implement  everything  that
is being said today. The request, basically, today is let us make up
for  the  failure  of  NPOESS.  That  is  basically  what  we  are  saying,
because  that  is  a  six-year—well,  they  are  asking  for  $500  million
a  year.  It  would  put  us  back  on  schedule.  And  we  lost  $3  billion
from just the overrun costs.

Let  me  add,  there  are  some  questions  as  to  the  reason  why
NPOESS  failed.  And  some  of  the  reasons—and  I  know  people
aren’t going to want to hear this, but some of the reasons are addi-
tions to NPOESS, things that were added onto NPOESS that were
designed  to  prove  climate  change,  which  helped  the  failure  of
NPOESS.  So  there  is  a  cost  when  people  go  after  things  that
maybe trying to stampede the public into spending more money for
climate  change  that  ends  up  a  dramatic  cost  to  other  aspects  of
what we would like to achieve.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

I was especially interested in the fact that this does measure sun
and solar activities, which I believe are the basis for a lot of the—
whether  the  human  activity  and  carbon  being  put  into  the  air,  or
hydrocarbons being put into the air and greenhouse gases may well
explain  why  we  have  certain  changes  in  climate  and  temperature
on the Earth.

Let me ask this about, you know—we—again, you have given me
a  lot  of  information.  And  by  the  way,  I  would  just  say,  again,  I
thank  you  for  that,  because  I  was  listening  intently,  and  I  think
you  all  made  your  point.  And  Governor,  I  am  glad  you  were  here
to  make  a—to  really  tell  us  what  it—how  we—this  is  going  to  be
cost-effective for humankind to know this, because it is. I mean, we
are talking—you are not talking about contributing just knowledge.
You  are  talking  about  contributing  something  that  is  going  to
change  people’s  way  of  life  for  the  better.  And  again,  I  think  you
have made your arguments today.

RECORD OF HURRICANE AND CYCLONE INTENSITY

The—I  guess  I  don’t—I  was  just  taking  notes  while  you  were
going through here. I—let me ask you, Dr. Anthes, is that how you
pronounce it?

Dr. ANTHES. Anthes.
Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Anthes.  Are  there  more  cyclones  and  hurri-

canes today than there used to be?

Dr.  ANTHES.  That  is  a  very  good  question,  and  it  is  a  hot  topic

of debate, I will put it that way.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. That is why I ask it.
Dr.  ANTHES.  We  don’t—I,  actually,  started  out  as  a  tropical  cy-
clone research meteorologist. And I must say, because of the obser-
vational  record  being  particularly  bad  before  the  advent  of  sat-
ellites  in  the  1970s,  we  have  maybe  70  years,  80  years,  90  years
of  an  incomplete—an  imperfect  satellite  data  record  on  tropical
storms.  So  frankly,  you  know,  you  will  read  papers  on  both  sides
of this point.

Mr. ROHRABACHER. Okay.
Dr.  ANTHES.  Frankly,  I  don’t  know.  I  haven’t  made  up  my  mind

Mr. ROHRABACHER. All right.
Dr. ANTHES. And that is one reason for having these observations
from space so that we know whether trends of intensity is increas-
ing or not, because I don’t think the evidence is conclusive yet.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Now  I  will  have  to  say,  I  sat  through  hurri-
canes  when  I  was  younger,  when  I  lived  in  North  Carolina,  when
I  was  in,  like,  sixth  or  seventh  grade.  And  I  read  about  the  great
hurricanes  that  came  through  Florida  and  Galveston,  Texas.  We
know that they were very huge tropical storms then.

yet.

NEED OF SATELLITE SYSTEM FOR AGRICULTURAL

PRODUCTION

be up.

One question for the Governor, and then I guess I—my time may

Why  is  it—why  do  you  see  it  being  necessary  to  have  a  satellite
system that gives an overall view of, for example, agricultural pro-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

duction?  Don’t  we  have  enough  computerization  and  records  being
kept  throughout  the  states  and  by  the  Federal  Government  based
on  just  the  number  of  farmers  and  the  type  of  bureaucratic  efforts
that  we  make?  Don’t  we—isn’t  that  accurate  enough  to  see  how
many acres of corn we are growing?

Mr.  GERINGER.  Mr.  Chairman,  Congressman  Rohrabacher,  the—
we do accumulate a lot of information, and one of the points I made
is  that  we  don’t  know  how  to  discover  and  serve  that  information
in a useful way. So that is part of the answer.

The  other  part  of  it  is  we  don’t  know  the  extent.  And  I  will  give
you  a  different  example.  It  is  not  even  in  our  country.  There  is  a
consortium of countries that have put together a satellite constella-
tion  called  the  Disaster  Monitoring  Constellation.  That  is  the
United Kingdom, Algeria, China, Nigeria—Algeria and Nigeria and
Turkey.  Now  they  launched  these—constellation  of  low-cost  sat-
ellites  to  monitor  for  disaster  prediction  and  mitigation.  But  what
they  have  done  is  they  have  started  monitoring  opium  production
in Afghanistan. Now they don’t have quite the statistical reporting
system that we have in the United States on opium production, but
they  have  shown  that  in  the  1  year  from  2005  to  2006  that  the
opium  cultivation  grew  by  about  60  percent  in  Afghanistan.  That
affects us. It doesn’t affect agriculture. It affects everybody.

Now  how  do  we  truth  what  is  reported  on  the  ground  through
statistical  reporting  services  the  soil  condition,  the  erosion,  you
know,  the  loss  of  forests  and  things  like  that?  How  do  we  truth
that up with what is reported on the ground of what the satellites
look  at?  The  MODIS  satellite  is  one  of  the  key  satellites  that  we
use  for  that  kind  of  information,  in  addition  to  Landsat.  So  there
is—it is the ability to know what you have, the quality of the data,
how to use the data, and then how do you integrate it to where you
can  make  an  overall  decision,  a  systematic  decision,  not  just  a
knee-jerk type of one.

Mr.  ROHRABACHER.  Well,  thank  you  very  much.  And  again,  I
think you have made your case, and I appreciate good suggestions,
by  the  way,  as  well,  not  just  making  the  case  for  the  expenditure
but suggestions on how we can manage the system and do a better
job for—and be more effective for what we do spend.

So thank you very much.
Chairman GORDON. The gentleman’s time has expired.
And I will say that, Mr. Rohrabacher, your line of questioning al-
ways  makes  for  a  better  hearing,  and  we  thank  you  for  it.  But  I
will  point  out  one  thing,  that  the  knobs  on  the  global  warming  in-
struments  go  both  ways.  So  it  is  not  just  to  prove  it.  It  could  be
also to disprove it.

The gentlelady from Texas, Ms. Johnson.

CONSEQUENCES OF GAPS IN DATA RECORDS

Ms. JOHNSON. Thank you very much.
And  thanks  to  the  witnesses  for  being  here.  It  has  been  inter-
esting.  I  guess  I  have  a  question  that  might  be  considered  kind  of
dumb.

But  when  we  have  interruptions  of  observation  where—no  mat-
ter  what  causes  it,  is  it  thought  that  we  miss  something  in  the
meantime, or does it interfere with how we work to certain points?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

Dr. ANTHES. Well, that is—it is not a dumb question.
Explaining why gaps in the data record are important is not that

easy, but let me try.

If you are looking at a—say, a 20-year cycle, and you miss seven
years  of  that  cycle,  you  are  not  going  to  be  able  to  tell  what  that
cycle  really  is  if  you  are  missing  seven  years  out  of  20.  So  that  is
one reason.

Another reason is a gap at the end of the record, in other words
stopping a measurement, is the worst gap of all, because you don’t
know  whether  the  last  little  up  tick  or  the  last  little  downturn  is
continuing for the—you know, into the future or not. If you look at
any record, you will see this kind of thing. If you stop at this point,
when  you  are  going  down  and  the  gap  starts,  you  don’t  know
whether that turns around and starts coming up again or if it con-
tinues to go down.

So gaps are a very important problem in terms of understanding
cycles  and  trends  of  whatever  it  is,  sea  level,  temperature,  water
vapor, precipitation, drought frequency, whatever.

Ms.  JOHNSON.  So  when  you  have  great  reductions  in  the  budget
and  perhaps  gaps,  is  it  worth  the  investment  to  start  and  stop,
start  and  stop,  or—and  do  we  get  any  real  useful  information,  or
are we wasting money if we don’t do it any better?

Dr. MOORE. I think one of the challenges, and I believe the Gov-
ernor noted this also, is the question of sustainability of the obser-
vation system. And that actually carries with it some real require-
ments.

Instruments  don’t  last  forever,  and  that  is  why  we  have  gaps.
One  of  the  problems  is  that  if  you  are  measuring  something  like
temperature,  and  it  is  increasing  slowly,  and  that  instrument  fails
and  then  we  put  another  temperature  instrument  on  orbit,  if  we
don’t  overlap  those  two  instruments,  how  are  we  then  to  interpret
what  the  new  instrument  says?  For  instance,  maybe  the  new  in-
strument  shows  temperature  increasing  even  more  rapidly.  Is  that
because it is a new instrument, or is that because of what the tem-
perature is doing?

So the issue of sustainability is the—is right at the core of what

we are addressing.

Ms. JOHNSON. Um-hum. Thank you.

PHYSICAL IMPROVEMENTS VS. ENVIRONMENTAL

IMPROVEMENTS

There  is  no  question  in  my  mind  about  climate  change.  If  you

live and breathe every day, you can observe it.

What—where  my  questions  still  are  is  if  we  don’t  find  much  of
the  reason  and  start  to  correct  that,  where  do  we  go  from  here?  I
went  over  and  looked  at  the  results  of  the  tsunami.  And  as  we  re-
turned,  the  latest  rumor  was  that  it  might  happen  in  California,
and so that was an urgency to see if they couldn’t get the observa-
tion network in place.

What  comes  next?  I  mean,  we  can  observe,  and  we  can  predict,
and I know that we have lost—we have saved a lot of lives by pre-
dicting,  but  we  haven’t  done  very  well  with  property.  I  am  fully
aware  that  if  we  had  worked  on  levies  when  we  were  supposed  to
back in New Orleans, it probably would not have been as bad. But

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

predictably,  would  it  have  come?  And—because,  according  to  the
simulations that we had observed, it was coming. And I don’t know
whether  we  concentrate  on  making  sure  that  levies  are  strong  or
that  we  concentrate  on  changing  something  in  the  environment
where  we  can  avoid  some  of  the  destruction  if  we  had  an  idea  of
what we needed to do.

Mr.  GERINGER.  Maybe  I  can  answer  it  in  a  little  different  way.
I  was  visiting  with  the  executive  of  King  County,  Washington
about  a  week  ago,  and  he  is  taking  an  approach  that  if  something
does  happen,  based  on  climate  change  and  causes  the  sea  level  to
rise,  what  could  be  causing  that,  it  could  be  the  greenhouse  gases.
So  they  are  taking  an  approach  from  two  different  angles.  One  is
to  reduce  the  amount  of  carbon  that  they  use  in  King  County,
which  includes  a  significant  part  of  Seattle,  Renton  you  know,
those—where  some  of  those  companies  are  that  we  hear  about,  re-
duce the amount of carbon and at the same time, based on the pre-
diction  of  sea  level  rise  by  2050,  raise  their  levies  to  where  there
will be no flooding. And then with the carbon that they have offset,
that  becomes  a  revenue-raiser  for  King  County.  They  can  sell  and
trade carbon credits.

So  they  are  doing  two  things.  One  is  they  are  decreasing  the
total  amount  of  greenhouse  gas,  anticipating  that  there  is  still
going  to  be  a  rise  in  sea  level,  and  over  time,  of  course—and  the
idea  is  that  it  flattens  out  or  at  least  declines.  So  they  are  taking
an  approach  like  that  where  they,  from  a  practical  point  of  view,
raise a little revenue but improve the situation as well.

Chairman GORDON. Thank you, sir.
The gentlelady’s time——
Ms. JOHNSON. Thank you.
Chairman GORDON.—has expired.
Mr. Bilbray is recognized for five minutes.

GLOBAL DIMMING
Mr. BILBRAY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Gentlemen,  I  come  from  an  air-regulatory  background,  the  Air
Resources  Board  in  California.  And  because  of  sensing  and  moni-
toring,  we  totally  changed  our  strategy  on  air  emissions.  We  had
grossly  underestimated  the  evaporative  emissions,  and  we  couldn’t
figure out what—where all it was coming from until we figured out
it wasn’t coming out of the tailpipe.

I  am—my  interest  here  is  what  you  are  proposing  is  giving  us

the tools to be able to develop and execute good policy.

And  Governor,  I  think  you  are  pointing  out  that  remote  sensing
gives us the ability to monitor where we may not have records. And
a  good  example  is  that  the  third  world.  So  many  people  say  the
third  world  is  not  a  major  factor  here.  It  is  because  we  don’t  have
any air indexing in the third world. And remote sensing may be the
only way for us to detect what is going on there.

The question I have, Dr. Moore, would be one of the new factors
that  have  been  thrown  out  is  the  concept  of  global  dimming.  And
some people may agree with it or totally ignore it, but I think that
we  have  got  to  remember  that  when  Roger  Revelle  talked  about
global  warming  20  years  ago,  some  people  wanted  to  ignore  him,
too. Does our—does the remote sensing that we are proposing here

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

give  us  the  ability  to  at  least  monitor,  maybe,  the  effects  of  global
dimming  and  how  particulate—suspended  particulates  may  be  af-
fecting or moderating the climate change at this time?

Dr.  MOORE.  Yes,  it  does,  Congressman.  It  directly  addresses  the

And  you  are  absolutely  correct  in  noting  that  the  question  of
global dimming is fundamental to climate change. It is also funda-
mental to public health.

The  issue  of  particulates  and  aerosols  work  the  climate  system

question.

both ways, both as a warming and as a cooling.

One of the missions that we recommend, which is called ACE, di-
rectly  focuses  on  this  question  of  aerosols  and  their  influence  on
the climate system.

Second,  we  are  also  recommending  a  geostationary  air  quality
mission,  which  I  think  would  address  some  of  the  question  that
major  urban  cities  are  going  to  have  as  to  how  much  of  the  pollu-
tion is local and how much of it is transcontinental.

Mr.  BILBRAY.  Okay.  And  that  is  essential  data.  I  appreciate  you
bringing  that—you  know,  pointing  that  out,  because  one  of  the
problems  I  have  had  with  federal  policies  on  a  lot  of  these  issues
was  like  the—mandate.  They  thought  it  was  good.  Within  24
months, California knew that the federal mandate was an environ-
mental  negative,  not  a  positive.  And  hopefully,  I  think  it  is  essen-
tial,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  this  issue  will  affect  the  total  strategy.  I
think  a  lot  of  people  are  saying,  ‘‘Just  do  something  about  global
warming.’’  Well,  we  could  be  doing  exactly  the  wrong  thing  at  the
wrong time if we don’t get the right facts.

And  in  fact,  right  now,  in  California,  we  are  moving  strategies
ahead  that  assumes  that  the  dirtiest  technologies  should  be  the
first eliminated. But that may be the worst thing we do.

So  hopefully,  you  will  be  able  to  give  us  the  information  so  that
we  not  only  are  well-intentioned,  but  we  are  smart  in  the  way  we
apply  this.  And  that  is  what  scares  me  to  death  is  this  rush  to  do
anything  could  end  up  creating  more  problems  than  an  informed
and  appropriate  approach  to  it.  And  that  is  essential  on  this.  And
I—and  hopefully  the  data  on  global  dimming  can  be  settled  before
we settle on a strategy.

Dr. Anthes.
Dr. ANTHES. Anthes.
Mr.  BILBRAY.  Anthes.  Dr.  Anthes,  let  me  just  say,  I  appreciate
you  talking  about  the  tropical  storm  issue,  because,  like  my  sci-
entists  at  Scripp  say,  it  is  interesting  that  last  year,  global  warm-
ing  caused  all  of  the  big  hurricanes,  but  this  year,  nobody  talked
about  it.  Well,  it  must  be  global  cooling,  because  we  didn’t  have
any.  And  I  appreciate  the  fact  that  you  keep  things  on  a  balanced
keel  here,  because  it  hurts  the  credibility  of  scientists  when  politi-
cians start throwing around your data without having the facts.

But I have a question for you.

REMOTE SENSING AND EARTHQUAKE ACTIVITY

I  come  from  the  State  of  California.  Hurricanes  and  tropical
storms  haven’t  historically  been  a  problem  for  us  because  of  the
cold water. That may change in the future. But you brought up the
issue  of  being  able  to  detect  tsunamis,  earthquakes,  and  other  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

lated seismatic activity that normally isn’t an—remote sensing isn’t
a big deal out—except maybe observation. How long do you propose
to use remote sensing to predict earthquakes, which then result in
tsunamis and all of the other activity you were talking about?

Dr. ANTHES. Okay. Well, that is a really good question, and I am
not a geologist, so I will just have to—but the—one of our missions,
which  measures,  very  precisely,  very  small  displacements  in  the
surface  of  the  Earth.  If  you  do  a  time  lapse  of  these—I  have  seen
these. If you do a time lapse of these, you can see the Earth breath-
ing.  In  fact,  I  can  show  you  valleys  in  California,  which  are
just——

Mr.  BILBRAY.  Much  like  the  same  way  we  measure  El  Nin˜ o  by

looking at the rise and fall of the ocean.

Dr.  ANTHES.  Of  the  sea  surface  height.  Right.  Well,  the  Earth  is
actually changing its elevation by centimeters over time. And if you
see—well,  first  of  all,  by  measuring  these—where  the  Earth  is
changing  its  elevation  and  pulsating,  these  are  active  geological
areas.  These  can  help  you,  as  I  understand  it,  increase  the  prob-
ability  of  saying,  ‘‘Well,  an  earthquake  is  going  to  occur  here,’’  or
‘‘A volcano is going to occur there,’’ and of course, also then monitor
tsunamis  when  they  actually  occur  because  of  the  change  of  ocean
levels.

Chairman  GORDON.  Doctor,  we  are  going  to  have  a  vote  pretty
soon, so if you don’t mind, we are going to—I think we should move
on here.

Mr.  BILBRAY.  No,  no.  I  just  don’t  know  how  you  are  going  to
measure  pulsating  in  Los  Angeles.  It  always  pulsates.  So  that  is
just a given.

Thank you very much.
Chairman GORDON. Dr. McNerney is recognized for five minutes.

POTENTIAL FOR PRIVATE OR INTERNATIONAL PARTNERSHIPS

IN REMOTE SENSING

Mr. MCNERNEY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
I  want  to  thank  the  distinguished  panel  for  their  work  in  this

area. I think it is a very important area.

I  was  intrigued  by  Dr.  Anthes’  comments  that  some  of  the
work—some of the missions will be to identify the small difference
between  radiation  to  the  Earth  from  the  sun  and  then  radiation
from the Earth as a consequence of that. And I think that is a very
important thing.

I  noticed  last  week  my  distinguished  colleague  from  southern—
from  Orange  County  asked  some  very  pointed  questions  about
wanting  to  know  how—exactly  how  much  of  the  carbon  dioxide  in
the Earth’s atmosphere was created by human activity. And I know
that  is  a  very  complicated  question,  and  the  balance—or  the  issue
between science and politics is a tricky issue. And it is our respon-
sibility  to  have  sort  of  a  responsible  pathway  between  those.  And
I  think  this  is  exactly  one  way  that  we  can  move  forward  to  an-
swering those kinds of very difficult and detailed questions.

So  one  of  the  things  I  want  to  know  is  is  there  any  opportunity
in  private  and  international  partnerships  to  help  us  move  forward
in this—in these kinds of missions.

Dr. Moore.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

ties?

Dr.  MOORE.  I  think  that  there  is,  and  in  our  Chapter  3  where
we  talk  about  implementing  the  missions,  the  very  first  thing  we
explore  is  leveraging  foreign  partnerships.  And  if  you  are,  for  in-
stance,  looking  at  something  like  the  measurement  of  carbon  diox-
ide  that  you  mentioned  and  where  is  it  coming  from  and  where  is
it  going  to,  that  is  an  ideal  example  of  what  we  could  do  inter-
nationally.  The—using  a  synthetic-aperture  radar  to  get  the  slight
differences in the elevation of the planet and how those might lead
to  earthquakes,  that  is  another  great  example  of  where  we  could
collaborate  internationally.  Our  European  colleagues  have  made
great advances with synthetic-aperture radar. And so this would be
another,  because  these  are  global  issues.  They  are  not  just  issues
to  one  area  of  the  planet.  Earthquakes  occur  globally.  CO2 occurs
globally.

Mr.  MCNERNEY.  How  about  the  private  partnership  opportuni-

Dr. MOORE. I think the private partnership opportunities are ex-
traordinary,  particularly  when  you  look  at  issues  of  land  remote
sensing, hyperspectral imaging. That looks at the reflected sunlight
in  many  different  wavelengths.  This  is  a  marvelous  item  for  fore-
casting  crop  diseases.  This  is  right  on  the  border  of  what  could  be
done commercially, and I think the Governor has really spoken out
on this. This is a great opportunity.

Mr.  GERINGER.  One  other  comment  I  would  make  is  if  we  don’t
keep  up  and  we  lose  our  edge  in  competitiveness,  we  lose  two
things.  With  international  cooperation,  such  as  through  the  Global
Earth  Observation  System  of  Systems,  we  develop  relationships  so
that we can understand and trust what we are getting back. Other-
wise,  we  could  be  excluded,  and  the  competition,  then,  leads  the
way.  Who  would  we  rely  on  to  obtain  the  information  we  have  no
capacity  to  produce?  So  we  need  that  kind  of  participatory  oppor-
tunity as well as the leadership to make it happen.

Mr. MCNERNEY. Okay. I yield the balance of my time.
Chairman GORDON. Thank you.
And  the  gentleman  from  Michigan,  Dr.  Ehlers,  is  recognized  for

five minutes.

Mr. EHLERS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
First of all, Dr. Anthes, I am very pleased to hear your comment
about  the  Earth  rising  and  falling  several  centimeters  a  day,  and
now I know why I feel taller on some days than others.

I also presume that my weight varies, because I am further from

the center of the Earth.

At  any  rate,  more  seriously,  I  can  believe  that  a  physicist  just
made this comment. I am very concerned about NPOESS, and we—
you  have  talked  about  that  in  response  to  some  other  questions.  I
am very worried about the removal of some of the climate sensors.
And clearly, we are not going to be—not going to have an optimized
system.  They  are  being  removed  simply  because  the  cost  of  the
project got too great, and we had to get somewhere.

You have talked a bit—Dr. Moore, in fact, just mentioned in the
last  question  international  work.  What  efforts  are  being  made  or
what  do—efforts  do  you  think  should  be  made  to  try  to  get  more
international  cooperation  in  some  of  these  satellites?  I  know  other
nations  are  putting  up  their  own  satellites,  but  in  a  case  like  this

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

where  the  entire  international  community  would  benefit  from  the
additional  climate  observations  that  NPOESS  could  make,  do  you
believe our nation should aggressively pursue the possibility of get-
ting  assistance,  cooperation,  and  money  from  other  nations?  And
would we be likely to succeed in that effort?

I would appreciate any comments you have.
Dr. ANTHES. Well, I will take—a quick answer.
Absolutely,  we  should.  We  should  try  all  of  these  avenues  and

approaches.

The  United  States,  historically,  has  been  the  world  leader  in  ob-
servations  from  space.  In  fact,  the  Europeans  probably,  I  could
argue, are making better use of the observations that we take than
we  are  making—them  ourselves,  and  this  gets  to  the  Governor’s
comments about it is more than just observations. It is how you use
the observations.

International  cooperation  is  a  two-edged  sword.  It  can  save
money  and  distribute  resources  more  equitably  and  cooperation
and  sharing  and  all  of  that.  But  there  are  other  issues  that  make
these international programs hard to manage. If one partner has—
runs into funding problems, it jeopardizes the mission. If a country,
which  is  friendly  now,  turns  unfriendly  10  years  from  now,  you
may  not  be  able  to  get  their  data.  There  are  ITAR  issues  about
transferring technology to foreign countries.

So  yes,  I  agree  we  should  pursue  it  aggressively.  Probably  it  is
not a substitute for having our own, robust program. But we should
try to leverage the international partners wherever we can.

Mr. EHLERS. Other comments?
Dr. MOORE. Just to note that that appears to be part of the plan
to  mitigate  the  NPOESS  difficulties  is  to  rely  on  the  mid-morning
orbit from the Europeans. But I also second what Rick Anthes just
said, that it is a two-edged sword.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Now  to  what  extent  did  your  group,  in  doing  the
Decadal  Survey,  consider  these  issues?  Did  you  come  up  with  any
particular  recommendations  on  international  cooperation  and  how
we should proceed with it?

Dr.  ANTHES.  Well,  we  said,  basically,  what  you  just  said.  We
should  try  every  single  opportunity  that  we  can  and  try  to  reduce
this  overall  cost  by  seeking  international  partners.  And  we  didn’t
go any further than that. We didn’t say mission number 13 should
be an international one——

Mr. EHLERS. Right.
Dr.  ANTHES.—but  all  of  them  should  be  considered.  And  if  the
international  community  comes  up  with  one  mission  that  reduces
the  need  for  us  to  do  the  same  thing,  we  should  consider  lowering
that in priority.

Mr. EHLERS. Do all nations freely share data with each other——
Dr. ANTHES. No.
Mr. EHLERS.—in these climate missions, or is it——
Dr. ANTHES. No.
Mr. EHLERS. Is it held very closely? Yes.
Mr.  GERINGER.  One  comment  I  would  make  there,  Congressman
Ehlers,  is  if  we  don’t  have  standardized  protocols,  data  formats,
and how we store and access information like that, it is not a mat-
ter  of  who  is  willing  to  share.  It  is  a  matter  of  whether  you  phys-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

ically  can  or  the  technology  isn’t  there  to  extract  or  transform  to
where you can use the data.

So  the  minimum  we  could  do  is  establish  standards  and  proto-
cols,  and  that  is  where  the  Integrated  Earth  Observation  System
was intended to head with the international cooperations. Just hav-
ing  the  data  in  the  format  where  you  can  use  it  is  a  simple  step.
Mr.  EHLERS.  And  the  other  problem  is  getting  all  of  the  data
down  and  analyzed  quickly  and  properly.  That  is  something  I  am
also concerned about with NPOESS.

I yield back, Mr. Chairman.
Chairman GORDON. Thank you, Dr. Ehlers.
I think our final questioner will be our Vice Chair, Mr. Lipinski.

IMPACT ON AMERICAN COMPETITIVENESS

Mr. LIPINSKI. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I know we are running
short on time. I am going to make a quick question. I am not sure
it is going to be a quick answer.

But, Dr. Anthes and Dr. Moore, in the report, it says, ‘‘At a time
of  unprecedented  need,  the  Nation’s  Earth  observation  satellite
programs, once the envy of the world, are in disarray.’’

I  have  a  more  general  question.  What  impact  does  this  have—
do you see this having an impact on American competitiveness? Do
you  think  it  has  a  broader  impact  on  our  nation  in  that  manner?

Dr. ANTHES. Well, that is a really good question.
The—one  of  the  points  we  try  to  make  in  the  Decadal  Survey  is
that these observations are useful to society and useful in manage-
ment of resources, whether it is energy resources, water resources,
supporting agriculture. So it—there is an efficiency issue here that
we  can  become,  as  a  nation,  more  efficient  if  we  have  these  better
weather  forecasts,  seasonal  outlooks,  we  know  how  to  buy  energy
and  store  it  for  the  cold  spells  coming  up.  And  so  I  think  you  can
make  a  very  good  case  that  these  observations  of  the  environment
do affect, in a positive way, the U.S. economy, making us more effi-
cient and so thereby improving our competitiveness.

My colleagues may want to add to that.
Dr.  MOORE.  I  think  there  is  another  issue,  also,  that  the  declin-
ing  budgets  for  Earth  science  at  NASA  send  a  signal  to  our  grad-
uate  students  and  to  our  undergraduates  as  to  what  fields  should
they go into. And it is very tough to convince a young student that
this  is  the  direction  that  you  want  to  take  your  life,  because  they
say, ‘‘Well, there is no future in that.’’

So  I  think  that  there  is  a  fundamental  issue  as  to  why  students
may not be going into Earth science or mathematics or physics, be-
cause they look at the trend. They are quantifying.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Having spent a few years in graduate school on my
way  to  a  Ph.D.,  finally,  after  many  years,  I  understand  the—you
know,  what  impact  that  does  have  on  what  people  are—what  stu-
dents are pursuing.

Thank you.
Chairman  GORDON.  Well,  let  me  just  say,  this  really  was  an  ex-
cellent panel. And I thank you very much for this very informative
meeting  today.  I  want  to  particularly  thank  the  Co-Chairs  of  the
Decadal  Survey  for  not  just  today  but  for  two  and  a  half  years  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

hard,  but  important,  work.  This  is  a—really,  a  product  that  we
need  to  have  to  try  to  move  this  decision-making  process  forward.
And Governor, you were a great breath of fresh air with the real-
world approach, and let me please encourage you to continue to be
active in these issues.

I  understand  that  everyone  who  has  wanted  to  have  questions

has done so.

Mr.  Hall,  once  again,  another  good  hearing.  And  if  you  have  no

more questions, then we will adjourn this hearing.

[Whereupon, at 11:40 a.m., the Committee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(77)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Richard  A.  Anthes,  President,  University  Corporation  for  Atmospheric
Research (UCAR); Co-Chair, Committee on Earth Science and Applications from
Space, National Research Council, The National Academies

Questions submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. NASA’s  experience  with  mission  cost  estimates  is  to  be  kind,  not  good.  Many
missions  have  seen  their  costs  exceed  even  the  most  generous  estimates.  What
level  of  confidence  would  you  associate  with  the  ‘‘rough’’  cost  estimates  ascribed
to each of the recommended missions?

A1. The Committee stands by its estimates. The level of confidence associated with
the cost estimates was given in Box 2–2 of the Decadal Survey report. The cost esti-
mates are believed to vary from ±  50 percent for the smallest missions to ±  30 per-
cent  for  the  larger  mission  category.  The  survey  report  notes  that,  in  general,  cost
estimates  depend  directly  on  the  exact  measurement  requirements  for  the  eventual
missions.  It  also  notes  that  the  cost  uncertainty  rises  for  missions  scheduled  later
in the next decade and for missions with the greatest technology development needs.
One historically large source of cost uncertainty is associated with technology de-
velopment.  When  a  mission’s  implementation  depends  on  a  technological  advance,
there’s  a  risk  that  the  mission  will  need  to  be  delayed  and  that  costs  will  increase
if  the  advance  doesn’t  proceed  as  expected.  Effective  mitigation  of  this  cost  risk  in-
volves  early  technology  investment—and  this  is  something  that  was  strongly  en-
dorsed  in  our  report.  The  committee  suggests  that  NASA  begin  technology  invest-
ments  early  to  ensure  the  needed  technologies  are  available  before  the  mission  im-
plementation  proceeds  to  the  point  where  schedule  delays  incur  large  costs  due  to
the  large  number  of  individuals  entrained  by  the  project  (the  so-called  ‘‘standing
army’’ problem).
Q1a. Do your cost estimates represent a full mission cost, to include the cost of build-
ing  the  satellite,  launch  services,  operations,  data  analysis  and  research,  and
reserves?

A1a. The  estimates  include  pre-launch  costs  associated  with  the  instrument(s),  the
spacecraft  and  the  launch  vehicle,  system  engineering  and  spacecraft  integration,
science  algorithm  and  ground  data  system  development,  and  education  and  out-
reach. Post-launch costs included mission operations, data downlink, processing and
archiving,  science  data  development  and  validation.  Post-launch  activity  duration
was assumed to be three years for the NASA-recommended missions and five years
for the NOAA-recommended missions.

These cost estimates do not represent a ‘full’ mission cost because they do not in-
clude  the  cost  of  the  scientific  analysis  of  the  mission  data.  These  costs  were  as-
signed to the mission-supporting part of the NASA and NOAA budgets.
Q2. You  recommend  that  NASA  increase  its  support  for  Research  and  Analysis  to
a  level  commensurate  with  ongoing  and  planned  missions.  What  metric  should
NASA  use  to  gauge  R&A  spending?  Number  of  missions  flying?  Percentage  of
total  program  funding?  How  would  you  characterize  the  level  of  R&A  funding
currently provided in the Earth Sciences program?

A2. Historically  NASA  has  invested  approximately  50  percent  of  its  funds  for  mis-
sion-supporting  research.  In  the  event  that  the  NASA  budget  was  restored  to  its
year 2000 funding levels, the committee is recommending that the R&A and mission
budgets be increased equally (i.e., maintain an approximate 50/50 split). This is our
suggestion  for  the  zero’th  order  metric  for  gauging  R&A  spending.  If  you  want  to
consider  metrics  of  the  impact  of  R&A  funding,  some  metrics  for  gauging  this  im-
pact  are  the  amount  of  satellite  data  available  being  used  for  analysis,  the  number
of  researchers  supported,  the  number  of  peer-reviewed  publications  resulting  from
the missions, and the amount of satellite data being used effectively in weather fore-
cast models and other applications.
Q3. In your testimony you state that the U.S. needs to continue to improve its climate
models because those models are used in predicting El Nin˜ o and other seasonal
weather  patterns  important  to  energy,  water  and  agriculture  management.  Spe-
cifically which recommendations in the Decadal Survey relate to improving sea-
sonal weather predictions?

A3. The  following  missions  are  identified  as  improving  seasonal  weather  pre-
dictions,  having  direct  impacts  on  energy,  water,  and/or  agriculture  management:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

GPSRO  (temperature  and  water  vapor  profiles),  GRACE–II  (changes  in  aquifers),
HyspIRI (nutrients and water status of vegetation, soil health), PATH (temperature
and water vapor profiles, sea surface temperature), LIST (global shifts in vegetation
patterns,  effects  of  land  management),  SCLP  (water  storage  in  snowpacks),  SMAP
(soil moisture effect on vegetation and freeze/thaw state), SWOT (lake, wetland, and
reservoir  storage),  3D–Winds  (three  dimensional  tropospheric  winds,  improves  El
Nin˜ o forecasts), and XOVWM (surface winds over oceans).
Q4. In your testimony you say that due to declining budgets for Earth-observing sat-
ellites,  air  quality  forecasts  will  become  less  accurate  in  the  near  future.  Please
elaborate  on  which  satellites  currently  provide  information  important  for  air
quality forecasts and why you believe this capability will be compromised in the
near future.

A4. Air  quality  is  determined  by  how  much  particulate  matter  (aerosols)  and  trace
gases  (ozone,  NO2 and  volatile  organics)  are  in  the  air.  Air  quality  forecasting  is  a
relatively new field that combines chemistry and aerosol models with weather mod-
els,  which  are  used  to  move  pollutants  around.  Aerosol  measurements  are  being
made by MODIS on Aqua and Terra, MISR on Terra, and OMI on Aura. Trace gas
measurements  are  being  made  by  Aura.  The  Aura  measurements  include  ozone,
NO2 and  hydrocarbons  (formaldehyde).  These  measurements  are  being  used  in  air
quality forecast models on an experimental basis.

In  the  future,  NPOESS  will  be  making  column  ozone  measurements  with  the
OMPS instrument, however without the OMPS-limb sounding capability, we cannot
estimate vertical profiles of tropospheric ozone. The OMPS limb instrument was de-
leted from the NPOESS payload in response to Nunn-McCurdy. OMPS will also not
produce  NO2,  hydrocarbons,  or  aerosols  as  Aura  OMI  does—the  instrument  is  not
capable  of  making  those  measurements.  We  will  still  get  some  aerosol  information
from  VIIRS  on  NPOESS,  but  no  information  over  clouds  or  bright  surfaces  (like
deserts)  because  VIIRS  lacks  the  near  UV  channels  used  by  OMI  for  those  kinds
of aerosol measurements.
Q5. Acquiring,  storing,  and  managing  data  comes  at  a  significant  cost.  As  we  fly
more  sensors  and  gather  more  and  precise  measurements,  how  likely  is  it  that
the research community will argue that these capabilities must evolve into long-
term  data  continuity  missions?  Of  the  seventeen  recommended  missions,  how
many of these would be one-time only missions that would not generate demand
from  the  community  for  follow-on  missions  to  maintain  data  continuity?  Are
NASA  and  NOAA  at  risk  of  being  tasked  with  flying  a  greater  number  oper-
ational missions and gathering an increasing number of data sets?

A5. This  is  a  great  question,  and  one  I  cannot  easily  answer  because  the  answer
depends upon how useful the research observations are. Every research observation
should  be  considered  as  a  candidate  for  ultimately  becoming  part  of  an  operational
or sustained measurement system. The NRC has recommended in a previous report
(Satellite Observations of the Earth’s Environment-Accelerating the Transition of Re-
search to Operations, NRC 2003) that an interagency transition office be set up that
carefully  evaluates  the  potential  for  every  research  observation  to  become  oper-
ational. Cost-benefit considerations obviously will determine which observations are
most  valuable  and  should  become  operational.  Not  all  research  observations  should
be expected to become operational or sustained.

Questions submitted by Representative Ken Calvert

Decadal Survey Recommendations
Q1. How should NASA and NOAA interpret the recommended mission list? Your re-
port suggests this list as a minimum set and notes the imperative that each mis-
sion  be  flown.  But  based  on  the  experience  of  other  decadal  surveys,  NASA  has
been  able  to  fund  only  a  fraction  of  recommended  missions.  Should  NASA  and
NOAA  prioritize  the  missions  in  the  order  listed?  If  so,  which  mission  do  you
believe should be a priority?

A1. The  Committee  is  acutely  aware  that  evolving  constraints  have  historically  al-
tered  well-laid  plans.  To  respond,  we  established  a  series  of  decision  strategies  and
rules  to  be  used  for  guiding  any  programmatic  restructure.  The  study  of  Earth  is
a  system  science—the  knowledge  we  seek  derives  from  the  mission  set  as  a  whole,
not  any  single  mission.  The  current  list  thus  includes  no  prioritization  other  than
a  recommended  ordering  for  launch,  which  itself  is  a  prioritization.  Changing  the
program is not as simple as dropping one mission from the bottom of a list and re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

taining  the  others;  any  single  change  implies  the  need  to  readjust  the  overall  pro-
gram. For this reason, our guidelines clearly state that such programmatic changes
should be subject to advice from the broad community of Earth scientists and users.
At  small  budget  deficiencies  (e.g.,  ∼10  percent),  the  proposed  schedule  can  be
stretched  out.  At  larger  deficiencies,  the  guidelines  for  adjustments  to  the  missions
come into play.

We  emphasize  again  that  the  Committee  believes  the  proposed  mission  set  is  in-
deed one the Nation both needs and can afford. It is a minimum mission set in the
sense  that  its  scope  and  budget  meet  an  expectation  of  ‘‘reasonableness.’’  Anything
less  than  the  proposed  program  falls  short  of  what  we  believe  this  nation  should
reasonably pursue; it would place us at risk for maintaining scientific progress and
achieving expected societal benefits. Additional budget enhancements should not be
ruled out, and would support an even stronger program, with missions of great sci-
entific  merit  and  substantial  societal  benefit  readily  identified  as  new  resources
come available.
Q2. The  Decadal  Survey  recommends  restoring  some  climate  sensors  to  NOAA’s
NPOESS  program.  This  committee  held  three  hearings  on  NPOESS  in  the
109th  Congress  and  we  learned  that  it’s  a  troubled  program,  nearly  $3  billion
over-budget, and it faces tremendous technical challenges just to be able to meet
the  Nation’s  weather  forecasting  needs.  Why  should  we  add  even  more  risk  and
potential cost to this program by restoring the climate sensors? What is the value
to our citizens that would make the risk worth it?

A2. Important as weather sensors are, climate sensors are also important and can-
not be neglected. Climate variability and change are among the most important en-
vironmental  and  societal  factors  affecting  our  future.  So  we  have  to  meet  the  chal-
lenges  of  risk  and  cost  of  restoring  key  climate  sensors.  This  may  be  accomplished
in  part  by  restoring  a  few  climate  sensors  to  NPOESS,  AND  launching  some  new
missions as described in our report.

Climate  monitoring  requires  a  continuous  series  of  high  quality  calibrated  data.
The solar irradiance sensor and the Earth radiation budget sensor are key to under-
standing climate change and are part of an unbroken series of measurements start-
ing in the early 1980s. The Committee recommended restoring these climate sensors
to  NPOESS  because  under  the  current  Nunn-McCurdy  only  the  cost  of  the  sensor
was  required—the  IPO  promised  to  pay  for  integration—this  is  the  lowest  cost  ap-
proach.  But  if  further  deterioration  of  the  NPOESS  program  occurs,  it  makes  more
sense  to  place  these  sensors  on  small  spacecraft  as  has  been  done  in  the  past  (e.g.,
ACRIMSAT).

Venture Class Missions
Q3. Your report recommends creation of a new competed mission line (Venture class)
to replace the Earth System Science Pathfinder program, arguing that the latter
has  become  a  ‘‘competitive  means  for  implementing  NASA’s  strategic  missions.’’
Could you elaborate on this criticism?

A3. The  recommendation  for  a  Venture  class  of  missions  is  to  encourage  proposals
for exploratory missions that are ‘‘out of the box’’—ideas that the experts in NASA,
on  our  committee,  or  in  the  broader  community  have  not  yet  thought  of.  These
should  be  creative,  revolutionary  ideas  that  could  have  transformative  effects  on
science and applications. Venture class missions are NOT intended as a way to im-
plement any of the 17 recommended missions.

Weather Prediction
Q4. NOAA  was  a  co-sponsor  of  the  Decadal  Survey,  yet  your  report  has  only  three
missions for NOAA compared to 15 for NASA. NOAA provides weather forecasts
and warnings for the Nation—given its vital role, why did you have so few rec-
ommendations for NOAA?

A4. There  were  a  number  of  factors  that  led  to  this  result.  Missions  that  were  as-
signed  to  NOAA  were  those  that  were  relatively  low  cost,  ready  to  go  operational,
AND  met  a  large  number  of  the  Panel’s  prioritization  criteria.  The  fact  that  the
NPOESS  and  GOES  programs  were  (and  still  are)  in  a  state  of  flux,  with  very  un-
certain  budgets,  was  also  a  factor.  Finally,  the  emphasis  of  the  present  plans  for
NPOESS and GOES is on weather forecasts and warnings, and so many of our rec-
ommendations addressed other important Earth science issues.
Q5. In  your  testimony  you  state  that  due  to  declining  budgets  for  Earth-observing
satellites, weather forecasts may start becoming less accurate. However, last year

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

this  committee  heard  from  the  federal  agencies  responsible  for  weather  fore-
casting  (NOAA  and  the  Air  Force)  that  maintaining  operational  weather  fore-
casting  capabilities  is  their  top  priority  and  that  future  plans  for  weather  sat-
ellites such as NPOESS and GOES–R will be just as good as, if not much better
than, current weather satellites. Your claim contradicts these officials, so please
elaborate on why you believe weather forecasts may start becoming less accurate.
A5. Please  let  me  be  blunt  here.  Unfortunately,  the  recent  track  record  of  projec-
tions of the federal agencies responsible for space observing programs has not been
reassuring, and even now the future of NPOESS and GOES, the observational foun-
dations of our weather prediction capabilities from space, are uncertain. The steady
increase of forecast and warning accuracies over the past 30 years has not been an
accident—it has been the result of more and better observations and models. If the
number  of  observations,  which  peaked  in  about  2006,  continues  to  decline,  at  some
point  the  trend  of  increasing  forecast  accuracy  will  reverse  and  the  forecasts  and
warning  accuracies  will  begin  to  decline.  We  do  not  know  when  or  if  this  unfortu-
nate point will be reached, but it is a risk as I stated unless we take action.
Q6. Please  describe  some  examples  of  NASA  research  missions  from  the  1970’s  or

1980’s that demonstrated capabilities now used for operational purposes.

A6. All  of  the  current  major  operational  satellite  programs  in  NOAA  can  be  traced
to NASA missions. The current Polar orbiting operational satellites (POES) were de-
rived from NASA’s TIROS–N satellite launched in 1978. The NOAA GOES program
can  be  traced  back  to  the  NASA  Synchronous  Meteorological  Satellite  launched  in
1974. Finally, the Landsat series of environmental sensors can be traced back to the
NASA Earth Resources Technology Satellite launched in 1972.
Q7. One key factor in the program design and cost of new missions is the availability
of  expendable  launch  vehicles.  NASA  acquires  launch  vehicles  for  science  mis-
sions  from  commercial  providers.  How  well  is  your  recommended  mission  set
matched to existing and planned commercial launch vehicle capabilities?

A7. Launch vehicle availability and cost have become moving targets. Launch vehi-
cle  costs,  in  particular,  are  very  hard  to  pin  down.  The  committee  used  the  best
available  launch  vehicle  cost  information  (based  on  recently  launched  and  known
costs  for  currently  planned  missions).  Specifically,  the  Decadal  survey  missions  as-
sumed the use of Pegasus, Taurus, or Delta II/IV launch vehicles. However, forward-
looking  launch  vehicle  cost  estimates  are  subject  to  a  large  degree  of  uncertainty.
Spiraling  launch  costs  threaten  the  accuracy  of  any  cost  estimate  until  a  contract
is signed, and represent a large uncertainty in any cost estimate.

The  futures  of  the  launch  vehicles  assumed  by  the  panel  are  uncertain,  and  this
is  a  troublesome  situation.  If  moderate  capability  launch  vehicles  are  not  available
at  a  reasonable  cost,  an  important  element  of  programmatic  robustness—our  deci-
sion to recommend more, smaller missions rather than fewer many-instrument mis-
sions—becomes compromised. Should Delta-II class launch vehicles become unavail-
able, for example, the likely mitigation would be to pursue ‘‘co-manifested’’ launches,
where  multiple  satellites  share  a  larger  launch  vehicle.  This  is  not  as  easy  or
straight  forward  as  it  might  sound,  as  larger  launch  vehicles  generally  have  larger
vibrational  loads  during  launch  (meaning  that  the  satellite  structural  design  would
have  to  be  adapted),  and  would  require  ride-sharing  missions  to  utilize  similar  or-
bits.

The committee is aware of private sector efforts to build low cost launch vehicles,
which, if successful, will substantially mitigate these concerns. However, at present
such launch vehicles have not been demonstrated successfully. The availability and
cost of launch vehicles for scientific missions remains a serious concern of the com-
mittee.

Interagency Cooperation
Q8. What  unique  skills  and  expertise  do  you  think  NASA  has  in  Earth-observing
systems,  and  are  the  necessary  processes  for  interagency  cooperation  in  place  to
allow  the  country  to  benefit  from  those  NASA  capabilities?  Can  you  please  do
the same for NOAA?

A8. In  answering  this  question,  I  must  necessarily  generalize  my  response.  NASA
and NOAA, while having great records overall, do not have spotless records. Never-
theless,  both  agencies  have  many  capabilities,  skills,  and  expertise  to  be  leveraged
for Earth observation systems.

NASA has a long history of pioneering Earth research observation from space and
in laying the groundwork for operational systems (see # 11, above). NASA expertise

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

is  primarily  in  technology,  science,  and  engineering.  NASA  has  demonstrated  capa-
bility  to  manage  technology  infusions  into  missions,  manage  externally-developed
technology  contracts,  and  manage  commercial  suppliers  and  partner  contracts  with
strong  oversight.  The  more  extensive  competitive  and  peer-reviewed  mission  selec-
tion  process  at  NASA  has  allowed  for  a  more  complete  vetting  of  mission  require-
ments, risks, and costs. NOAA has a strong history of operating ground systems for
its  operational  programs,  distributing  data  to  a  wide  range  of  users,  and  producing
decision-support  tools  and  capabilities  to  directly  serve  well-specified  needs.  NOAA
mission implementation typically is provided by a commercial contractor, with vary-
ing degrees of oversight.

In  terms  of  knowing  and  understanding  their  user  communities,  NASA  is  tightly
connected  with  the  science  and  research  community,  while  NOAA  is  more  tightly
connected  with  its  operational  end-users  (meteorologists,  the  public,  and  decision-
makers).

In order to use the strengths of both NASA and NOAA in a manner which maxi-
mizes  benefit  to  society,  interagency  cooperation  is  essential.  Currently,  the  nec-
essary  processes  are  not  completely  in  place  to  optimize  interagency  cooperation.
That  is  why  the  Decadal  Survey  recommends  that  the  Office  of  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Policy,  in  collaboration  with  the  relevant  agencies,  and  in  consultation  with
the  scientific  community,  should  develop  and  implement  a  plan  for  achieving  and
sustaining  global  Earth  observations.  This  plan  should  recognize  the  complexity  of
differing  agency  roles,  responsibilities,  and  capabilities  as  well  as  the  lessons  from
implementation of the Landsat, EOS, and NPOESS programs.

Among the key challenges confronting the two agencies are (1) the need for long-
term, continuous, stable research focused observations of the Earth system that are
distinct from the observations needed for operational weather prediction and (2) the
need to systematically develop future operational systems in addition to the one for
weather prediction. In order to address these challenges NASA and NOAA must im-
prove  their  interaction  early  in  the  design  process  and  overcome  the  natural  dis-
connect  that  occurs  because  the  two  agencies  have  independent  budget  formulation
processes and accounting systems.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Berrien  Moore  III,  University  Distinguished  Professor,  Director,  Insti-
tute  for  the  Study  of  Earth,  Oceans,  and  Space,  University  of  New  Hampshire;
Co-Chair,  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space,  National
Research Council, The National Academies

Question submitted by Chairman Bart Gordon
Q1. Please elaborate on the consequences of not executing the program recommended
by the Decadal Survey, especially with respect to the societal applications of the
observations  and  the  importance  of  preserving  particular  time  series,  such  as
total solar irradiance.

A1. The consequence is simply that without the information, and then the scientific
community  will  not  have  the  basis  for  providing  information  to  the  country.  It  is
hard to point to a specific consequence since there will continue to be some informa-
tion  on  the  planet  from  other  sources.  It  is  a  bit  like  the  question,  what  are  the
consequences  if  we  did  not  conduct  a  census  or  monitor  economic  indicators.  How-
ever,  the  question  is  certainly  reasonable,  and  I  shall  address  it  by  focusing  on  se-
lected missions.

After CERES ceases on TRIMM and Total Solar Irradiance sensor on Glory, then
we  would  cease  to  have  the  most  basic  climate  forcing  information,  Given  the  fact
that we ‘‘know’’ that the concentration of greenhouses gases will continue to increase
in  the  atmosphere  for  at  least  the  next  50  years,  and  that  this  change  will  force
a  change  in  the  Earth  energy  balance,  then  we  must  monitor  that  energy  balance
and the solar output, if we are going to be able to make credible climate statements
including forecasts. This is the reason, we recommend the CLARREO Mission.

Another example, the ASCENDS mission: We know without any question that the
atmospheric  concentration  of  CO2 has  risen  by  almost  40  percent  since  the  middle
of the last century, and that the cause of this rise is primarily fossil fuel combustion
and  secondarily  land-use  change.  We  also  know  that  about  50  percent  of  the  re-
leased  CO2 from  fossil  fuel  combustion  and  land-use  change  is  no  longer  in  the  at-
mosphere  because  it  has  been  sequestered  by  the  land  biosphere  and  the  oceans  in
approximately  equal  proportions.  However,  the  proportional  balance  between  land
and oceans varies in time and space. The current state of the science cannot account
for the growth rate and inter-annual variations of atmospheric CO2 with confidence.
The variability of the rate of increase in the concentration of CO2 in the atmosphere
cannot  be  explained  by  the  variability  in  fossil  fuel  use;  rather  it  appears  to  pri-
marily  reflect  changes  in  terrestrial  ecosystems  that  are  connected  with  large-scale
weather and climate modes. Finally and most importantly, we do not know the geo-
graphic  distribution  of  the  land  and  ocean  sources  and  sinks  of  CO2.  This  uncer-
tainty  is  important.  As  nations  seek  to  develop  strategies  to  manage  their  carbon
emissions  and  sequestration,  the  capacity  to  quantify  the  present-day  regional  car-
bon sources/sinks and to understand the underlying mechanisms are central to pre-
diction of future levels of CO2, and thereby, informed policy decisions, sequestration
monitoring and carbon trading.

The current set of direct in situ atmospheric observations is far too sparse for this
determination; moreover, the upcoming Orbiting Carbon Observatory, which will be
a ‘‘Pathfinder’’ for ASCENDS, cannot make these measurements (because of limita-
tions of sunlight) over many of the primary fossil fuel burning areas (Moscow, Lon-
don,  etc.)  in  the  winter  time  nor  is  it  able  to  make  any  nighttime  measurements
and  hence  OCO  will  not  be  able  to  determine  regional  sources  and  sinks  of  CO2.
ASCENDS  will  provide  the  measurements  necessary  to  make  this  regional  deter-
mination.

Similar statements can be made for every mission—specific information is needed
(like  sources  and  sinks  for  carbon  dioxide)  and  specific  missions  are  recommended
to obtain this information. We believe and the Survey documents that each mission
addresses  important  questions  by  society.  Without  the  information,  then  we  will  be
less equipped to address a specific societal issue. We also framed the entire program
at a budget level for Earth observation that is comparable to the levels of the 1990s.

Questions submitted by Representative Ralph M. Hall
Q1. NASA’s  experience  with  mission  cost  estimates  is,  to  be  kind,  not  good.  Many
missions  have  seen  their  costs  exceed  even  the  most  generous  estimates.  What
level  of  confidence  would  you  associate  with  the  ‘‘rough’’  cost  estimates  ascribed
to each of the recommended missions?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

Do your cost estimates represent a full mission cost, to include the cost of build-
ing the satellite, launch services, operations, data analysis and research, and re-
serves?

A1. We asked experts at Goddard, JPL, and Langley to provide informal cost anal-
ysis,  not  by  particular  mission  advocates,  but  by  seasoned  mission  planners  who
evaluated the costs of all proposed missions in a consistent objective way. These cost
estimates  were  then  reviewed  by  members  of  the  survey  team,  some  of  who  have
extensive  industrial  experience  in  spacecraft  design.  There  were  also  external  re-
viewers  of  the  survey  with  mission  management  experience,  and  they  did  not  find
the cost estimates to be unreasonable. The mission’s costs provided in Part II of the
Report,  do  not  include  ground  costs  such  as  data  analysis  and  longer-term  mission
management;  however,  these  costs  are  included  in  the  growth  wedge  that  we  rec-
ommend in the ‘‘Mission Supporting’’ portion of the budget in Chapter Two.

Most important, the Decadal Survey is informing NASA, NOAA, USGS; Congress,
and  the  American  public  what  measurements  need  to  be  made  and  what  missions
flown so that we can understand our planet and apply this understanding to societal
benefits—benefits that will repay the Nation many times over. This answer does not
change even if our cost estimates have small or modest systematic errors. Moreover,
we  recommend  in  Chapter  Three  of  the  Decadal  Survey  steps  to  take  if  costs  grow
beyond our estimates.
Q2. You  recommend  that  NASA  increase  its  support  for  Research  and  Analysis  to
a  level  commensurate  with  ongoing  and  planned  missions.  What  metric  should
NASA  use  to  gauge  R&A  spending?  Number  of  missions  flying?  Percentage  of
total  program  funding?  How  would  you  characterize  the  level  of  R&A  funding
currently provided in the Earth Sciences program?

A2. I  would  recommend  that  we  rest  R  and  A,  in  real  terms,  to  the  level  in  2000
budget.  The  accomplishments  of  the  1990s  were  extraordinary  and,  in  fact,  this  is
what we are exploiting today.
Q3. Acquiring,  storing,  and  managing  data  comes  at  a  significant  cost.  As  we  fly
more  sensors  and  gather  more  and  precise  measurements,  how  likely  is  it  that
the research community will argue that these capabilities must evolve into long-
term data continuity missions?

A3. Most  of  them  since  the  data  needs  are  on-going.  This  is  the  simple  fact  of  our
situation  on  the  planet.  I  do  believe  that  costs  can  be  driven  down  by  better  man-
agement and through technological advancements. We must avoid the NPOESS ap-
proach and the mismanagement.
Q3a. Of the seventeen recommended missions, how many of these would be one-time
only missions that would not generate demand from the community for follow-
on missions to maintain data continuity?Are NASA and NOAA at risk of being
tasked  with  flying  a  greater  number  of  operational  missions  and  gathering  an
increasing number of data sets?

A3a. I believe that almost all will need to become ‘‘operational.’’ We believe that the
country  needs  to  recognize  this  need  and  to  consider  new  organizational  structures
for meeting this need in a reliable, cost-effective manner.
Q3b. Are  NASA  and  NOAA  at  risk  of  being  tasked  with  flying  a  greater  number  of

operational missions and gathering an increasing number of data sets?

A3b. Yes,  but  we  also  believe  that  we  can  do  a  much  than  the  performance  of  the
recent past. We simply must recognize the challenge before us.

In  sum,  we  are  in  need  of  knowledge  of  the  Earth.  We  know  that  there  is  that
the  planet’s  environment  is  changing  on  all  spatial  scales  including  global,  and
change is rapid, likely more rapid than at any time in human history. Many of these
changes are occurring because of human activity. These human-induced changes are
over and above the stresses imposed by the natural variability of a dynamic planet.
The  changes  cascade  through  the  Earth’s  environment  in  ways  that  are  difficult
to  understand  and  often  impossible  to  predict.  At  the  least,  these  human-driven
changes  in  the  global  environment  will  require  that  societies  develop  a  multitude
of  creative  responses  including  strategies  for  mitigation  and  adaptation.  The  linked
challenges  of  confronting  and  coping  with  global  environmental  changes  and  ad-
dressing and securing a sustainable future is daunting and immediate, but they are
not insurmountable. The challenges can be met, but only with a new and even more
vigorous approach to observe and understanding our changing planet.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

Questions submitted by Representative Ken Calvert

Decadal Survey Recommendations
Q1. How should NASA and NOAA interpret the recommended mission list? Your re-
port suggests this list as a minimum set and notes the imperative that each mis-
sion  be  flown.  But  based  on  the  experience  of  other  decadal  surveys,  NASA  has
been  able  to  fund  only  a  fraction  of  recommended  missions.  Should  NASA  and
NOAA prioritize the missions in the order listed? If so, which mission do believe
should be a priority?

A1. We  believe  that  the  list  represents  the  appropriate  balance  of  missions  in
roughly the appropriate order (considering costs, technology issues, and science bal-
ance). We recognize that there could be a ‘‘number of missions’’ shock, and we could
have  ‘‘packaged’’  the  missions  on  three  larger  platforms  and  reducing  our  rec-
ommended  missions  to  three,  which  could  have  avoided  this  ‘‘number  of  missions’’
shock. This, however, would not have been wise since it would not produce a robust
program.  We  also  note  that  the  missions  listed  in  the  last  time-frame  (2016–2020)
would  likely  be  revisited  by  the  next  ‘‘Decadal  Survey,’’  which  is  consistent  with
other  Decadal  Surveys.  We  believe  that  we  have  the  right  order,  but  again,  as  we
note in our recommendations, the order could be varied slightly because of emerging
science or policy priorities or because of technological readiness. We again stress the
importance  of  embracing  the  Survey  and  beginning  work  on  approximately  half
(seven  to  eight  missions)  of  the  missions  at  roughly  $10M  per  mission  per  year  to
address  key  technological  issues  or  costs  concerns.  Start  these  now  with  extended
Phase  A  efforts—not  simply  ‘‘study’’  contract.  Finally,  we  would  like  to  again  warn
against  growing  any  of  the  missions  by  increasing  the  requirements—this  warning
is  made  in  the  Survey,  and  we  already  hear  reports  that  it  is  happening.  We  must
not let the perfect become the enemy of the good.
Q2. The  Decadal  Survey  recommends  restoring  some  climate  sensors  to  NOAA’s
NPOESS  program.  This  committee  held  three  hearings  on  NPOESS  in  the
109th  Congress  and  we  learned  that  it’s  a  troubled  program,  nearly  $3  billion
over-budget, and it faces tremendous technical challenges just to be able to meet
the  Nation’s  weather  forecasting  needs.  Why  should  we  add  even  more  risk  and
potential cost to this program by restoring the climate sensors? What is the value
to our citizens that would make the risk worth it?

A2. We understand that the NPOESS program is a great disappointment. The pos-
sible causes for the programmatic difficulties are discussed in Chapter Three of our
Report.  We  also  recognize  that  the  cost-benefit  ratio  of  NPOESS  compared  with
POES and DMSP is very troubling. NPOESS was sold as both a climate and weath-
er  program,  and  it  seems  appropriate  to  retain  some  climate  capability.  Moreover,
we  believe  that  our  recommendations  are  not  expensive  and  are,  in  fact,  probably
in the noise of the planned program and would not increase the program risk. This
said,  we  share  the  Congress’s  disappointment  and  concern  (see  Response  to  Ques-
tion  #4  below)  in  the  NPOESS  program.  Finally,  the  failure  of  the  NPOESS  pro-
gram  to  meet  the  originally  observational  schedule  and  plan  increases  the  impor-
tance of the recommended NASA missions.

Venture Class Missions
Q3. Your report recommends creation of a new competed mission line (Venture class)
to replace the Earth System Science Pathfinder program, arguing that the latter
has  become  a  ‘‘competitive  means  for  implementing  NASA’s  strategic  missions.’’
Could you elaborate on this criticism?

A3. The criticism is four-fold. First, beyond the Glory, Landsat Continuity Mission,
and  the  GPM,  there  is  no  planned  program  except  for  the  Earth  System  Science
Program.  This  makes  no  sense—a  program  must  have  planned  priorities  missions
that  address  recognized  needs.  This  we  have  tried  to  set  forth  in  the  Decadal  Sur-
vey.  The  second  problem  is  that  it  is  very  difficult  to  address  the  technology  needs
for  a  program  that  is  primarily  composed  of  unnamed  missions,  such  as  the  Earth
Science  Pathfinders:  How  can  one  know  in  what  technologies  to  invest?  Thirdly,
there  are  missions,  which  are  needed  that  are  more  expensive  than  the  ESSP  mis-
sions,  and  yet  nothing  is  provided  for  these  medium  to  larger  class  missions.  Fi-
nally, the promised timeliness (one or two missions every three years) for the ESSP
program is a broken promise.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

Weather Prediction
Q4. NOAA  was  a  co-sponsor  of  the  Decadal  Survey,  yet  your  report  has  only  three
missions for NOAA compared to 15 for NASA. NOAA provides weather forecasts
and warnings for the Nation—given its vital role, why did you have so few rec-
ommendations for NOAA?

A4. We  restricted  greatly  our  recommendations  to  NOAA  because  of  the  damaging
cost-growth of the NPOESS and GOES programs. We simply could not see the logic
in asking NOAA to do much beyond the modest but high priority recommendations
that  were  made  to  NOAA  in  the  Decadal  Survey  (see  again  my  Response  to  Ques-
tion  #2).  We  would  also  point  out  that  Chapter  Three  contains  additional  NOAA-
focused recommendations (e.g., production of Climate Data Records from NPOESS).
The programmatic failure of NPOESS is very damaging.
Q5. Please  describe  some  examples  of  NASA  research  missions  from  the  1970’s  or

1980’s that demonstrated capabilities now used for operational purposes.

A5. For  this  early  period,  one  would  site  primarily  the  Landsat  plus  the  early
NASA  missions  in  both  polar  orbit  and  geostationary  (e.g.,  cloud  imaging)  that  set
the  stage  for  POES  (and  DMSP)  and  GOES.  More  recently,  the  ocean  topography
mission  (TOPEX),  the  AIRS  instrument  (measuring  humidity  and  temperature  pro-
files) on EOS/Aqua, the TRIMM mission, and the sea surface winds from QucikScat
are all being used operationally.

Launch Vehicles
Q6. One key factor in the program design and cost of new missions is the availability
of  expendable  launch  vehicles.  NASA  acquires  launch  vehicles  for  science  mis-
sions  from  commercial  providers.  How  well  is  your  recommended  mission  set
matched to existing and planned commercial launch vehicle capabilities?

A6. This  is  a  very  important  question.  There  are  many  reasons  (robustness,  reduc-
tion  in  risk,  smooth(er)  budget  ramps,  flexibility)  that  support  our  recommendation
to  fly  smaller,  less  complex  payloads  rather  than  the  larger  platforms  such  as
NPOESS.  The  one  drawback  is  the  reduce  launch  capabilities  (e.g.,  no  more  Delta-
IIs)  that  may  face  the  USA  in  the  future  coupled  with  the  ‘‘skyrocketing’’  (pardon
the pun) launch costs. This is a national problem that goes beyond the Decadal Sur-
vey,  but  it  certainly  has  a  negative  impact  on  the  mission  recommendations  of  the
Survey. This issue should be addressed.

Interagency Cooperation
Q7. What  unique  skills  and  expertise  do  you  think  NASA  has  in  Earth-observing
systems,  and  are  the  necessary  processes  for  interagency  cooperation  in  place  to
allow  the  country  to  benefit  from  those  NASA  capabilities?  Can  you  please  do
the same for NOAA?

A7. Focusing  on  the  word  ‘‘unique’’  somewhat  restricts  my  response.  NASA  has  a
unique technological capability in both breadth and depth, in both the development
of  technologies  and  the  management  of  technologies.  Part  of  the  NPOESS  problem
is  that  this  capability  was  not  adequately  exploited.  There  are  indications  that  the
NASA–NOAA interaction is moving back to a position whereby NASA can better as-
sist  NOAA  in  developing  and  applying  advance  space-based  technologies,  but  for
NPOESS  it  may  be  too  little  too  late.  NASA  also  has  a  solid  scientific  staff,  but  it
is not unique. In fact, the university community collectively is far stronger.

For  NOAA,  the  ‘‘unique’’  capability  is  the  ‘‘operational’’  infrastructure  to  exploit
space-based  date  for  weather  forecasting.  This  is  of  very  high  quality  and  a  unique
national  asset.  I  think  that  the  NASA–NOAA  (and  with  the  Air  Force  and  Navy)
interaction  through  the  Joint  Center  for  Satellite  Data  Assimilation  forms  a  firm
foundation  that  assist  NOAA’s  capability  (and  the  DOD’s)  to  forecast  the  weather,
but  this  could  be  improved  and  expanded  upon-particularly  in  the  area  of  climate
research.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  James  Geringer,  Director  of  Policy  and  Public  Sector  Strategy,  Envi-

ronmental Systems Research Institute (ESRI)

Questions submitted by Representative Mark Udall
Q1. The  Decadal  Survey  report  discusses  issues  beyond  the  climate  change  issue,
such  as  population  increases  near  earthquake  faults,  shortages  of  clean  and  ac-
cessible fresh water, degradation of terrestrial and aquatic ecosystems, increased
in  soil  erosion  and  declines  in  fisheries.  Do  the  Recommended  space  missions
help address such non-climate challenges and societal benefits? What other soci-
etal issues should be addressed?

A1. The  Decadal  Survey  report  highlights  many  other  Earth  science  areas  of  prac-
tical,  economic  and  societal  benefit.  The  recommended  space  missions  help  address
such non-climate challenges. However, NASA’s budget priorities focus on just a few
larger  missions  such  as  the  Global  Precipitation  Mission  (GPM)  and  Landsat  Data
Continuity Mission (LDCM) which seems to preclude other important environmental
observations such as crustal stress and soil characterization.

The  Decadal  Survey  does  recommend  missions  that  would  monitor  crustal  move-
ments and determine changes in strain and stress through the earthquake cycle. We
should  also  enable  better  assessments  of  potential  and  actual  damage  from  natural
disasters and help target mitigation, recovery and relief activities.

Earth  observation  can  dramatically  benefit  the  competitiveness  of  our  U.S.  econ-
omy.  Ocean  observations  are  vital  to  transportation  and  trade.  Improved  weather
forecasting  enables  more  efficient  energy  use.  Success  of  the  emergence  of  carbon
trading market will significantly depend upon our ability to monitor for compliance
and  improvements.  Change  detection  that  is  possible  only  with  remote  sensing  al-
lows better and more timely policy decisions.

The NASA budget request does not appear to contain sufficient funds in the 2008–
2012  timeframe  to  seriously  begin  any  of  these  important  missions.  Instead,  nearly
all  of  the  funds  available  for  mission  development  are  directed  at  just  the  two  mis-
sions,  the  Global  Precipitation  Mission  and  the  Landsat  Data  Continuity  Mission,
both follow-ons of previous missions. The LDCM is not widely supported as the type
of satellite that would recognize trends in today’s global setting. For instance, trends
in world population growth would point to two very pressing needs: adequacy of food
and  water.  Space  missions  should  be  tied  to  real  world  problems,  not  just  arcane
research goals.

Access  to  NASA  data  has  been  an  issue.  We  need  a  more  streamlined  process  to
enable  public  access  to  remotely  sensed  data  for  the  public,  educational  commu-
nities, agricultural producers and industries.

Compliance with industry standard file formats along with well-documented inter-
pretation  of  these  remotely  sensed  data  products  would  enable  utilization  of  data
to support weather forecasting, disaster management, and commercialization.

Based  upon  anecdotal  information,  a  number  of  people  are  not  happy  with  the
configuration and approach being taken for the LDCM. I have received letters from
academics,  scientists  and  policy-makers,  including  the  Chair  and  Vice-Chair  of  the
Western  Governors  Association  who  want  specific  water  monitoring  capability  en-
abled  with  a  thermal  sensor  which  is  not  now  included  in  LDCM  planning.  With
what  appears  to  be  a  growing  disagreement  on  LDCM  capabilities  and  cost,  I  rec-
ommend  that  a  roundtable  be  convened  by  a  neutral  third  party  to  examine  the
Landsat  Data  Continuity  Mission  approach.  An  organization  such  as  the  Institute
for  Global  Environmental  Strategies  (IGES)  could  bring  together  the  interested  sci-
entists and other parties to arrive at a community consensus.
Q2. What  kind  of  Earth-  and  ocean-based  systems  are  needed  to  complement  the

space missions?

A2. We  need  a  system  such  as  the  Integrated  Earth  Observation  System  (IEOS),
consisting  of  space,  ground,  airborne  and  ocean-based  sensors,  both  public  and  pri-
vate, that can gather information and integrate it for researchers and decision-mak-
ers alike with a maximum of efficiency and a minimum of duplication.

The President’s FY 2008 budget recommends partial funding for the proposed In-
tegrated  Ocean  Observing  System  (IOOS)  to  develop  regional  networks  of  remote
ocean  sensors,  including  biological  sensors,  that  would  monitor  the  general  health
of  the  ocean.  Much  more  is  needed  so  that  we  can  better  manage  our  coasts,  im-
prove  hurricane  and  tsunami  predictions,  and  improve  marine  operations.  IOOS
would include space, land, ocean and airborne sensors and application programs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

An excellent example of what IEOS and IOOS should be is the National Weather
Service  (NWS)  within  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration
(NOAA).  The  NWS  provides  the  world  benchmark  for  collecting  and  integrating
weather observations from various sources across the globe to produce critical infor-
mation that protects U.S. citizens and property. The forecasts that result from com-
bining  observations  from  space-based  satellites,  ocean  buoys,  ground-based  systems
and aircraft impact U.S. citizens daily in a wide variety of ways. The integrated in-
formation approach of the NWS should be scaled up to include other programs with-
in and across several federal agencies.

Meaningful  data  gathering  systems  are  possible  at  much  less  cost  than  space
based  platforms.  Constellations  of  lower  cost  satellites  have  the  potential  to  deliver
more  data  more  often  at  less  cost  than  single,  complicated,  one-of-a-kind  expensive
satellites.

Ocean  based  systems  of  observation  such  as  Royal  Caribbean’s  ‘‘Explorer  of  the
Seas’’  with  its  ocean  and  atmospheric  sciences  labs  are  an  excellent  example  of  low
cost  but  very  effective  private  partnership  that  should  be  encouraged  and  extended
to  other  cruise  ships  and  ocean  going  platforms.  They  provide  an  excellent  means
to  verify  on-the-water  observations  and  collect  long-term  data  sets  at  a  fraction  of
the  cost  of  other  methods.  One  person  who  has  been  the  visiting  scientist  three
times aboard ship and has experienced it all first hand, describes it as a ‘‘very neat
and a great way to improve ocean literacy!’’
Q3. In  your  testimony,  you  identified  leadership  issues  as  impediments  to  effective-
ness  of  the  U.S.  Earth  Observations  Program  and  to  executing  the  vision  and
recommendations of the Decadal Survey. How should these issues be addressed?

A3. We must answer the simple question ‘‘Who’s in charge?’’

Current  Earth  observation  systems  are  highly  fragmented  with  different  systems
that were set at different times by different organizations and overseen by different
Congresses  for  a  variety  of  different  reasons.  Few  are  cross-correlated  to  com-
plement each other’s efforts. We do not have a coherent, integrated system to gather
data,  disseminate  it  through  public  portals  for  research  and  analysis,  analytical
tools  to  determine  proper  choices  that  can  enable  public  policy-makers  and  private
business  leaders  make  better  decisions.  We  risk  becoming  dependent  upon  other
world countries to be the primary source of our data.

For example, the USDA is no longer using Landsat imagery for operational moni-
toring applications because of the data gap. Our current capability provides no glob-
al  coverage  for  crop  estimates  and  food  production,  no  adequate  revisit  cycle  for
verification  and  trend  analysis  and  it  is  not  the  best  value  for  USDA.  The  solution
for  USDA/Foreign  Agricultural  Service  is  to  contract  with  India  to  obtain  imagery
supplemented by information from commercial sources such as GeoEye.

We have recommended the convening of a high level commission that would have
specific timelines and tasks to recommend action, legislation and funding that would
be carried out by a cabinet level agency. Creation of an IEOS program office would
enable  us  to  forecast  events  in  our  oceans  and  on  land  even  before  we  see  changes
in  the  atmosphere.  Connecting  disparate  observations  into  national  systems  would
enable  us  to  anticipate  and  even  prevent  key  environmental  problems  or  at  least
detect  them  earlier  to  mitigate  the  effects.  We  should  leverage  the  time  and  re-
sources  already  invested  in  systems  development,  data  collection  and  analysis,  and
modeling to create a comprehensive and actionable vision of our world.

I support the Decadal Survey recommendation for establishment of an office of co-
ordination  within  OSTP.  But  we  need  more  than  coordination.  We  need  leadership
enabled  with  authority  and  motivated  by  passion,  not  just  another  block  on  the  or-
ganizational  chart.  As  part  of  a  national  strategy,  we  should  address  how  to  more
effectively move from research to operations. Our global competitiveness depends on
how quickly and effectively we act.

Questions submitted by Representative Ken Calvert
Q1. In the agricultural industry, to what degree is remote sensing data conveniently

available to individual farmers to help them plan and manage their crops?

A1. A moderate amount of remote sensing data are conveniently available, however,
the raw data are of limited use unless they are incorporated into a decision support
tool that merges the data with other information in the context of a farmer’s needs.
Also, the remote sensing data must be timely and of a sufficient scale to make them
useful in an agricultural setting.

A  wide  range  of  remote  sensing  data  from  government  sources  is  available  to
farmers.  This  includes  information  on  weather  and  climate,  imagery  of  fields  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

roads (base data layers), elevation, and hydrology. The private sector is another im-
portant source of data. Private companies tend to specialize in custom data that are
more current and of higher resolution. For example, a farmer may request that high
resolution aerial imagery be taken of farmland at a specific time in the growing sea-
son.  Meteorological  data  from  the  National  Weather  Service  and  private  sector
sources is accessed by farmers on a regular basis.

The  U.S.  Department  of  Agriculture  sponsors  the  National  Agriculture  Imagery
Program  (NAIP),  which  acquires  imagery  during  the  growing  seasons  in  the  conti-
nental United States. Other federal agencies and a number of private sector compa-
nies  develop  a  range  of  remote  sensing  data  that  is  used  for  agricultural  purposes.
Q2. Can they get the data off the Internet?
A2. Yes, but with a very significant caveat; namely, Internet access and speed.

Remote sensing data are available by way of the Internet from public and private
sources  both  within  and  outside  the  United  States.  Remote  sensing  data  from  gov-
ernment  sources  are  typically  available  at  no  or  low  cost.  Private  sector  data  are
normally available for a fee.

The  primary  sources  of  information  from  the  Federal  Government  are  the  U.S.
Department of Agriculture (USDA), National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administra-
tion (NOAA), and the U.S. Geological Survey (USGS). The National Aeronautics and
Space Administration (NASA) is often a partner contributing to the development of
these  data  through  the  development,  launch,  and  operation  of  satellite  systems.
Some state agencies also make remote sensing data available.

Examples of government data used for agricultural purposes are:

USDA

• Digital  quadrangles  and  mosaics  via  the  National  Agriculture  Imagery  Pro-

gram (NAIP).

NOAA

• Weather and forecast information from the National Weather Service

USGS

• LandSat Imagery (base maps)
• Orthoimagery (Digital Ortho Photos, base maps)
• Elevation (Digital Elevation Models)
• Hydrography
• Land Cover (MODIS)

Examples  of  Internet-based  information  resources  from  the  private  sector  or  for-

eign governments are:

• High  resolution  aircraft-based  imagery  from  numerous  private  sector  sources
• High resolution satellite-based imagery from DigitalGlobe (U.S.)
• High resolution satellite-based land imagery from SPOT (France)

Information  is  of  little  value  if  agricultural  producers  don’t  have  access  or  suffi-
cient  bandwidth.  The  National  Agricultural  Statistics  Service  most  recent  survey
shows that 51 percent of U.S. farms have Internet access. The percentage increases
to  72  percent  at  the  highest  level  ($250,000+  income)  but  the  number  of  producers
at that level is small. Most producers who have Internet access use a dial-up modem
which  limits  information  and  usage.  The  Pew  Internet  and  American  Life  Project
found that agricultural producers and rural communities do not have the broadband
access  that  has  become  a  basic  necessity  for  economic  development,  small  business
growth, and education.

People in urban areas are twice as likely to have broadband access as their rural

Actions by Congress should promote open access, meaningful competition, and in-
novation  at  the  federal  and  State  level  for  high-capacity  rural  broadband  Internet
access through public and private investment partnerships.
Q3. Is it routinely provided by the government through a private sector source?
A3. At  present,  the  process  of  accessing  data  is  cumbersome  and  time  consuming.
If farmers are to make more routine use of government data, the process for identi-
fying  and  accessing  it  must  be  streamlined.  There  are  great  benefits  to  farmers  in
making use of remote sensing data for farm management and precision agriculture.

counterparts.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

A direct benefit would be more efficient use of fertilizers and pesticides. It is impor-
tant  for  federal  agencies  to  make  use  of  state-of-the-art  data  storage  and  delivery
mechanisms  to  make  data  readily  available  to  farmers  and  to  private  sector  firms
who provide information services to the agricultural sector.

Few  farmers  have  the  capacity  to  directly  download  and  analyze  remote  sensing
data.  To  be  useful,  a  decision  support  tool  is  required  to  format  the  data,  integrate
it  with  other  information,  and  display  it  in  a  useful  format.  A  private  sector  com-
pany  that  specializes  in  providing  this  service  for  the  agricultural  industry  is  ZedX
Inc.  (www.zedxinc.com).  Their  decision  support  system  called  ‘‘AgFleet’’  is  used  to
manage more than 15 million acres of agricultural land in North America. The tool
makes  use  of  remote  sensing  and  other  data  from  government  and  private  sector
sources  to  guide  decisions  about  planting,  harvesting,  and  application  of  fertilizers,
pesticides and other chemicals. Crop consultants and dealers of seed, fertilizer, pes-
ticides,  and  other  agricultural  chemicals  typically  provide  this  analytical  service  to
farmers.  The  service  allows  them  to  determine  what  products  should  be  applied
when, where, and at what concentrations, and to track the financial costs and bene-
fits of their farm management practices.
Q4. Can  you  offer  an  estimate  of  the  percentage  of  farmers  that  access  this  type  of

data on a periodic basis?

A4. At present, a relatively small percentage of farmers nationally make use of ad-
vanced  precision  agricultural  techniques  which  require  access  to  remote  sensing
data  on  a  periodic  basis.  This  applies  primarily  to  grain  crops.  A  larger  percentage
of  farmers  make  some  use  of  remote  sensing  imagery  as  base  data  layers  for  farm
management  purposes.  Again,  few  farmers  make  direct  use  of  remote  sensing  data
on a regular basis. Most often, crop consultants, major suppliers of seed and chemi-
cals,  and  agricultural  extension  services  develop  information  products  for  farmers
that often incorporate remote sensing data.

Timeliness, availability, and cost of information are the major determining factors
in  the  use  of  remote  sensing  data  in  agriculture.  If  timely,  high  quality  data  were
available  to  farmers  at  low  or  no  cost  from  either  government  or  private  sources,
the number of farmers making use of precision agriculture practices would increase
greatly.  This  would  increase  the  profitability  of  farm  operations  by  increasing  crop
yields  and  reducing  expenses  associated  with  agricultural  chemicals.  It  would  also
decrease residues on agricultural products, and would minimize the runoff of chemi-
cals into waterways.

As Congress considers the new farm bill, it should consider ways to encourage fed-
eral  agencies  to  make  high  quality  remote  sensing  data  more  readily  available  to
farmers, and it should provide incentives for farmers to make use of precision agri-
culture techniques and decision support tools.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 09:39 May 12, 2007 Jkt 033104 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\FULL07\021307\33104 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

